T.	Theory - simulations & modeling
O.	Observations
M.	Missions - catalogues
-------------------------------------
00.		Evolution, general
01.		Hot stars [OB-type], main sequence
01S.	Hot stars [OB-type], evolved, supergiants
01P.		Hot stars [OB-type], post-RSGs, a Cyg, LBVs, and B[e]SGs
01U.	Hot stars [OB-type], instability close to the Eddington limit - LBVs 
02S.	Warm/Yellow [AFG-type], supergiants
02P.		Warm/Yellow [AFG-type], YHGs, WHGs
03.		Cool [KM-type], supergiants
04.		Core-collapse supernovae, all types
05. 		Binaries, general
05E. 	Binaries, eclipsing
05M. 	Binaries, mergers
05I. 	Binaries, interacting and mass transfer
06W.	Mass loss, line-driven winds
06E.	Mass loss, eruptions
07C.	Convection, core
07S.	Convection, sub-surface
08.		Angular momentum loss and gain
08C.	Angular momentum transport, mixing, core convection, overshooting
08R.	Angular momentum transport, mixing, stellar rotation
09O.	Line broadening - stellar rotation
09I.		Line broadening - microturbulence
09A.	Line broadening - macroturbulence
10.		Populations, statistics
11.		Chemical abundances
12M.	Pulsations, modes
12D.	Pulsations, direction
13.		Internal gravity waves, stochastic low-frequency variability

===============================================

2011ApJS..192....3P
T00,
cited: 3233  [31.05.24]
Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA)

    Paxton, Bill; Bildsten, Lars; Dotter, Aaron; Herwig, Falk; Lesaffre, Pierre; Timmes, Frank show less 

Abstract
Stellar physics and evolution calculations enable a broad range of research in astrophysics. Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA) is a suite of open source, robust, efficient, thread-safe libraries for a wide range of applications in computational stellar astrophysics. A one-dimensional stellar evolution module, MESAstar, combines many of the numerical and physics modules for simulations of a wide range of stellar evolution scenarios ranging from very low mass to massive stars, including advanced evolutionary phases. MESAstar solves the fully coupled structure and composition equations simultaneously. It uses adaptive mesh refinement and sophisticated timestep controls, and supports shared memory parallelism based on OpenMP. State-of-the-art modules provide equation of state, opacity, nuclear reaction rates, element diffusion data, and atmosphere boundary conditions. Each module is constructed as a separate Fortran 95 library with its own explicitly defined public interface to facilitate independent development. Several detailed examples indicate the extensive verification and testing that is continuously performed and demonstrate the wide range of capabilities that MESA possesses. These examples include evolutionary tracks of very low mass stars, brown dwarfs, and gas giant planets to very old ages; the complete evolutionary track of a 1 M sun star from the pre-main sequence (PMS) to a cooling white dwarf; the solar sound speed profile; the evolution of intermediate-mass stars through the He-core burning phase and thermal pulses on the He-shell burning asymptotic giant branch phase; the interior structure of slowly pulsating B Stars and Beta Cepheids; the complete evolutionary tracks of massive stars from the PMS to the onset of core collapse; mass transfer from stars undergoing Roche lobe overflow; and the evolution of helium accretion onto a neutron star. MESA can be downloaded from the project Web site (http://mesa.sourceforge.net/)

2010Sci...327..977B
M00,
cited: 3090  [31.05.24]
Kepler Planet-Detection Mission: Introduction and First Results

    Borucki, William J.; Koch, David; Basri, Gibor and 68 more 

Abstract
The Kepler mission was designed to determine the frequency of Earth-sized planets in and near the habitable zone of Sun-like stars. The habitable zone is the region where planetary temperatures are suitable for water to exist on a planet’s surface. During the first 6 weeks of observations, Kepler monitored 156,000 stars, and five new exoplanets with sizes between 0.37 and 1.6 Jupiter radii and orbital periods from 3.2 to 4.9 days were discovered. The density of the Neptune-sized Kepler-4b is similar to that of Neptune and GJ 436b, even though the irradiation level is 800,000 times higher. Kepler-7b is one of the lowest-density planets (~0.17 gram per cubic centimeter) yet detected. Kepler-5b, -6b, and -8b confirm the existence of planets with densities lower than those predicted for gas giant planets.

2015JATIS...1a4003R
M00,
cited: 2813  [31.05.24]
Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS)

    Ricker, George R.; Winn, Joshua N.; Vanderspek, Roland and 55 more 

Abstract
The Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) will search for planets transiting bright and nearby stars. TESS has been selected by NASA for launch in 2017 as an Astrophysics Explorer mission. The spacecraft will be placed into a highly elliptical 13.7-day orbit around the Earth. During its 2-year mission, TESS will employ four wide-field optical charge-coupled device cameras to monitor at least 200,000 main-sequence dwarf stars with IC≈4-13 for temporary drops in brightness caused by planetary transits. Each star will be observed for an interval ranging from 1 month to 1 year, depending mainly on the star's ecliptic latitude. The longest observing intervals will be for stars near the ecliptic poles, which are the optimal locations for follow-up observations with the James Webb Space Telescope. Brightness measurements of preselected target stars will be recorded every 2 min, and full frame images will be recorded every 30 min. TESS stars will be 10 to 100 times brighter than those surveyed by the pioneering Kepler mission. This will make TESS planets easier to characterize with follow-up observations. TESS is expected to find more than a thousand planets smaller than Neptune, including dozens that are comparable in size to the Earth. Public data releases will occur every 4 months, inviting immediate community-wide efforts to study the new planets. The TESS legacy will be a catalog of the nearest and brightest stars hosting transiting planets, which will endure as highly favorable targets for detailed investigations.  

2013ApJS..208....4P
T00,
cited: 2538  [31.05.24]
Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA): Planets, Oscillations, Rotation, and Massive Stars

    Paxton, Bill; Cantiello, Matteo; Arras, Phil and 8 more 

Abstract
We substantially update the capabilities of the open source software package Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA), and its one-dimensional stellar evolution module, MESA star. Improvements in MESA star's ability to model the evolution of giant planets now extends its applicability down to masses as low as one-tenth that of Jupiter. The dramatic improvement in asteroseismology enabled by the space-based Kepler and CoRoT missions motivates our full coupling of the ADIPLS adiabatic pulsation code with MESA star. This also motivates a numerical recasting of the Ledoux criterion that is more easily implemented when many nuclei are present at non-negligible abundances. This impacts the way in which MESA star calculates semi-convective and thermohaline mixing. We exhibit the evolution of 3-8 M ⊙ stars through the end of core He burning, the onset of He thermal pulses, and arrival on the white dwarf cooling sequence. We implement diffusion of angular momentum and chemical abundances that enable calculations of rotating-star models, which we compare thoroughly with earlier work. We introduce a new treatment of radiation-dominated envelopes that allows the uninterrupted evolution of massive stars to core collapse. This enables the generation of new sets of supernovae, long gamma-ray burst, and pair-instability progenitor models. We substantially modify the way in which MESA star solves the fully coupled stellar structure and composition equations, and we show how this has improved the scaling of MESA's calculational speed on multi-core processors. Updates to the modules for equation of state, opacity, nuclear reaction rates, and atmospheric boundary conditions are also provided. We describe the MESA Software Development Kit that packages all the required components needed to form a unified, maintained, and well-validated build environment for MESA. We also highlight a few tools developed by the community for rapid visualization of MESA star results.

2015ApJS..220...15P
T00,
cited: 2246  [31.05.24]
Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA): Binaries, Pulsations, and Explosions

    Paxton, Bill; Marchant, Pablo; Schwab, Josiah and 10 more 

Abstract
We substantially update the capabilities of the open-source software instrument Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA). MESA can now simultaneously evolve an interacting pair of differentially rotating stars undergoing transfer and loss of mass and angular momentum, greatly enhancing the prior ability to model binary evolution. New MESA capabilities in fully coupled calculation of nuclear networks with hundreds of isotopes now allow MESA to accurately simulate the advanced burning stages needed to construct supernova progenitor models. Implicit hydrodynamics with shocks can now be treated with MESA, enabling modeling of the entire massive star lifecycle, from pre-main-sequence evolution to the onset of core collapse and nucleosynthesis from the resulting explosion. Coupling of the GYRE non-adiabatic pulsation instrument with MESA allows for new explorations of the instability strips for massive stars while also accelerating the astrophysical use of asteroseismology data. We improve the treatment of mass accretion, giving more accurate and robust near-surface profiles. A new MESA capability to calculate weak reaction rates “on-the-fly” from input nuclear data allows better simulation of accretion induced collapse of massive white dwarfs and the fate of some massive stars. We discuss the ongoing challenge of chemical diffusion in the strongly coupled plasma regime, and exhibit improvements in MESA that now allow for the simulation of radiative levitation of heavy elements in hot stars. We close by noting that the MESA software infrastructure provides bit-for-bit consistency for all results across all the supported platforms, a profound enabling capability for accelerating MESA's development.  

2016ApJ...823..102C
T00,
cited: 1929  [31.05.24]
Mesa Isochrones and Stellar Tracks (MIST). I. Solar-scaled Models

    Choi, Jieun; Dotter, Aaron; Conroy, Charlie and 3 more 

Abstract
This is the first of a series of papers presenting the Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA) Isochrones and Stellar Tracks (MIST) project, a new comprehensive set of stellar evolutionary tracks and isochrones computed using MESA, a state-of-the-art open-source 1D stellar evolution package. In this work, we present models with solar-scaled abundance ratios covering a wide range of ages (5≤slant {log}({Age}) [{year}]≤slant 10.3), masses (0.1≤slant M/{M}⊙ ≤slant 300), and metallicities (-2.0≤slant [{{Z}}/{{H}}]≤slant 0.5). The models are self-consistently and continuously evolved from the pre-main sequence (PMS) to the end of hydrogen burning, the white dwarf cooling sequence, or the end of carbon burning, depending on the initial mass. We also provide a grid of models evolved from the PMS to the end of core helium burning for -4.0≤slant [{{Z}}/{{H}}]\lt -2.0. We showcase extensive comparisons with observational constraints as well as with some of the most widely used existing models in the literature. The evolutionary tracks and isochrones can be downloaded from the project website at http://waps.cfa.harvard.edu/MIST/. 

1975ApJ...195..157C
1975/01
cited: 1928 [02.06.24]
Radiation-driven winds in Of stars.

    Castor, J. I.; Abbott, D. C.; Klein, R. I. 

Abstract
The large number of subordinate lines of a representative ion are found to have a dominant effect on the force of radiation on material in O star atmospheres. The force is increased over that due to resonance lines alone so that rates of mass loss are obtained which are 100 times greater than previously thought possible. The force is related to the solution of the line-transfer problem, and it becomes a function of the local velocity gradient. A new stellar wind theory, with a different interpretation of the singular point, is developed to treat this situation. The rate of mass loss, and other properties of the model, are uniquely specified by the luminosity, mass, and radius of the star. Alternative static models do not exist. Numerical results give a rate of mass loss equal to .000006 solar mass per year for an O5 star, with a terminal velocity of 1500 km/sec. The rate of mass loss is sensitive to stellar parameters, while the terminal velocity is not.

2012Sci...337..444S
T05,T05M,T05I,T01,
cited: 1587  [31.05.24]
Binary Interaction Dominates the Evolution of Massive Stars

    Sana, H.; de Mink, S. E.; de Koter, A. and 7 more 

Abstract
The presence of a nearby companion alters the evolution of massive stars in binary systems, leading to phenomena such as stellar mergers, x-ray binaries, and gamma-ray bursts. Unambiguous constraints on the fraction of massive stars affected by binary interaction were lacking. We simultaneously measured all relevant binary characteristics in a sample of Galactic massive O stars and quantified the frequency and nature of binary interactions. More than 70% of all massive stars will exchange mass with a companion, leading to a binary merger in one-third of the cases. These numbers greatly exceed previous estimates and imply that binary interaction dominates the evolution of massive stars, with implications for populations of massive stars and their supernovae. 

2001A&A...369..574V
2001/04
cited: 1558 [02.06.24]
Mass-loss predictions for O and B stars as a function of metallicity

    Vink, Jorick S.; de Koter, A.; Lamers, H. J. G. L. M. 

Abstract
We have calculated a grid of massive star wind models and mass-loss rates for a wide range of metal abundances between 1/100 <= Z/Zsun <= 10. The calculation of this grid completes the Vink et al. (2000) mass-loss recipe with an additional parameter Z. We have found that the exponent of the power law dependence of mass loss vs. metallicity is constant in the range between 1/30 <= Z/Zsun <= 3. The mass-loss rate scales as dot M ~ Z0.85 vinfty p with p = -1.23 for stars with T_eff >~ 25 000 K, and p = -1.60 for the B supergiants with T_eff <~ 25 000 K. Taking also into account the metallicity dependence of vinfty , using the power law dependence vinfty ~ Z0.13 from Leitherer et al. (1992), the overall result of mass loss as a function of metallicity can be represented by dot M ~ Z0.69 for stars with T_eff >~ 25 000 K, and dot M ~ Z0.64 for B supergiants with T_eff <~ 25 000 K. Although it is derived that the exponent of the mass loss vs. metallicity dependence is constant over a large range in Z, one should be aware of the presence of bi-stability jumps at specific temperatures. Here the character of the line driving changes drastically due to recombinations of dominant metal species resulting in jumps in the mass loss. We have investigated the physical origins of these jumps and have derived formulae that combine mass loss recipes for both sides of such jumps. As observations of different galaxies show that the ratio Fe/O varies with metallicity, we make a distinction between the metal abundance Z derived on the basis of iron or oxygen lines. Our mass-loss predictions are successful in explaining the observed mass-loss rates for Galactic and Small Magellanic Cloud O-type stars, as well as in predicting the observed Galactic bi-stability jump. Hence, we believe that our predictions are reliable and suggest that our mass-loss recipe be used in future evolutionary calculations of massive stars at different metal abundance. A computer routine to calculate mass loss is publicly available. 

2012A&A...537A.146E
T00,
cited: 1450 [31.05.24]
Grids of stellar models with rotation. I. Models from 0.8 to 120 M⊙ at solar metallicity (Z = 0.014)

    Ekström, S.; Georgy, C.; Eggenberger, P. and 9 more 

Abstract

Aims: Many topical astrophysical research areas, such as the properties of planet host stars, the nature of the progenitors of different types of supernovae and gamma ray bursts, and the evolution of galaxies, require complete and homogeneous sets of stellar models at different metallicities in order to be studied during the whole of cosmic history. We present here a first set of models for solar metallicity, where the effects of rotation are accounted for in a homogeneous way.
Methods: We computed a grid of 48 different stellar evolutionary tracks, both rotating and non-rotating, at Z = 0.014, spanning a wide mass range from 0.8 to 120 M⊙. For each of the stellar masses considered, electronic tables provide data for 400 stages along the evolutionary track and at each stage, a set of 43 physical data are given. These grids thus provide an extensive and detailed data basis for comparisons with the observations. The rotating models start on the zero-age main sequence (ZAMS) with a rotation rate υini/υcrit = 0.4. The evolution is computed until the end of the central carbon-burning phase, the early asymptotic giant branch (AGB) phase, or the core helium-flash for, respectively, the massive, intermediate, and both low and very low mass stars. The initial abundances are those deduced by Asplund and collaborators, which best fit the observed abundances of massive stars in the solar neighbourhood. We update both the opacities and nuclear reaction rates, and introduce new prescriptions for the mass-loss rates as stars approach the Eddington and/or the critical velocity. We account for both atomic diffusion and magnetic braking in our low-mass star models.
Results: The present rotating models provide a good description of the average evolution of non-interacting stars. In particular, they reproduce the observed main-sequence width, the positions of the red giant and supergiant stars in the Hertzsprung-Russell (HR) diagram, the observed surface compositions and rotational velocities. Very interestingly, the enhancement of the mass loss during the red-supergiant stage, when the luminosity becomes supra-Eddington in some outer layers, help models above 15-20 M⊙ to lose a significant part of their hydrogen envelope and evolve back into the blue part of the HR diagram. This result has interesting consequences for the blue to red supergiant ratio, the minimum mass for stars to become Wolf-Rayet stars, and the maximum initial mass of stars that explode as type II-P supernovae. 

2018ApJS..234...34P
T00,
cited: 1379  [31.05.24]
Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA): Convective Boundaries, Element Diffusion, and Massive Star Explosions

    Paxton, Bill; Schwab, Josiah; Bauer, Evan B. and 10 more 

Abstract
We update the capabilities of the software instrument Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics (MESA) and enhance its ease of use and availability. Our new approach to locating convective boundaries is consistent with the physics of convection, and yields reliable values of the convective-core mass during both hydrogen- and helium-burning phases. Stars with M< 8 M⊙ become white dwarfs and cool to the point where the electrons are degenerate and the ions are strongly coupled, a realm now available to study with MESA due to improved treatments of element diffusion, latent heat release, and blending of equations of state. Studies of the final fates of massive stars are extended in MESA by our addition of an approximate Riemann solver that captures shocks and conserves energy to high accuracy during dynamic epochs. We also introduce a 1D capability for modeling the effects of Rayleigh-Taylor instabilities that, in combination with the coupling to a public version of the STELLA radiation transfer instrument, creates new avenues for exploring Type II supernova properties. These capabilities are exhibited with exploratory models of pair-instability supernovae, pulsational pair-instability supernovae, and the formation of stellar-mass black holes. The applicability of MESA is now widened by the capability to import multidimensional hydrodynamic models into MESA. We close by introducing software modules for handling floating point exceptions and stellar model optimization, as well as four new software tools - MESA-Web, MESA-Docker, pyMESA, and mesastar.org - to enhance MESA's education and research impact.  

2016ApJS..222....8D
T00,
cited: 1271  [31.05.24]
MESA Isochrones and Stellar Tracks (MIST) 0: Methods for the Construction of Stellar Isochrones

    Dotter, Aaron 

Abstract
I describe a method to transform a set of stellar evolution tracks onto a uniform basis and then interpolate within that basis to construct stellar isochrones. This method accommodates a broad range of stellar types, from substellar objects to high-mass stars, and phases of evolution, from the pre-main sequence to the white dwarf cooling sequence. I discuss situations in which stellar physics leads to departures from the otherwise monotonic relation between initial stellar mass and lifetime, and how these may be dealt with in isochrone construction. I close with convergence tests and recommendations for the number of points in the uniform basis and the mass between tracks in the original grid required to achieve a certain level accuracy in the resulting isochrones. The programs that implement these methods are free and open-source; they may be obtained from the project webpage

1978ApJS...38..309H
1978/12
cited: 1144 [02.06.24]
Studies of luminous stars in nearby galaxies. I. Supergiants and O stars in the Milky Way.

    Humphreys, R. M. 

Abstract
In this paper the fundamental properties of the brightest known stars in our Galaxy are determined for future comparison with results for the most luminous stars in other galaxies. The H-R diagrams (Mv versus spectral type and Mbol versus log Te), the luminosities of the brightest stars, and the ratios of blue to red supergiants are all discussed, and a catalog of over 1000 super- giants and 0 stars in associations and clusters is included at the end of the paper. Tile "theoretical" H-R diagram (Mbol versus log Te) reveals a group of superluminous 0 stars with Mbol between -10 and -12 mag, a lack of evolved supergiants at these very high luminosities, and an apparent upper limit to the luminosities of the later-type supergiants (>B5) near Mbol = -9.5 mag. The most luminous red supergiants have a maximum visual luminosity near Mv -8 mag, supporting the suggestion by Sandage and Tammann that they are good distance indicators. Excluding the superluminous star Cyg OB 2 No. 12 (Mv - 9.9 mag), the brightest blue stars are found at Mv -8.5 mag. The variation of the ratio of blue to red supergiants with luminosity is discussed. Tilere is also evidence for a gradient in this ratio with distance from the galactic center, although the results are limited by the incompleteness of the data. Subject headings: galaxies: Milky Way - galaxies: stellar content - stars: early-type - stars: late-type - stars: luminosities - stars: supergiants 

2009ARA&A..47...63S
2009/09
cited: 1028 [03.06.24]
Progenitors of Core-Collapse Supernovae

    Smartt, Stephen J. 

Abstract
Knowledge of the progenitors of core-collapse supernovae is a fundamental component in understanding the explosions. The recent progress in finding such stars is reviewed. The minimum initial mass that can produce a supernova (SN) has converged to 8 ± 1 M from direct detections of red supergiant progenitors of II-P SNe and the most massive white dwarf progenitors, although this value is model dependent. It appears that most type Ibc SNe arise from moderate mass interacting binaries. The highly energetic, broad-lined Ic SNe are likely produced by massive, Wolf-Rayet progenitors. There is some evidence to suggest that the majority of massive stars above 20 M may collapse quietly to black holes and that the explosions remain undetected. The recent discovery of a class of ultrabright type II SNe and the direct detection of some progenitor stars bearing luminous blue variable characteristics suggest some very massive stars do produce highly energetic explosions. The physical mechanism is under debate, and these SNe pose a challenge to stellar evolutionary theory.

2010aste.book.....A
T12M,T12D,
cited: 780  [31.05.24]
Asteroseismology

    Aerts, Conny; Christensen-Dalsgaard, Jørgen; Kurtz, Donald W. 

2011A&A...530A.115B
T00,O00
cited: 733  [31.05.24]
Rotating massive main-sequence stars. I. Grids of evolutionary models and isochrones

    Brott, I.; de Mink, S. E.; Cantiello, M. and 6 more 

Abstract
We present a dense grid of evolutionary tracks and isochrones of rotating massive main-sequence stars. We provide three grids with different initial compositions tailored to compare with early OB stars in the Small and Large Magellanic Clouds and in the Galaxy. Each grid covers masses ranging from 5 to 60 M⊙ and initial rotation rates between 0 and about 600 km s-1. To calibrate our models we used the results of the VLT-FLAMES Survey of Massive Stars. We determine the amount of convective overshooting by using the observed drop in rotation rates for stars with surface gravities log g < 3.2 to determine the width of the main sequence. We calibrate the efficiency of rotationally induced mixing using the nitrogen abundance determinations for B stars in the Large Magellanic cloud. We describe and provide evolutionary tracks and the evolution of the central and surface abundances. In particular, we discuss the occurrence of quasi-chemically homogeneous evolution, i.e. the severe effects of efficient mixing of the stellar interior found for the most massive fast rotators. We provide a detailed set of isochrones for rotating stars. Rotation as an initial parameter leads to a degeneracy between the age and the mass of massive main sequence stars if determined from its observed location in the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram. We show that the consideration of surface abundances can resolve this degeneracy. 

2012ARA&A..50..107L
2012/09
cited: 706 [31.05.24]
Presupernova Evolution of Massive Single and Binary Stars

    Langer, N. 

Abstract
Understanding massive stars is essential for a variety of branches of astronomy including galaxy and star cluster evolution, nucleosynthesis and supernovae, pulsars, and black holes. It has become evident that massive star evolution is very diverse, being sensitive to metallicity, binarity, rotation, and possibly magnetic fields. Although the problem to obtain a good statistical observational database is alleviated by current large spectroscopic surveys, it remains a challenge to model these diverse paths of massive stars toward their violent end stage. I show that the main sequence stage offers the best opportunity to gauge the relevance of the various possible evolutionary scenarios. This also allows sketching the post-main-sequence evolution of massive stars, for which observations of Wolf-Rayet stars give essential clues. Recent supernova discoveries owing to the current boost in transient searches allow tentative mappings of progenitor models with supernova types, including pair-instability supernovae and gamma-ray bursts.

2017PASA...34...58E
2017/11
cited: 704 [03.06.24]
Binary Population and Spectral Synthesis Version 2.1: Construction, Observational Verification, and New Results

    Eldridge, J. J.; Stanway, E. R.; Xiao, L. and 5 more 

Abstract
The Binary Population and Spectral Synthesis suite of binary stellar evolution models and synthetic stellar populations provides a framework for the physically motivated analysis of both the integrated light from distant stellar populations and the detailed properties of those nearby. We present a new version 2.1 data release of these models, detailing the methodology by which Binary Population and Spectral Synthesis incorporates binary mass transfer and its effect on stellar evolution pathways, as well as the construction of simple stellar populations. We demonstrate key tests of the latest Binary Population and Spectral Synthesis model suite demonstrating its ability to reproduce the colours and derived properties of resolved stellar populations, including well-constrained eclipsing binaries. We consider observational constraints on the ratio of massive star types and the distribution of stellar remnant masses. We describe the identification of supernova progenitors in our models, and demonstrate a good agreement to the properties of observed progenitors. We also test our models against photometric and spectroscopic observations of unresolved stellar populations, both in the local and distant Universe, finding that binary models provide a self-consistent explanation for observed galaxy properties across a broad redshift range. Finally, we carefully describe the limitations of our models, and areas where we expect to see significant improvement in future versions

1992ApJ...391..246P
1992/05
cited: 633  [31.05.24]
Presupernova Evolution in Massive Interacting Binaries

    Podsiadlowski, Ph.; Joss, P. C.; Hsu, J. J. L. 

Abstract
The way in which binary interaction affects the presupernova evolution of massive close binaries and the resulting supernova explosions is investigated systematically by means of a Henyey-type stellar evolution code that was modified to allow its application to binary stellar evolution calculations. The code makes it possible to trace the effects of mass and angular momentum loss from the binary, as well as mass transfer within the binary system. It is found that a large number of binary scenarios can be distinguished, depending on the type of binary interaction and the evolutionary stage of the supernova progenitor at the time of the interaction. Monte Carlo simulations are performed to estimate the frequencies of the occurrence of various scenarios. It is found that, because of a previous binary interaction, 15-30 percent of all massive stars (with initial masses greater than about 8 solar masses) become helium stars, and another 5 percent of all massive stars end their lives as blue supergiants rather than as red supergiants.

2009A&A...506..411A
2009/10
cited: 622  [31.05.24]
The CoRoT satellite in flight: description and performance

    Auvergne, M.; Bodin, P.; Boisnard, L. and 107 more 

Abstract
Context: CoRoT is a space telescope dedicated to stellar seismology and the search for extrasolar planets. The mission is led by the CNES in association with French laboratories and has a large international participation. The European Space Agency (ESA), Austria, Belgium, and Germany contribute to the payload, and Spain and Brazil contribute to the ground segment. Development of the spacecraft, which is based on a PROTEUS low earth orbit (LEO) recurrent platform, commenced in October 2000, and the satellite was launched on December 27, 2006.
Aims: The instrument and platform characteristics prior to launch have been described in ESA publication (SP-1306). In the present paper we explain the behaviour in flight, based on raw and corrected data.
Methods: Five runs have been completed since January 2007. The data used here are essentially those acquired during the commissioning phase and from a long run that lasted 146 days. These enable us to give a complete overview of the instrument and platform behaviour for all environmental conditions. The ground based data processing is not described in detail because the most important method has been published elsewhere.
Results: We show that the performance specifications are easily satisfied when the environmental conditions are favourable. Most of the perturbations, hence data corrections, are related to LEO perturbations: high energy particles inside the South Atlantic Anomaly (SAA), eclipses and temperature variations, and line of sight fluctuations due to the attitude control system. Straylight due to the reflected light from the earth, which is controlled by the telescope and baffle design, appears to be negligible.

2008A&ARv..16..209P
2008/12
cited: 525  [31.05.24]
Mass loss from hot massive stars

    Puls, Joachim; Vink, Jorick S.; Najarro, Francisco 

Abstract
Mass loss is a key process in the evolution of massive stars, and must be understood quantitatively if it is to be successfully included in broader astrophysical applications such as galactic and cosmic evolution and ionization. In this review, we discuss various aspects of radiation driven mass loss, both from the theoretical and the observational side. We focus on developments in the past decade, concentrating on the winds from OB-stars, with some excursions to the winds from Luminous Blue Variables (including super-Eddington, continuum-driven winds), winds from Wolf Rayet stars, A-supergiants and Central Stars of Planetary Nebulae. After recapitulating the 1-D, stationary standard model of line-driven winds, extensions accounting for rotation and magnetic fields are discussed. Stationary wind models are presented that provide theoretical predictions for the mass-loss rates as a function of spectral type, metallicity, and the proximity to the Eddington limit. The relevance of the so-called bi-stability jump is outlined. We summarize diagnostical methods to infer wind properties from observations, and compare the results from corresponding campaigns (including the VLT- flames survey of massive stars) with theoretical predictions, featuring the mass loss-metallicity dependence. Subsequently, we concentrate on two urgent problems, weak winds and wind-clumping, that have been identified from various diagnostics and that challenge our present understanding of radiation driven winds. We discuss the problems of “measuring” mass-loss rates from weak winds and the potential of the NIR Br α -line as a tool to enable a more precise quantification, and comment on physical explanations for mass-loss rates that are much lower than predicted by the standard model. Wind-clumping, conventionally interpreted as the consequence of a strong instability inherent to radiative line-driving, has severe implications for the interpretation of observational diagnostics, since derived mass-loss rates are usually overestimated when clumping is present but ignored in the analyses. Depending on the specific diagnostics, such overestimates can amount to factors of 2 to 10, and we describe ongoing attempts to allow for more uniform results. We point out that independent arguments from stellar evolution favor a moderate reduction of present-day mass-loss rates. We also consider larger scale wind structure, interpreted in terms of co-rotating interacting regions, and complete this review with a discussion of recent progress on the X-ray line emission from massive stars. Such emission is thought to originate both from magnetically confined winds and from non-magnetic winds, in the latter case related to the line-driven instability and/or clump-clump collisions. We highlight as to how far the analysis of such X-ray line emission can give further clues regarding an adequate description of wind clumping.

1996A&A...305..171P
1996/01
cited: 503  [31.05.24]
O-star mass-loss and wind momentum rates in the Galaxy and the Magellanic Clouds Observations and theoretical predictions.

    Puls, J.; Kudritzki, R. -P.; Herrero, A. and 8 more 

Abstract
A new, very fast approximate method is presented to determine mass-loss rates of O-stars from Halpha_ line profiles. The method uses H and HeII departure coefficients from unified model atmospheres parametrized in a simple way as function of wind velocity together with photospheric NLTE line profiles as the inner boundary condition for a numerically exact radiative transfer solution to derive a wind contaminated Halpha_-profile. The method is also applied to Hgamma_ to determine stellar gravities corrected for wind emission. A detailed analytical discussion of Halpha_ line formation in O-star winds is given and it is demonstrated that former very simple approaches considering only optically thin wind emission lead to significant systematic errors. Scaling relations and generalized curves of growth are presented that connect mass-loss rate, terminal velocity, stellar parameters and Halpha_ equivalent width. The method is applied to samples of O-stars in the Galaxy, LMC and SMC and mass-loss rates are derived from Halpha_ in combination with terminal velocities measured from IUE and HST spectra. The results reveal that a tight empirical relation exists between the radius modified stellar wind momentum rate ˙(M)vinfinity_R_*_^0.5^ and the stellar luminosity. The variations of this relationship between the Galaxy, LMC and SMC are explained in terms of different abundances. Furthermore, for almost all objects with dense winds (mostly supergiants), the commonly used velocity field exponent β could be derived, indicating a typical value of β=~1. A comparison with the improved theory of radiation driven winds (as presented recently by Pauldrach et al. 1994) shows that the observed wind momentum-luminosity relationship can be understood qualitatively in terms of the theory. However, there exist significant systematic discrepancies as a function of effective temperature, luminosity class and wind performance number η=˙(M)vinfinity_c/L. We stress that these discrepancies would not have been detected with previous simplified Halpha_ -approaches. The deficiencies of the theory are discussed and suggestions for future improvements are made. 

2011MNRAS.412.1522S
2011/04
cited: 437 [03.06.24]
Observed fractions of core-collapse supernova types and initial masses of their single and binary progenitor stars

    Smith, Nathan; Li, Weidong; Filippenko, Alexei V. and 1 more 

Abstract
We analyse the observed fractions of core-collapse supernova (SN) types from the Lick Observatory Supernova Search (LOSS), and we discuss the corresponding implications for massive star evolution. For a standard initial mass function, observed fractions of SN types cannot be reconciled with the expectations of single-star evolution. The mass range of Wolf-Rayet (WR) stars that shed their hydrogen envelopes via their own mass-loss accounts for less than half of the observed fraction of Type Ibc supernovae (SNe Ibc). The true progenitors of SNe Ibc must extend to a much lower range of initial masses than classical WR stars, and we argue that most SN Ibc and SN IIb progenitors must arise from binary Roche lobe overflow. In this scenario, SNe Ic would still trace higher initial mass and metallicity, because line-driven winds in the WR stage remove the helium layer and propel the transition from SN Ib to Ic. Less massive progenitors of SNe Ib and IIb may not be classical WR stars; they may be underluminous with weak winds, possibly hidden by overluminous mass-gainer companions that could appear as B[e] supergiants or related objects having aspherical circumstellar material. The remaining SN types (II-P, II-L and IIn) need to be redistributed across the full range of initial masses, so that even some very massive single stars retain H envelopes until explosion. We consider the possibility of direct collapse to black holes without visible SNe, but find this hypothesis difficult to accommodate in most scenarios. Major areas of remaining uncertainty are (1) the detailed influence of binary separation, rotation and metallicity; (2) mass differences in progenitors of SNe IIn compared to SNe II-L and II-P; and (3) the fraction of SNe Ic arising from single stars with the help of eruptive mass-loss, how this depends on metallicity and how it relates to diversity within the SN Ic subclass. Continued studies of progenitor stars and their environments in nearby galaxies, accounting for SN types, may eventually test these ideas.

2013ApJ...764..166D
2013/02
cited: 427  [31.05.24]
The Rotation Rates of Massive Stars: The Role of Binary Interaction through Tides, Mass Transfer, and Mergers

    de Mink, S. E.; Langer, N.; Izzard, R. G. and 2 more 

Abstract
Rotation is thought to be a major factor in the evolution of massive stars—especially at low metallicity—with consequences for their chemical yields, ionizing flux, and final fate. Deriving the birth spin distribution is of high priority given its importance as a constraint on theories of massive star formation and as input for models of stellar populations in the local universe and at high redshift. Recently, it has become clear that the majority of massive stars interact with a binary companion before they die. We investigate how this affects the distribution of rotation rates, through stellar winds, expansion, tides, mass transfer, and mergers. For this purpose, we simulate a massive binary-star population typical for our Galaxy assuming continuous star formation. We find that, because of binary interaction, 20+5 -10% of all massive MAIN-SEQUENCE stars have projected rotational velocities in excess of 200 km s-1. We evaluate the effect of uncertain input distributions and physical processes and conclude that the main uncertainties are the mass transfer efficiency and the possible effect of magnetic braking, especially if magnetic fields are generated or amplified during mass accretion and stellar mergers. The fraction of rapid rotators we derive is similar to that observed. If indeed mass transfer and mergers are the main cause for rapid rotation in massive stars, little room remains for rapidly rotating stars that are born single. This implies that spin-down during star formation is even more efficient than previously thought. In addition, this raises questions about the interpretation of the surface abundances of rapidly rotating stars as evidence for rotational mixing. Furthermore, our results allow for the possibility that all early-type Be stars result from binary interactions and suggest that evidence for rotation in explosions, such as long gamma-ray bursts, points to a binary origin.

2009A&A...499..279C
2009/05
cited: 314  [31.05.24]
Sub-surface convection zones in hot massive stars and their observable consequences

    Cantiello, M.; Langer, N.; Brott, I. and 6 more 

Abstract
Context: We study the convection zones in the outer envelope of hot massive stars which are caused by opacity peaks associated with iron and helium ionization.
Aims: We determine the occurrence and properties of these convection zones as function of the stellar parameters. We then confront our results with observations of OB stars.
Methods: A stellar evolution code is used to compute a grid of massive star models at different metallicities. In these models, the mixing length theory is used to characterize the envelope convection zones.
Results: We find the iron convection zone (FeCZ) to be more prominent for lower surface gravity, higher luminosity and higher initial metallicity. It is absent for luminosities below about 103.2 {L}_⊙, 103.9 {L}_⊙, and 104.2 {L}_⊙ for the Galaxy, LMC and SMC, respectively. We map the strength of the FeCZ on the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram for three metallicities, and compare this with the occurrence of observational phenomena in O stars: microturbulence, non-radial pulsations, wind clumping, and line profile variability.
Conclusions: The confirmation of all three trends for the FeCZ as function of stellar parameters by empirical microturbulent velocities argues for a physical connection between sub-photospheric convective motions and small scale stochastic velocities in the photosphere of O- and B-type stars. We further suggest that clumping in the inner parts of the winds of OB stars could be caused by the same mechanism, and that magnetic fields produced in the FeCZ could appear at the surface of OB stars as diagnosed by discrete absorption components in ultraviolet absorption lines. 

1999AcA....49..119P
1999/06
cited: 314  [31.05.24]
Pulsational Instability Domains in the Upper Main Sequence

    Pamyatnykh, A. A. 

Abstract
Updated theoretical instability domains in the Hertzsprung-Russell and in the log g-log Teff diagrams for the beta Cep, the SPB and the delta Sct star models are presented. The position of the instability domains is very sensitive to the chemical composition parameters (X,Z) and to the extent (dover) of the convective overshooting, due to influence of these effects on the evolution, in particular, on the location of the Zero-Age Main Sequence (ZAMS) and the Terminal-Age Main Sequence (TAMS). Also, the heavy element abundance, Z, is of critical importance on the instability itself for the beta Cep and the SPB models. The comparison of theoretical and observational domains may be used to constrain these parameters.

2007A&A...473..603M
2007/10
cited: 306 [02.06.24]
The empirical metallicity dependence of the mass-loss rate of O- and early B-type stars

    Mokiem, M. R.; de Koter, A.; Vink, J. S. and 9 more 

Abstract
We present a comprehensive study of the observational dependence of the mass-loss rate in stationary stellar winds of hot massive stars on the metal content of their atmospheres. The metal content of stars in the Magellanic Clouds is discussed, and a critical assessment is given of state-of-the-art mass-loss determinations of OB stars in these two satellite systems and the Milky-Way. Assuming a power-law dependence of mass loss on metal content, dot{M} ∝ Zm, and adopting a theoretical relation between the terminal flow velocity and metal content, v_∞ ∝ Z0.13 (Leitherer et al. 1992, ApJ, 401, 596), we find m = 0.83 ± 0.16 for non-clumped outflows from an analysis of the wind momentum luminosity relation (WLR) for stars more luminous than 105.2 {L⊙}. Within the errors, this result is in agreement with the prediction m = 0.69 ± 0.10 by Vink et al. (2001, A&A, 369, 574). Absolute empirical values for the mass loss, based on Hα and ultraviolet (UV) wind lines, are found to be a factor of two higher than predictions in this high luminosity regime. If this difference is attributed to inhomogeneities in the wind, and this clumping does not impact the predictions, this would imply that luminous O and early-B stars have clumping factors in their Hα and UV line forming regions of about a factor of four. For lower luminosity stars, the winds are so weak that their strengths can generally no longer be derived from optical spectral lines (essentially Hα) and one must currently rely on the analysis of UV lines. We confirm that in this low-luminosity domain the observed Galactic WLR is found to be much steeper than expected from theory (although the specific sample is rather small), leading to a discrepancy between UV mass-loss rates and the predictions by a factor 100 at luminosities of L 104.75 {L⊙}, the origin of which is unknown. We emphasize that even if the current mass-loss rates of hot luminous stars would turn out to be overestimated as a result of wind clumping, but the degree of clumping would be rather independent of metallicity, the scalings derived in this study are expected to remain correct. 

2014ApJ...782....7D
2014/02
cited: 289  [31.05.24]
The Incidence of Stellar Mergers and Mass Gainers among Massive Stars

    de Mink, S. E.; Sana, H.; Langer, N. and 2 more 

Abstract
Because the majority of massive stars are born as members of close binary systems, populations of massive main-sequence stars contain stellar mergers and products of binary mass transfer. We simulate populations of massive stars accounting for all major binary evolution effects based on the most recent binary parameter statistics and extensively evaluate the effect of model uncertainties. Assuming constant star formation, we find that 8^{+9}_{-4}% of a sample of early-type stars are the products of a merger resulting from a close binary system. In total we find that 30^{+10}_{-15}% of massive MAIN-SEQUENCE stars are the products of binary interaction. We show that the commonly adopted approach to minimize the effects of binaries on an observed sample by excluding systems detected as binaries through radial velocity campaigns can be counterproductive. Systems with significant radial velocity variations are mostly pre-interaction systems. Excluding them substantially enhances the relative incidence of mergers and binary products in the non-radial velocity variable sample. This poses a challenge for testing single stellar evolutionary models. It also raises the question of whether certain peculiar classes of stars, such as magnetic O stars, are the result of binary interaction and it emphasizes the need to further study the effect of binarity on the diagnostics that are used to derive the fundamental properties (star-formation history, initial mass function, mass-to-light ratio) of stellar populations nearby and at high redshift.

1984ApJ...284..337O
1984/09
cited: 289  [31.05.24]
Instabilities in line-driven stellar winds. I. Dependence on perturbation wavelength.

    Owocki, S. P.; Rybicki, G. B. 

Abstract
An analytical study is presented of the stability of absorption line-driven flows, such as found in stellar winds, in the presence of small-amplitude disturbances. A generalized calculation of the perturbed direct extinction force is performed and the evolution of the perturbation into the nonlinear regime and the dynamical results of perturbation in the scattered radiation field are examined. An expression is derived for the wavenumber variation of the perturbed line force from the milieu of nonoverlapping lines which have a power-law distribution in opacity. A linear dispersion analysis is carried out to model the growth and propagation of radiative-acoustic waves in absorption line-driven flows, which are found unstable to perturbations that may be smaller than the Sobolev length. No damping mechanism was found that would eliminate the absorption line-driven flows.

1993MNRAS.265..588D
1993/12
cited: 238 [31.05.24]
The opacity mechanism in B-type stars - II. Excitation of high-order g-modes in main-sequence stars.

    Dziembowski, W. A.; Moskalik, P.; Pamyatnykh, A. A. 

Abstract
We show that the OPAL opacities, in addition to explaining the origin of the pulsations of β Cep stars, also predict the existence of a large region in the main-sequence band at lower luminosities, where high-order g-modes of low harmonic degree l are unstable. The excitation mechanism remains the same, and is due to the usual w-effect acting in the metal opacity bump (T ≈ 2 × 105 K). The new instability domain nearly bridges the gap in spectral types between δ Sct and β Cep stars. The periods of the unstable modes are in the range 0.4-3.5 d for l=1 and 2. We propose that this excitation mechanism causes photometric variability in the slowly pulsating B-type stars (SPB stars), and perhaps in other B stars for which variability in the same period range has been reported.

Typically, a large number of modes are simultaneously unstable in one model. Most of them have l>2. Such modes are not likely to be detected photometrically, but may be visible in line profile changes. The excitation of many high-l modes in a star may also cause a spurious contribution to the rotational υ sin i values.

Sequences of unstable modes at each value of l exhibit a periodically varying departure from equal spacing in period. This feature, first noted in white dwarf g-mode spectra (calculated and measured), is in the present case a probe of the region left behind the shrinking core (the μ-gradient zone). We discuss prospects for and difficulties of SPB-star asteroseismology.   

2014A&A...562A.135S
2014/02
cited: 232  [31.05.24]
The IACOB project. I. Rotational velocities in northern Galactic O- and early B-type stars revisited. The impact of other sources of line-broadening

    Simón-Díaz, S.; Herrero, A. 

Abstract
Context. Stellar rotation is an important parameter in the evolution of massive stars. Accurate and reliable measurements of projected rotational velocities in large samples of OB stars are crucial to confront the predictions of stellar evolutionary models with observational constraints.
Aims: We reassess previous determinations of projected rotational velocities (v sin i) in Galactic OB stars using a large, high-quality spectroscopic dataset and a strategy that accounts for other sources of line-broadening in addition to rotation.
Methods: We present a versatile and user-friendly IDL tool - based on a combined Fourier transform (FT) + goodness-of-fit (GOF) methodology - for the line-broadening characterization in OB-type stars. We used this tool to (a) investigate the impact of macroturbulent and microturbulent broadenings on v sin i measurements, and (b) determine v sin i and the size of the macroturbulent broadening (vm) in a sample of ~200 Galactic OB-type stars.
Results: We present observational evidence that illustrates the strengths and limitations of the proposed FT+GOF methodology for OB stars. We confirm previous statements (that were based on indirect arguments or smaller samples) that the macroturbulent broadening is ubiquitous in the massive-star domain. We compare the newly derived v sin i for O stars and early-B supergiants and giants (where the effect of macroturbulence was found to be stronger) with previous determinations that did not account for this additional line-broadening contribution, and show that cases with v sin i≤ 120 km s-1need to be systematically revised downward by ~25 (±20) km s-1. We suggest that microturbulence may impose an upper limit below which v sin i and vm may be incorrectly derived by means of the proposed methodology as it is currently used, and discuss the implications of this statement on the study of relatively narrow-line massive stars.
Conclusions: An investigation of the impact of the revised v sin i distributions on the predictions of massive star evolutionary models is now warranted. The reliability of v sin i measurements in the low v sin i regime, using a more precise description of the intrinsic profiles that are employed for the line-broadening analysis, also needs to be investigated in more detail. 

2008Sci...322..558M
2008/10
cited: 231  [31.05.24]
CoRoT Measures Solar-Like Oscillations and Granulation in Stars Hotter Than the Sun

    Michel, Eric; Baglin, Annie; Auvergne, Michel and 41 more 

Abstract
Oscillations of the Sun have been used to understand its interior structure. The extension of similar studies to more distant stars has raised many difficulties despite the strong efforts of the international community over the past decades. The CoRoT (Convection Rotation and Planetary Transits) satellite, launched in December 2006, has now measured oscillations and the stellar granulation signature in three main sequence stars that are noticeably hotter than the sun. The oscillation amplitudes are about 1.5 times as large as those in the Sun; the stellar granulation is up to three times as high. The stellar amplitudes are about 25% below the theoretic values, providing a measurement of the nonadiabaticity of the process ruling the oscillations in the outer layers of the stars.

1990ApJ...363..694G
1990/11
cited: 229  [31.05.24]
Wave Generation by Turbulent Convection

    Goldreich, Peter; Kumar, Pawan 

Abstract
Wave generation by turbulent convection in a plane parallel, stratified atmosphere lying in a gravitational field is studied. The turbulent spectrum is related to the convective energy flux via the Kolmogorov scaling and the mixing length hypothesis. Efficiencies for the conversion of the convective energy flux into both trapped and propagating waves are estimated.

2019ARA&A..57...35A
2019/08
cited: 205 [03.06.24]
Angular Momentum Transport in Stellar Interiors

    Aerts, Conny; Mathis, Stéphane; Rogers, Tamara M. 

Abstract
Stars lose a significant amount of angular momentum between birth and death, implying that efficient processes transporting it from the core to the surface are active. Space asteroseismology delivered the interior rotation rates of more than a thousand low- and intermediate-mass stars, revealing the following: Single stars rotate nearly uniformly during the core-hydrogen and core-helium burning phases. Stellar cores spin up to a factor of 10 faster than the envelope during the red giant phase. The angular momentum of the helium-burning core of stars is in agreement with the angular momentum of white dwarfs.Observations reveal a strong decrease of core angular momentum when stars have a convective core. Current theory of angular momentum transport fails to explain this. We propose improving the theory with a data-driven approach, whereby angular momentum prescriptions derived frommultidimensional (magneto)hydrodynamical simulations and theoretical considerations are continuously tested against modern observations. The TESS and PLATO space missions have the potential to derive the interior rotation of large samples of stars, including high-mass and metal-poor stars in binaries and clusters. This will provide the powerful observational constraints needed to improve theory and simulations.  

2013ApJ...772...21R
2013/07
cited: 200  [31.05.24]
Internal Gravity Waves in Massive Stars: Angular Momentum Transport

    Rogers, T. M.; Lin, D. N. C.; McElwaine, J. N. and 1 more 

Abstract
We present numerical simulations of internal gravity waves (IGW) in a star with a convective core and extended radiative envelope. We report on amplitudes, spectra, dissipation, and consequent angular momentum transport by such waves. We find that these waves are generated efficiently and transport angular momentum on short timescales over large distances. We show that, as in Earth's atmosphere, IGW drive equatorial flows which change magnitude and direction on short timescales. These results have profound consequences for the observational inferences of massive stars, as well as their long term angular momentum evolution. We suggest IGW angular momentum transport may explain many observational mysteries, such as: the misalignment of hot Jupiters around hot stars, the Be class of stars, Ni enrichment anomalies in massive stars, and the non-synchronous orbits of interacting binaries.

2014A&A...570A..41K
2014/10
cited: 195  [31.05.24]
The connection between stellar granulation and oscillation as seen by the Kepler mission

    Kallinger, T.; De Ridder, J.; Hekker, S. and 6 more 

Abstract
Context. The long and almost continuous observations by Kepler show clear evidence of a granulation background signal in a large sample of stars, which is interpreted as the surface manifestation of convection. It has been shown that its characteristic timescale and rms intensity fluctuation scale with the peak frequency (νmax) of the solar-like oscillations. Various attempts have been made to quantify the observed signal, to determine scaling relations for its characteristic parameters, and to compare them to theoretical predictions. Even though they are consistent on a global scale, large systematic differences of an unknown origin remain between different methods, as well as between the observations and simulations.
Aims: We aim to study different approaches to quantifying the signature of stellar granulation and to search for a unified model that reproduces the observed signal best in a wide variety of stars. We then aim to define empirical scaling relations between the granulation properties and νmax and various other stellar parameters.
Methods: We use a probabilistic method to compare different approaches to extracting the granulation signal. We fit the power density spectra of a large set of Kepler targets, determine the granulation and global oscillation parameter, and quantify scaling relations between them.
Results: We establish that a depression in power at about νmax/2, known from the Sun and a few other main-sequence stars, is also statistically significant in red giants and that a super-Lorentzian function with two components is best suited to reproducing the granulation signal in the broader vicinity of the pulsation power excess. We also establish that the specific choice of the background model can affect the determination of νmax, introducing systematic uncertainties that can significantly exceed the random uncertainties. We find the characteristic frequency (i.e., inverse timescale) and amplitude of both background components to tightly scale with νmax for a wide variety of stars (about 2-2000 μHz in νmax), and quantify a mass dependency of the latter. To enable comparison with theoretical predictions (which do not include the observed power depression), we computed effective timescales and bolometric intensity fluctuations and found them to approximately scale as τeff ∝ g-0.85T-0.4 and Agran ∝ (g2M)- 1/4 (or more conveniently R/M3/4), respectively. Similarly, the bolometric pulsation amplitude scales approximately as Apuls ∝ (g2M)- 1/3 (or R4/3/M), which implicitly verifies a separate mass and luminosity dependence of Apuls. We have also checked our scaling relations with solar reference values and find them in good agreement.
Conclusions: We provide a thorough analysis of the granulation background signal in a large sample of stars, from which we establish a unified model that allows us to accurately extract the granulation and global oscillation parameter. The resulting scaling relations allow a simple estimate of the overall spectral shape of any solar-type oscillator and might serve as a starting point for future large-sample studies or as a reference for theoretical modelling of granulation.  


2021RvMP...93a5001A
2021/01
cited: 195 [31.05.24]
Probing the interior physics of stars through asteroseismology

    Aerts, C. 

Abstract
Yearslong time series of high-precision brightness measurements have been assembled for thousands of stars with telescopes operating in space. Such data have allowed astronomers to measure the physics of stellar interiors via nonradial oscillations, opening a new avenue to study the stars in the Universe. Asteroseismology, the interpretation of the characteristics of oscillation modes in terms of the physical properties of the stellar interior, brought entirely new insights in how stars rotate and how they build up their chemistry throughout their evolution. Data-driven space asteroseismology has delivered a drastic increase in the reliability of computer models mimicking the evolution of stars born with a variety of masses and metallicities. Such models are critical ingredients for modern physics as a whole because they are used throughout various contemporary and multidisciplinary research fields in space science, including the search for life outside the Solar System, archaeological studies of the Milky Way, and the study of single and binary supernova progenitors, among which are future gravitational wave sources. The specific role and potential of asteroseismology for those modern research fields are illustrated. The review concludes with current limitations of asteroseismology and highlights how they can be overcome with ongoing and future large infrastructures for survey astronomy combined with new theoretical research in the era of high-performance computing. This review presents results obtained through major community efforts over the past decade. These breakthroughs were achieved in a collaborative and inclusive spirit that is characteristic of the asteroseismology community. The review's aim is to make this research field accessible to graduate students and readers coming from other fields of physics, with incentives to enjoy and join future applications in this domain of astrophysics. 

1999A&A...350..970K
1999/10
cited: 193 [02.06.24]
The wind momentum-luminosity relationship of galactic A- and B-supergiants

    Kudritzki, R. P.; Puls, J.; Lennon, D. J. and 5 more 

Abstract
The Balmer lines of four A Ia-supergiants (spectral type A0 to A3) and fourteen B Ia and Ib-supergiants (spectral type B0 to B3) in the solar neighbourhood are analyzed by means of NLTE unified model atmospheres to determine the properties of their stellar winds, in particular their wind momenta. As in previous work for O-stars (Puls et al. \cite{pul96}) a tight relationship between stellar wind momentum and luminosity (``WLR'') is found. However, the WLR varies as function of spectral type. Wind momenta are strongest for O-supergiants, then decrease from early B (B0 and B1) to mid B (B1.5 to B3) spectral types and become stronger again for A-supergiants. The slope of the WLR appears to be steeper for A- and mid B-supergiants than for O-supergiants. The spectral type dependence is interpreted as an effect of ionization changing the effective number and the line strength distribution function of spectral lines absorbing photon momentum around the stellar flux maximum. This interpretation needs to be confirmed by theoretical calculations for radiation driven winds. The ``Pistol-Star'' in the Galactic Centre, an extreme mid B-hypergiant recently identified as one of the most luminous stars (Figer et al. \cite{fig99}) is found to coincide with the extrapolation of the mid B-supergiant WLR towards higher luminosities. However, the wind momentum of the Luminous Blue Variable P Cygni, a mid B-supergiant with extremely strong mass-loss, is 1.2 dex higher than the WLR of the ``normal'' supergiants. This significant difference is explained in terms of the well-known stellar wind bi-stability of supergiants very close to the Eddinton-limit in this particular range of effective temperatures. A-supergiants in M31 observed with HIRES at the Keck telescope have wind momenta compatible with their galactic counterparts. The potential of the WLR as a new, independent extragalactic distance indicator is discussed. It is concluded that with ten to twenty objects, photometry with HST and medium resolution spectroscopy with 8m-telescopes from the ground distance moduli can be obtained with an accuracy of about 0fm1 out to the Virgo and Fornax clusters of galaxies.

2010ApJ...717L..62Y
2010/07
cited: 190 [03.06.24]
Evolution of Massive Stars with Pulsation-driven Superwinds During the Red Supergiant Phase

    Yoon, Sung-Chul; Cantiello, Matteo 

Abstract
Pulsations driven by partial ionization of hydrogen in the envelope are often considered important for driving winds from red supergiants (RSGs). In particular, it has been suggested by some authors that the pulsation growth rate in an RSG can be high enough to trigger an unusually strong wind (or a superwind), when the luminosity-to-mass ratio becomes sufficiently large. Using both hydrostatic and hydrodynamic stellar evolution models with initial masses ranging from 15 to 40 M sun, we investigate (1) how the pulsation growth rate depends on the global parameters of supergiant stars and (2) what would be the consequences of a pulsation-driven superwind, if it occurred, for the late stages of massive star evolution. We suggest that such a superwind history would be marked by a runaway increase, followed by a sudden decrease, of the wind's mass-loss rate. The impact on the late evolution of massive stars would be substantial, with stars losing a huge fraction of their H-envelope even with a significantly lower initial mass than previously predicted. This might explain the observed lack of Type II-P supernova (SN) progenitors having initial mass higher than about 17 M sun. We also discuss possible implications for a subset of Type IIn SNe. 

2016A&A...593A.120V
2016/10
cited: 182  [31.05.24]
Interior rotation of a sample of γ Doradus stars from ensemble modelling of their gravity-mode period spacings

    Van Reeth, T.; Tkachenko, A.; Aerts, C. 

Abstract
Context. Gamma Doradus stars (hereafter γ Dor stars) are known to exhibit gravity- and/or gravito-intertial modes that probe the inner stellar region near the convective core boundary. The non-equidistant spacing of the pulsation periods is an observational signature of the stellar evolutions and current internal structure and is heavily influenced by rotation.
Aims: We aim to constrain the near-core rotation rates for a sample of γ Dor stars for which we have detected period spacing patterns.
Methods: We combined the asymptotic period spacing with the traditional approximation of stellar pulsation to fit the observed period spacing patterns using χ2-optimisation. The method was applied to the observed period spacing patterns of a sample of stars and used for ensemble modelling.
Results: For the majority of stars with an observed period spacing pattern we successfully determined the rotation rates and the asymptotic period spacing values, although the uncertainty margins on the latter were typically large. This also resulted directly in the identification of the modes that correspond to the detected pulsation frequencies, which for most stars were prograde dipole gravity and gravito-inertial modes. The majority of the observed retrograde modes were found to be Rossby modes. We also discuss the limitations of the method that are due to the neglect of the centrifugal force and the incomplete treatment of the Coriolis force.
Conclusions: Despite its current limitations, the proposed method was successful to derive the rotation rates and to identify the modes from the observed period spacing patterns. It forms the first step towards detailed seismic modelling based on observed period spacing patterns of moderately to rapidly rotating γDor stars. 

2015MNRAS.447..598S
2015/02
cited: 152 [03.06.24]
Luminous blue variables are antisocial: their isolation implies that they are kicked mass gainers in binary evolution

    Smith, Nathan; Tombleson, Ryan 

Abstract
Based on their relatively isolated environments, we argue that luminous blue variables (LBVs) must be primarily the product of binary evolution, challenging the traditional single-star view wherein LBVs mark a brief transition between massive O-type stars and Wolf-Rayet (WR) stars. If the latter were true, then LBVs should be concentrated in young massive clusters like early O-type stars. This is decidedly not the case. Examining locations of LBVs in our Galaxy and the Magellanic Clouds reveals that, with only a few exceptions, LBVs systematically avoid clusters of O-type stars. In the Large Magellanic Cloud, LBVs are statistically much more isolated than O-type stars, and (perhaps most surprisingly) even more isolated than WR stars. This makes it impossible for LBVs to be single `massive stars in transition' to WR stars. Instead, we propose that massive stars and supernova (SN) subtypes are dominated by bifurcated evolutionary paths in interacting binaries, wherein most WR stars and Type Ibc supernovae (SNe Ibc) correspond to the mass donors, while LBVs (and their lower mass analogues like B[e] supergiants, which are even more isolated) are the mass gainers. In this view, LBVs are evolved massive blue stragglers. Through binary mass transfer, rejuvinated mass gainers get enriched, spun up, and sometimes kicked far from their clustered birth sites by their companion's SN. This scenario agrees better with LBVs exploding as SNe IIn in isolation, and it predicts that many massive runaway stars may be rapid rotators. Mergers or blue Thorne-Zytkow-like objects might also give rise to LBVs, but these scenarios may have a harder time explaining why LBVs avoid clusters.

2010Natur.464..259D
2010/03
cited: 143 [03.06.24]
Deviations from a uniform period spacing of gravity modes in a massive star

    Degroote, Pieter; Aerts, Conny; Baglin, Annie and 13 more 

Abstract
The life of a star is dominantly determined by the physical processes in the stellar interior. Unfortunately, we still have a poor understanding of how the stellar gas mixes near the stellar core, preventing precise predictions of stellar evolution. The unknown nature of the mixing processes as well as the extent of the central mixed region is particularly problematic for massive stars. Oscillations in stars with masses a few times that of the Sun offer a unique opportunity to disentangle the nature of various mixing processes, through the distinct signature they leave on period spacings in the gravity mode spectrum. Here we report the detection of numerous gravity modes in a young star with a mass of about seven solar masses. The mean period spacing allows us to estimate the extent of the convective core, and the clear periodic deviation from the mean constrains the location of the chemical transition zone to be at about 10 per cent of the radius and rules out a clear-cut profile.

2018MNRAS.475..879T
2018/03
cited: 139 [31.05.24]
Angular momentum transport by heat-driven g-modes in slowly pulsating B stars

    Townsend, R. H. D.; Goldstein, J.; Zweibel, E. G. 

Abstract
Motivated by recent interest in the phenomenon of waves transport in massive stars, we examine whether the heat-driven gravity (g) modes excited in slowly pulsating B (SPB) stars can significantly modify the stars' internal rotation. We develop a formalism for the differential torque exerted by g modes, and implement this formalism using the GYRE oscillation code and the MESASTAR stellar evolution code. Focusing first on a 4.21M⊙ model, we simulate 1 000 yr of stellar evolution under the combined effects of the torque due to a single unstable prograde g mode (with an amplitude chosen on the basis of observational constraints), and diffusive angular momentum transport due to convection, overshooting, and rotational instabilities. We find that the g mode rapidly extracts angular momentum from the surface layers, depositing it deeper in the stellar interior. The angular momentum transport is so efficient that by the end of the simulation, the initially non-rotating surface layers are spun in the retrograde direction to ≈ 30 per cent of the critical rate. However, the additional inclusion of magnetic stresses in our simulations almost completely inhibits this spin-up. Expanding our simulations to cover the whole instability strip, we show that the same general behaviour is seen in all SPB stars. After providing some caveats to contextualize our results, we hypothesize that the observed slower surface rotation of SPB stars (as compared to other B-type stars) may be the direct consequence of the angular momentum transport that our simulations demonstrate.

2015A&A...575A..60M
2015/03
cited: 130 [03.06.24]
Impact of mass-loss on the evolution and pre-supernova properties of red supergiants

    Meynet, G.; Chomienne, V.; Ekström, S. and 7 more 

Abstract
Context. The post-main-sequence evolution of massive stars is very sensitive to many parameters of the stellar models. Key parameters are the mixing processes, the metallicity, the mass-loss rate, and the effect of a close companion.
Aims: We study the change in the red supergiant (RSG) lifetimes, the tracks in the Hertzsprung-Russel diagram (HRD), the positions in this diagram of the pre-supernova progenitor and the structure of the stars at that time for various mass-loss rates during the RSG phase and for two different initial rotation velocities.
Methods: Stellar models were computed with the Geneva code for initial masses between 9 and 25 M⊙ at solar metallicity (Z = 0.014) with 10 times and 25 times the standard mass-loss rates during the RSG phase, with and without rotation.
Results: The surface abundances of RSGs are much more sensitive to rotation than to the mass-loss rates during that phase. A change of the RSG mass-loss rate has a strong impact on the RSG lifetimes and in turn on the luminosity function of RSGs. An observed RSG is associated with a model of higher initial mass when models with an enhanced RSG mass-loss rate are used to deduce that mass. At solar metallicity, models with an enhanced mass-loss rate produce significant changes in the populations of blue, yellow, and RSGs. When extended blue loops or blueward excursions are produced by enhanced mass-loss, the models predict that a majority of blue (yellow) supergiants are post-RSG objects. These post-RSG stars are predicted to show much lower surface rotational velocities than similar blue supergiants on their first crossing of the HR gap. Enhanced mass-loss rates during the RSG phase have little impact on the Wolf-Rayet populations. The position in the HRD of the end point of the evolution depends on the mass of the hydrogen envelope. More precisely, whenever at the pre-supernova stage the H-rich envelope contains more than about 5% of the initial mass, the star is a RSG, and whenever the H-rich envelope contains less than 1% of the total mass, the star is a blue supergiant. For intermediate situations, intermediate colors and effective temperatures are obtained. Yellow progenitors for core-collapse supernovae can be explained by models with an enhanced mass-loss rate, while the red progenitors are better fitted by models with the standard mass-loss rate. 

2013A&A...550L...7G
2013/02
cited: 129 [03.06.24]
Massive star evolution: luminous blue variables as unexpected supernova progenitors

    Groh, J. H.; Meynet, G.; Ekström, S. 

Abstract
Stars more massive than about 8 M⊙ end their lives as a supernova (SN), an event of fundamental importance Universe-wide. Theoretically, these stars have been expected to be either at the red supergiant, blue supergiant, or Wolf-Rayet stage before the explosion. We performed coupled stellar evolution and atmospheric modeling of stars with initial masses between 20 M⊙ and 120 M⊙. We found that the 20 M⊙ and 25 M⊙ rotating models, before exploding as SN, have spectra that do not resemble any of the aforementioned classes of massive stars. Rather, they have remarkable similarities with rare, unstable massive stars known as luminous blue variables (LBV). While observations show that some SNe seem to have had LBVs as progenitors, no theoretical model had yet predicted that a star could explode at this stage. Our models provide theoretical support for relatively low-luminosity LBVs exploding as SN in the framework of single stellar evolution. This is a significant shift in paradigm, meaning that a fraction of LBVs could be the end stage of massive star evolution, rather than a transitory evolutionary phase. We suggest that type IIb SN could have LBV as progenitors, and a prime example could be SN 2008ax.

2007A&A...463.1093L
2007/03
cited: 125 [31.05.24]
Statistical properties of a sample of periodically variable B-type supergiants. Evidence for opacity-driven gravity-mode oscillations

    Lefever, K.; Puls, J.; Aerts, C. 

Abstract
Aims:We have studied a sample of 28 periodically variable B-type supergiants selected from the HIPPARCOS mission and 12 comparison stars covering the whole B-type spectral range. Our goal is to test if their variability is compatible with opacity-driven non-radial oscillations.
Methods: We have used the NLTE atmosphere code FASTWIND to derive the atmospheric and wind parameters of the complete sample through line profile fitting. We applied the method to selected H, He, and Si line profiles, measured with the high resolution CES spectrograph attached to the ESO CAT telescope in La Silla, Chile.
Results: From the location of the stars in the (log T_eff, log g) diagram, we suggest that variability of our sample supergiants is indeed due to the gravity modes resulting from the opacity mechanism. We find nine of the comparison stars to be periodically variable as well, and suggest them to be new α Cyg variables. We find marginal evidence of a correlation between the amplitude of the photometric variability and the wind density. We investigate the wind momentum-luminosity relation for the whole range of B spectral type supergiants, and find that the later types (>B5) perfectly follow the relation for A supergiants. Additionally, we provide a new spectral type - T_eff calibration for B supergiants.
Conclusions: .Our results imply the possibility of probing internal structure models of massive stars of spectral type B through seismic tuning of gravity modes. 

2014A&A...564A..30G
2014/04
cited: 124 [03.06.24]
The evolution of massive stars and their spectra. I. A non-rotating 60 M⊙ star from the zero-age main sequence to the pre-supernova stage

    Groh, Jose H.; Meynet, Georges; Ekström, Sylvia and 1 more 

Abstract
For the first time, the interior and spectroscopic evolution of a massive star is analyzed from the zero-age main sequence (ZAMS) to the pre-supernova (SN) stage. For this purpose, we combined stellar evolution models using the Geneva code and stellar atmospheric/wind models using CMFGEN. With our approach, we were able to produce observables, such as a synthetic high-resolution spectrum and photometry, thereby aiding the comparison between evolution models and observed data. Here we analyze the evolution of a non-rotating 60 M⊙ star and its spectrum throughout its lifetime. Interestingly, the star has a supergiant appearance (luminosity class I) even at the ZAMS. We find the following evolutionary sequence of spectral types: O3 I (at the ZAMS), O4 I (middle of the H-core burning phase), B supergiant (BSG), B hypergiant (BHG), hot luminous blue variable (LBV; end of H-core burning), cool LBV (H-shell burning through the beginning of the He-core burning phase), rapid evolution through late WN and early WN, early WC (middle of He-core burning), and WO (end of He-core burning until core collapse). We find the following spectroscopic phase lifetimes: 3.22 × 106 yr for the O-type, 0.34 × 105 yr (BSG), 0.79 × 105 yr (BHG), 2.35 × 105 yr (LBV), 1.05 × 105 yr (WN), 2.57 × 105 yr (WC), and 3.80 × 104 yr (WO). Compared to previous studies, we find a much longer (shorter) duration for the early WN (late WN) phase, as well as a long-lived LBV phase. We show that LBVs arise naturally in single-star evolution models at the end of the MS when the mass-loss rate increases as a consequence of crossing the bistability limit. We discuss the evolution of the spectra, magnitudes, colors, and ionizing flux across the star's lifetime, and the way they are related to the evolution of the interior. We find that the absolute magnitude of the star typically changes by ~6 mag in optical filters across the evolution, with the star becoming significantly fainter in optical filters at the end of the evolution, when it becomes a WO just a few 104 years before the SN explosion. We also discuss the origin of the different spectroscopic phases (i.e., O-type, LBV, WR) and how they are related to evolutionary phases (H-core burning, H-shell burning, He-core burning). 

2009A&A...508..409A
2009/12
cited: 123 [31.05.24]
Collective pulsational velocity broadening due to gravity modes as a physical explanation for macroturbulence in hot massive stars

    Aerts, C.; Puls, J.; Godart, M. and 1 more 

Abstract
Aims. We aimed at finding a physical explanation for the occurrence of macroturbulence in the atmospheres of hot massive stars, a phenomenon found in observations for more than a decade but that remains unexplained.
Methods: We computed time series of line profiles for evolved massive stars broadened by rotation and by hundreds of low-amplitude nonradial gravity-mode pulsations which are predicted to be excited for evolved massive stars.
Results: In general, line profiles based on macrotubulent broadening can mimic those subject to pulsational broadening. In several cases, though, good fits require macroturbulent velocities that pass the speed of sound for realistic pulsation amplitudes. Moreover, we find that the rotation velocity can be seriously underestimated by using a simple parameter description for macroturbulence rather than an appropriate pulsational model description to fit the line profiles.
Conclusions: We conclude that macroturbulence is a likely signature of the collective effect of pulsations. We provide line diagnostics and their typical values to decide whether or not pulsational broadening is present in observed line profiles, as well as a procedure to avoid an inaccurate estimation of the rotation velocity.

2017A&A...598A..74P
2017/02
cited: 121 [04.06.24]
Signatures of internal rotation discovered in the Kepler data of five slowly pulsating B stars

    Pápics, P. I.; Tkachenko, A.; Van Reeth, T. and 9 more 

Abstract
Context. Massive stars are important building blocks of the Universe, and their stellar structure and evolution models are fundamental cornerstones of various fields in modern astrophysics. The precision of these models is strongly limited by our lack of understanding of various internal mixing processes that significantly influence the lifetime of these objects, such as core overshoot, chemical mixing, or the internal differential rotation.
Aims: Our goal is to calibrate models by extending the sample of available seismic studies of slowly pulsating B (SPB) stars, providing input for theoretical modelling efforts that will deliver precise constraints on the parameters describing the internal mixing processes in these objects.
Methods: We used spectral synthesis and disentangling techniques to derive fundamental parameters and to determine precise orbital parameters from high-resolution spectra. We employed custom masks to construct light curves from the virtually uninterrupted four year long Kepler pixel data and used standard time-series analysis tools to construct a set of significant frequencies for each target. These sets were first filtered from combination frequencies, and then screened for period spacing patterns.
Results: We detect gravity mode period series of modes, of the same degree ℓ with consecutive radial order n, in four new and one revisited SPB star. These series (covering typically 10 to 40 radial orders) are clearly influenced by moderate to fast rotation and carry signatures of chemical mixing processes. Furthermore, they are predominantly prograde dipole series. Our spectroscopic analysis, in addition to placing each object inside the SPB instability strip and identifying KIC 4930889 as an SB2 binary, reveals that KIC 11971405 is a fast rotator that shows very weak Be signatures. Together with the observed photometric outbursts this illustrates that this Be star is a fast rotating SPB star. We hypothesise that the outbursts might be connected to its very densely compressed oscillation spectrum. 

2006ApJ...650.1111S
2006/10
cited: 122  [31.05.24]
MOST Detects g- and p-Modes in the B Supergiant HD 163899 (B2 Ib/II)

    Saio, H.; Kuschnig, R.; Gautschy, A. and 8 more 

Abstract
The Microvariability and Oscillations of Stars (MOST) satellite observed the B supergiant HD 163899 (B2 Ib/II) for 37 days as a guide star and detected 48 frequencies <~2.8 cycles day-1 with amplitudes of a few millimagnitudes (mmag) and less. The frequency range embraces g- and p-mode pulsations. It was generally thought that no g-modes are excited in less luminous B supergiants because strong radiative damping is expected in the core. Our theoretical models, however, show that such g-modes are excited in massive post-main-sequence stars, in accordance with these observations. The nonradial pulsations excited in models between 20 Msolar at logTeff~4.41 and 15 Msolar at logTeff~4.36 are roughly consistent with the observed frequency range. Excitation by the Fe bump in opacity is possible because g-modes can be partially reflected at a convective zone associated with the hydrogen-burning shell, which significantly reduces radiative damping in the core. The MOST light curve of HD 163899 shows that such a reflection of g-modes actually occurs and reveals the existence of a previously unrecognized type of variable, slowly pulsating B supergiants (SPBsg) distinct from α Cyg variables. Such g-modes have great potential for asteroseismology. 

1995A&A...297..483B
1995/05
cited: 115  [31.05.24]
Effects of accretion onto massive main sequence stars.

    Braun, H.; Langer, N. 

Abstract
We investigate the effect of mass accretion onto massive main sequence stars on their internal structure and evolution. Adopted accretion rates and accretion time scales are in the range applying to massive Case B binary systems. For the first time, we incorporate the influence of molecular weight gradients on convection in this context. In contrast to earlier studies, we find that the so called "rejuvenation" of the mass accreting star does not always take place. Rather, stellar models with a chemical structure unlike that of single stars may be obtained. We investigate which physical parameters determine whether rejuvenation occurs, namely the fraction of the core hydrogen burning time spent until the onset of accretion, the amount of matter accreted, the initial mass of the accreting star, and the efficiency of convection in regions of stabilizing mean molecular weight gradients. Further on, the evolution of accretion stars until central carbon ignition is investigated. We find that the main result of non-rejuvenation is a much smaller helium core mass and accordingly longer core helium burning times compared to single stars. This may lead to blue supergiant positions adjacent to the main sequence band in the HR diagram, and to blue supergiant pre-supernova configurations. Possible relations to the observed distribution of luminous stars in the HR diagram of the LMC and to the progenitor of supernova 1987A are discussed.

2014A&A...564A..52L
2014/04
cited: 114  [31.05.24]
The spectroscopic Hertzsprung-Russell diagram

    Langer, N.; Kudritzki, R. P. 

Abstract
Context. The Hertzsprung-Russell diagram is an essential diagnostic diagram for stellar structure and evolution, which has now been in use for more than 100 years.
Aims: We introduce a new diagram based on the gravity-effective temperature diagram, which has various advantages.
Methods: Our spectroscopic Hertzsprung-Russell (sHR) diagram shows the inverse of the flux-mean gravity versus the effective temperature. Observed stars whose spectra have been quantitatively analyzed can be entered in this diagram without the knowledge of the stellar distance or absolute brightness.
Results: Observed stars can be as conveniently compared to stellar evolution calculations in the sHR diagram as in the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram. However, at the same time, our ordinate is proportional to the stellar mass-to-luminosity ratio, which can thus be directly determined. For intermediate- and low-mass star evolution at constant mass, we show that the shape of an evolutionary track in the sHR diagram is identical to that in the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram. We also demonstrate that for hot stars, their stellar Eddington factor can be directly read off the sHR diagram. For stars near their Eddington limit, we argue that a version of the sHR diagram may be useful where the gravity is exchanged by the effective gravity.
Conclusions: We discuss the advantages and limitations of the sHR diagram, and show that it can be fruitfully applied to Galactic stars, but also to stars with known distance, e.g., in the LMC or in galaxies beyond the Local Group.  

2014ApJ...796..121J
2014/12
cited: 112  [31.05.24]
Luminous Blue Variables and Superluminous Supernovae from Binary Mergers

    Justham, Stephen; Podsiadlowski, Philipp; Vink, Jorick S. 

Abstract
Evidence suggests that the direct progenitor stars of some core-collapse supernovae (CCSNe) are luminous blue variables (LBVs), perhaps including some Type II "superluminous supernovae" (SLSNe). We examine models in which massive stars gain mass soon after the end of core hydrogen burning. These are mainly intended to represent mergers following a brief contact phase during early Case B mass transfer, but may also represent stars which gain mass in the Hertzsprung Gap or extremely late during the main-sequence phase for other reasons. The post-accretion stars spend their core helium-burning phase as blue supergiants (BSGs), and many examples are consistent with being LBVs at the time of core collapse. Other examples are yellow supergiants at explosion. We also investigate whether such post-accretion stars may explode successfully after core collapse. The final core properties of post-accretion models are broadly similar to those of single stars with the same initial mass as the pre-merger primary star. More surprisingly, when early Case B accretion does affect the final core properties, the effect appears likely to favor a successful SN explosion, i.e., to make the core properties more like those of a lower-mass single star. However, the detailed structures of these cores sometimes display qualitative differences to any single-star model we have calculated. The rate of appropriate binary mergers may match the rate of SNe with immediate LBV progenitors; for moderately optimistic assumptions we estimate that the progenitor birthrate is ~1% of the CCSN rate. 

2019NatAs...3..760B
2019/05
cited: 110  [31.05.24]
Low-frequency gravity waves in blue supergiants revealed by high-precision space photometry

    Bowman, Dominic M.; Burssens, Siemen; Pedersen, May G. and 14 more 

Abstract
Almost all massive stars explode as supernovae and form a black hole or neutron star. The remnant mass and the impact of the chemical yield on subsequent star formation and galactic evolution strongly depend on the internal physics of the progenitor star, which is currently not well understood. The theoretical uncertainties of stellar interiors accumulate with stellar age, which is particularly pertinent for the blue supergiant phase. Stellar oscillations represent a unique method of probing stellar interiors, yet inference for blue supergiants is hampered by a dearth of observed pulsation modes. Here we report the detection of diverse variability in blue supergiants using the K2 and TESS space missions. The discovery of pulsation modes or an entire spectrum of low-frequency gravity waves in these stars allow us to map the evolution of hot massive stars towards the ends of their lives. Future asteroseismic modelling will provide constraints on ages, core masses, interior mixing, rotation and angular momentum transport. The discovery of variability in blue supergiants is a step towards a data-driven empirical calibration of theoretical evolution models for the most massive stars in the Universe.

2017A&A...597A..22S
2017/01
cited: 107  [31.05.24]
The IACOB project . III. New observational clues to understand macroturbulent broadening in massive O- and B-type stars

    Simón-Díaz, S.; Godart, M.; Castro, N. and 5 more 

Abstract
Context. The term macroturbulent broadening is commonly used to refer to a certain type of non-rotational broadening affecting the spectral line profiles of O- and B-type stars. It has been proposed to be a spectroscopic signature of the presence of stellar oscillations; however, we still lack a definitive confirmation of this hypothesis.
Aims: We aim to provide new empirical clues about macroturbulent spectral line broadening in O- and B-type stars to evaluate its physical origin.
Methods: We used high-resolution spectra of 430 stars with spectral types in the range O4 - B9 (all luminosity classes) compiled in the framework of the IACOB project. We characterized the line broadening of adequate diagnostic metal lines using a combined Fourier transform and goodness-of-fit technique. We performed a quantitative spectroscopic analysis of the whole sample using automatic tools coupled with a huge grid of fastwind models to determine their effective temperatures and gravities. We also incorporated quantitative information about line asymmetries into our observational description of the characteristics of the line profiles, and performed a comparison of the shape and type of line-profile variability found in a small sample of O stars and B supergiants with still undefined pulsational properties and B main-sequence stars with variable line profiles owing to a well-identified type of stellar oscillations or to the presence of spots in the stellar surface.
Results: We present a homogeneous and statistically significant overview of the (single snapshot) line-broadening properties of stars in the whole O and B star domain. We find empirical evidence of the existence of various types of non-rotational broadening agents acting in the realm of massive stars. Even though all these additional sources of line-broadening could be quoted and quantified as a macroturbulent broadening from a practical point of view, their physical origin can be different. Contrarily to the early- to late-B dwarfs and giants, which present a mixture of cases in terms of line-profile shape and variability, the whole O-type and B supergiant domain (or, roughly speaking, stars with MZAMS ≳ 15 M⊙) is fully dominated by stars with a remarkable non-rotational broadening component and very similar profiles (including type of variability). We provide some examples illustrating how this observational dataset can be used to evaluate scenarios aimed at explaining the existence of sources of non-rotational broadening in massive stars. 

2018MNRAS.474.2774S
2018/02
cited: 105  [31.05.24]
quick access to full text links
quick links to lists of references, citations and more
quick links to data associated with this article
Theory and evidence of global Rossby waves in upper main-sequence stars: r-mode oscillations in many Kepler stars

    Saio, Hideyuki; Kurtz, Donald W.; Murphy, Simon J. and 2 more 

Abstract
Asteroseismic inference from pressure modes (p modes) and buoyancy, or gravity, modes (g modes) is ubiquitous for stars across the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram. Until now, however, discussion of r modes (global Rossby waves) has been rare. Here we derive the expected frequency ranges of r modes in the observational frame by considering the visibility of these modes. We find that the frequencies of r modes of azimuthal order m appear as groups at slightly lower frequency than m times the rotation frequency. Comparing the visibility curves for r modes with Fourier amplitude spectra of Kepler light curves of upper main-sequence B, A, and F stars, we find that r modes are present in many γ Dor stars (as first discovered by Van Reeth et al.), spotted stars, and so-called heartbeat stars, which are highly eccentric binary stars. We also find a signature of r modes in a frequently bursting Be star observed by Kepler. In the amplitude spectra of moderately to rapidly rotating γ Dor stars, r-mode frequency groups appear at lower frequency than prograde g-mode frequency groups, while in the amplitude spectra of spotted early A to B stars, groups of symmetric (with respect to the equator) r-mode frequencies appear just below the frequency of a structured peak that we suggest represents an approximate stellar rotation rate. In many heartbeat stars, a group of frequencies can be fitted with symmetric m = 1 r modes, which can be used to obtain rotation frequencies of these stars. 

2009A&A...506..111D
2009/10
cited: 104 [04.06.24]
Evidence for nonlinear resonant mode coupling in the β Cephei star HD 180642 (V1449 Aquilae) from CoRoT photometry

    Degroote, P.; Briquet, M.; Catala, C. and 8 more 

Abstract
Context: We present the CoRoT light curve of the β Cep star HD 180642, assembled during the first long run of the space mission, as well as archival single-band photometry.
Aims: Our goal is to analyse the detailed behaviour present in the light curve and interpret it in terms of excited-mode frequencies.
Methods: After describing the noise properties in detail, we use various time series analyses and fitting techniques to model the CoRoT light curve, for various physical assumptions. We apply statistical goodness-of-fit criteria that allow us to select the most appropriate physical model fit to the data.
Results: We conclude that the light-curve model based on nonlinear resonant frequency and phase locking provides the best representation of the data. Interpretation of the residuals is dependent on the chosen physical model used to prewhiten the data.
Conclusions: Our observational results constitute a fruitful starting point for detailed seismic stellar modelling of this large-amplitude and evolved β Cep star. 

2014A&A...570L..13C
2014/10
cited: 103  [31.05.24]
The spectroscopic Hertzsprung-Russell diagram of Galactic massive stars

    Castro, N.; Fossati, L.; Langer, N. and 3 more 

Abstract
The distribution of stars in the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram narrates their evolutionary history and directly assesses their properties. Placing stars in this diagram however requires the knowledge of their distances and interstellar extinctions, which are often poorly known for Galactic stars. The spectroscopic Hertzsprung-Russell diagram (sHRD) tells similar evolutionary tales, but is independent of distance and extinction measurements. Based on spectroscopically derived effective temperatures and gravities of almost 600 stars, we derive for the first time the observational distribution of Galactic massive stars in the sHRD. While biases and statistical limitations in the data prevent detailed quantitative conclusions at this time, we see several clear qualitative trends. By comparing the observational sHRD with different state-of-the-art stellar evolutionary predictions, we conclude that convective core overshooting may be mass-dependent and, at high mass (≳15 M⊙), stronger than previously thought. Furthermore, we find evidence for an empirical upper limit in the sHRD for stars with Teff between 10 000 and 32 000 K and, a strikingly large number of objects below this line. This over-density may be due to inflation expanding envelopes in massive main-sequence stars near the Eddington limit. 

2020MNRAS.491.3586L
2020/01
cited: 99 [04.06.24]
Gravity-mode period spacings and near-core rotation rates of 611 γ Doradus stars with Kepler

    Li, Gang; Van Reeth, Timothy; Bedding, Timothy R. and 4 more 

Abstract
We report our survey of γ Dor stars from the 4-yr Kepler mission. These stars pulsate mainly in g modes and r modes, showing period-spacing patterns in the amplitude spectra. The period-spacing patterns are sensitive to the chemical composition gradients and the near-core rotation, hence they are essential for understanding the stellar interior. We identified period-spacing patterns in 611 γ Dor stars. Almost every star pulsates in dipole g modes, while about 30 per cent of stars also show clear patterns for quadrupole g modes and 16 per cent of stars present r-mode patterns. We measure periods, period spacings, and the gradient of the period spacings. These three observables guide the mode identifications and can be used to estimate the near-core rotation rate. We find many stars are hotter and show longer period-spacing patterns than theory. Using the traditional approximation of rotation (TAR), we inferred the asymptotic spacings, the near-core rotation rates, and the radial orders of the g and r modes. Most stars have a near-core rotation rate around 1 d-1 and an asymptotic spacing around 4000 s. We also find that many stars rotate more slowly than predicted by theory for unclear reasons. 11 stars show rotational splittings with fast rotation rates. We compared the observed slope-rotation relation with the theory and find a large spread. We detected rotational modulations in 58 stars and used them to derive the core-to-surface rotation ratios. The interiors rotate faster than the cores in most stars, but by no more than 5 per cent. 

2020A&A...637A...6L
2020/05
cited: 94  [31.05.24]
The expansion of stripped-envelope stars: Consequences for supernovae and gravitational-wave progenitors

    Laplace, E.; Götberg, Y.; de Mink, S. E. and 2 more 

Abstract
Massive binaries that merge as compact objects are the progenitors of gravitational-wave sources. Most of these binaries experience one or more phases of mass transfer, during which one of the stars loses all or part of its outer envelope and becomes a stripped-envelope star. The evolution of the size of these stripped stars is crucial in determining whether they experience further interactions and understanding their ultimate fate. We present new calculations of stripped-envelope stars based on binary evolution models computed with MESA. We use these to investigate their radius evolution as a function of mass and metallicity. We further discuss their pre-supernova observable characteristics and potential consequences of their evolution on the properties of supernovae from stripped stars. At high metallicity, we find that practically all of the hydrogen-rich envelope is removed, which is in agreement with earlier findings. Only progenitors with initial masses below 10 M⊙ expand to large radii (up to 100 R⊙), while more massive progenitors remain compact. At low metallicity, a substantial amount of hydrogen remains and the progenitors can, in principle, expand to giant sizes (> 400 R⊙) for all masses we consider. This implies that they can fill their Roche lobe anew. We show that the prescriptions commonly used in population synthesis models underestimate the stellar radii by up to two orders of magnitude. We expect that this has consequences for the predictions for gravitational-wave sources from double neutron star mergers, particularly with regard to their metallicity dependence.

2013A&A...559A.130S
2013/11
cited: 95 [02.06.24]
Macroclumping as solution of the discrepancy between Hα and P v mass loss diagnostics for O-type stars

    Šurlan, B.; Hamann, W. -R.; Aret, A. and 3 more 

Abstract
Context. Recent studies of O-type stars have demonstrated that discrepant mass-loss rates are obtained when different diagnostic methods are employed. Fitting the unsaturated UV resonance lines (e.g., P v) gives drastically lower values than obtained from the Hα emission. Wind inhomogeneity (so-called "clumping") may be the main cause of this discrepancy.
Aims: In a previous paper, we presented 3D Monte-Carlo calculations for the formation of scattering lines in a clumped stellar wind. In the present paper we select five O-type supergiants (from O4 to O7) and test whether the reported discrepancies can be resolved this way.
Methods: In the first step, the analyses started with simulating the observed spectra with Potsdam Wolf-Rayet (PoWR) non-LTE model atmospheres. The mass-loss rates are adjusted to fit to the observed Hα emission lines best. For the unsaturated UV resonance lines (i.e., P v) we then applied our 3D Monte-Carlo code, which can account for wind clumps of any optical depths ("macroclumping"), a non-void interclump medium, and a velocity dispersion inside the clumps. The ionization stratifications and underlying photospheric spectra were adopted from the PoWR models. The properties of the wind clumps were constrained by fitting the observed resonance line profiles.
Results: Our results show that with the mass-loss rates that fit Hα (and other Balmer and He ii lines), the UV resonance lines (especially the unsaturated doublet of P v) can also be reproduced with no problem when macroclumping is taken into account. There is no need to artificially reduce the mass-loss rates or to assume a subsolar phosphorus abundance or an extremely high clumping factor, unlike what was claimed by other authors. These consistent mass-loss rates are lower by a factor of 1.3 to 2.6, compared to the mass-loss rate recipe from Vink et al.
Conclusions: Macroclumping resolves the previously reported discrepancy between Hα and P v mass-loss diagnostics. 

2005ApJ...635L..77W
2005/12
cited: 91 [04.06.23]
MOST Detects g-Modes in the Be Star HD 163868

    Walker, G. A. H.; Kuschnig, R.; Matthews, J. M. and 10 more 

Abstract
We have extracted a 37 day light curve with a precision of 0.0012 mag per point for the Microvariability and Oscillations of Stars (MOST) guide star, HD 163868 (B5 Ve). Its rich frequency spectrum resembles that of a slowly pulsating B (SPB) star but, being a rapid rotator, we designate it SPBe. The 60 most significant periods lie in three distinct groups centered on 8 days and 14 and 7 hr. We demonstrate that the 14 and 7 hr periods can be modeled by two swarms of high-order, prograde sectorial g-modes (m=-1, -2), which are destabilized by the iron opacity bump. Our model also predicts a group of r-modes with periods near 2.3 days, which correspond to frequencies observed in the tail of the 8 day group. The remaining periodicities, between 7 and 11 days, cannot be explained by unstable modes in our model.

2011A&A...533A...4B
2011/09
cited: 89  [31.05.24]
Variability in the CoRoT photometry of three hot O-type stars. HD 46223, HD 46150, and HD 46966

    Blomme, R.; Mahy, L.; Catala, C. and 15 more 

Abstract
Context. The detection of pulsational frequencies in stellar photometry is required as input for asteroseismological modelling. The second short run (SRa02) of the CoRoT mission has provided photometric data of unprecedented quality and time-coverage for a number of O-type stars.
Aims: We analyse the CoRoT data corresponding to three hot O-type stars, describing the properties of their light curves and search for pulsational frequencies, which we then compare to theoretical model predictions.
Methods: We determine the amplitude spectrum of the data, using the Lomb-Scargle and a multifrequency HMM-like technique. Frequencies are extracted by prewhitening, and their significance is evaluated under the assumption that the light curve is dominated by red noise. We search for harmonics, linear combinations, and regular spacings among these frequencies. We use simulations with the same time sampling as the data as a powerful tool to judge the significance of our results. From the theoretical point of view, we use the MAD non-adiabatic pulsation code to determine the expected frequencies of excited modes.
Results: A substantial number of frequencies is listed, but none can be convincingly identified as being connected to pulsations. The amplitude spectrum is dominated by red noise. Theoretical modelling shows that all three O-type stars can have excited modes, but the relation between the theoretical frequencies and the observed spectrum is not obvious.
Conclusions: The dominant red noise component in the hot O-type stars studied here clearly points to a different origin than the pulsations seen in cooler O stars. The physical cause of this red noise is unclear, but we speculate on the possibility of sub-surface convection, granulation, or stellar wind inhomogeneities being responsible. 

2010ApJ...720L.174S
2010/09
cited: 85 [02.06.24]
Observational Evidence for a Correlation Between Macroturbulent Broadening and Line-profile Variations in OB Supergiants

    Simón-Díaz, S.; Herrero, A.; Uytterhoeven, K. and 3 more 

Abstract
The spectra of O and B supergiants (Sgs) are known to be affected by a significant form of extra line broadening (usually referred to as macroturbulence) in addition to that produced by stellar rotation. Recent analyses of high-resolution spectra have shown that the interpretation of this line broadening as a consequence of large-scale turbulent motions would imply highly supersonic velocity fields in photospheric regions, making this scenario quite improbable. Stellar oscillations have been proposed as a likely alternative explanation. As part of a long-term observational project, we are investigating the macroturbulent broadening in O and B Sgs and its possible connection with spectroscopic variability phenomena and stellar oscillations. In this Letter, we present the first encouraging results of our project, namely, firm observational evidence for a strong correlation between the extra broadening and photospheric line-profile variations in a sample of 13 Sgs with spectral types ranging from O9.5 to B8. 

2019A&A...625A.132S
2019/05
cited: 84  [31.05.24]
Constraining mixing in massive stars in the Small Magellanic Cloud

    Schootemeijer, A.; Langer, N.; Grin, N. J. and 1 more 

Abstract
Context. The evolution of massive stars is strongly influenced by internal mixing processes such as semiconvection, convective core overshooting, and rotationally induced mixing. None of these processes are currently well constrained.
Aims: We investigate models for massive stars in the Small Magellanic Cloud (SMC), for which stellar-wind mass loss is less important than for their metal-rich counterparts. We aim to constrain the various mixing efficiencies by comparing model results to observations.
Methods: For this purpose, we use the stellar-evolution code MESA to compute more than 60 grids of detailed evolutionary models for stars with initial masses of 9…100 M⊙, assuming different combinations of mixing efficiencies of the various processes in each grid. Our models evolve through core hydrogen and helium burning, such that they can be compared with the massive main sequence and supergiant population of the SMC.
Results: We find that for most of the combinations of the mixing efficiencies, models in a wide mass range spend core-helium burning either only as blue supergiants, or only as red supergiants. The latter case corresponds to models that maintain a shallow slope of the hydrogen/helium (H/He) gradient separating the core and the envelope of the models. Only a small part of the mixing parameter space leads to models that produce a significant number of blue and red supergiants, which are both in abundance in the SMC. Some of our grids also predict a cut-off in the number of red supergiants above log L/L⊙ = 5…5.5. Interestingly, these models contain steep H/He gradients, as is required to understand the hot, hydrogen-rich Wolf-Rayet stars in the SMC. We find that unless it is very fast, rotation has a limited effect on the H/He profiles in our models.
Conclusions: While we use specific implementations of the considered mixing processes, they comprehensively probe the two first-order structural parameters, the core mass and the H/He gradient in the core-envelope interface. Our results imply that in massive stars, mixing during the main-sequence evolution leads to a moderate increase in the helium core masses, and also that the H/He gradients above the helium cores become very steep. Our model grids can be used to further refine the various mixing efficiencies with the help of future observational surveys of the massive stars in the SMC, and thereby help to considerably reduce the uncertainties in models of massive star evolution. 

2020A&A...640A..36B
2020/08
cited: 82  [31.05.24]
Photometric detection of internal gravity waves in upper main-sequence stars. II. Combined TESS photometry and high-resolution spectroscopy

    Bowman, D. M.; Burssens, S.; Simón-Díaz, S. and 5 more 

Abstract
Context. Massive stars are predicted to excite internal gravity waves (IGWs) by turbulent core convection and from turbulent pressure fluctuations in their near-surface layers. These IGWs are extremely efficient at transporting angular momentum and chemical species within stellar interiors, but they remain largely unconstrained observationally.
Aims: We aim to characterise the photometric detection of IGWs across a large number of O and early-B stars in the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram, and explain the ubiquitous detection of stochastic variability in the photospheres of massive stars.
Methods: We combined high-precision time-series photometry from the NASA Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite with high-resolution ground-based spectroscopy of 70 stars with spectral types O and B to probe the relationship between the photometric signatures of IGWs and parameters such as spectroscopic mass, luminosity, and macroturbulence.
Results: A relationship is found between the location of a star in the spectroscopic Hertzsprung-Russell diagram and the amplitudes and frequencies of stochastic photometric variability in the light curves of massive stars. Furthermore, the properties of the stochastic variability are statistically correlated with macroturbulent velocity broadening in the spectral lines of massive stars.
Conclusions: The common ensemble morphology for the stochastic low-frequency variability detected in space photometry and its relationship to macroturbulence is strong evidence for IGWs in massive stars, since these types of waves are unique in providing the dominant tangential velocity field required to explain the observed spectroscopy.  

2020A&A...641A..43B
2020/09
cited: 81 [31.05.24]
Is HR 6819 a triple system containing a black hole?. An alternative explanation

    Bodensteiner, J.; Shenar, T.; Mahy, L. and 10 more 

Abstract
Context. HR 6819 was recently proposed to be a triple system consisting of an inner B-type giant plus black hole (BH) binary with an orbital period of 40 d and an outer Be tertiary. This interpretation is mainly based on two inferences: that the emission attributed to the outer Be star is stationary and that the inner star, which is used as mass calibrator for the BH, is a B-type giant.
Aims: We re-investigate the properties of HR 6819 to search for a possibly simpler alternative explanation for HR 6819, which does not invoke the presence of a triple system with a BH in the inner binary.
Methods: Based on an orbital analysis, the disentangling of the spectra of the two visible components and the atmosphere analysis of the disentangled spectra, we investigate the configuration of the system and the nature of its components.
Results: Disentangling implies that the Be component is not a static tertiary, but rather a component of the binary in the 40 d orbit. The inferred radial velocity amplitudes of K1 = 60.4 ± 1.0 km s-1 for the B-type primary and K2 = 4.0 ± 0.8 km s-1 for the Be-type secondary imply an extreme mass ratio of M2/M1 = 15 ± 3. We find that the B-type primary, which we estimate to contribute about 45% to the optical flux, has an effective temperature of Teff = 16 ± 1 kK and a surface gravity of log g = 2.8 ± 0.2 [cgs], while the Be secondary, which contributes about 55% to the optical flux, has Teff = 20 ± 2 kK and log g = 4.0 ± 0.3 [cgs]. We infer spectroscopic masses of 0.4-0.1+0.3and 6-3+5 for the primary and secondary which agree well with the dynamical masses for an inclination of i = 32°. This indicates that the primary might be a stripped star rather than a B-type giant. Evolutionary modelling suggests that a possible progenitor system would be a tight (Pi ≈ 2 d) B+B binary system that experienced conservative mass transfer. While the observed nitrogen enrichment of the primary conforms with the predictions of the evolutionary models, we find no indications for the predicted He enrichment.
Conclusions: We suggest that HR 6819 is a binary system consisting of a stripped B-type primary and a rapidly-rotating Be star that formed from a previous mass-transfer event. In the framework of this interpretation, HR 6819 does not contain a BH. Interferometry can distinguish between these two scenarios by providing an independent measurement of the separation between the visible components. 

2020A&A...637A..60T
2020/05
cited: 77 [04.06.24]
The mass discrepancy in intermediate- and high-mass eclipsing binaries: The need for higher convective core masses

    Tkachenko, A.; Pavlovski, K.; Johnston, C. and 6 more 

Abstract
Context. Eclipsing, spectroscopic double-lined binary star systems are excellent laboratories for calibrating theories of stellar interior structure and evolution. Their precise and accurate masses and radii measured from binary dynamics offer model-independent constraints and challenge current theories of stellar evolution.
Aims: We aim to investigate the mass discrepancy in binary stars. This is the significant difference between stellar components' masses measured from binary dynamics and those inferred from models of stellar evolution via positions of the components in the Teff - log g Kiel diagram. We study the effect of near-core mixing on the mass of the convective core of the stars and interpret the results in the context of the mass discrepancy.
Methods: We fitted stellar isochrones computed from a grid of MESA stellar evolution models to a homogeneous sample of eleven high-mass binary systems. Two scenarios are considered where individual stellar components of a binary system are treated independent of each other and where they are forced to have the same age and initial chemical composition. We also study the effect of the microturbulent velocity and turbulent pressure on the atmosphere model structure and stellar spectral lines, and its link with the mass discrepancy.
Results: We find that the mass discrepancy is present in our sample and that it is anti-correlated with the surface gravity of the star. No correlations are found with other fundamental and atmospheric parameters, including the stellar mass. The mass discrepancy can be partially accounted for by increasing the amount of near-core mixing in stellar evolution models. We also find that ignoring the microturbulent velocity and turbulent pressure in stellar atmosphere models of hot evolved stars results in the overestimation of their effective temperature by up to 8%. Together with enhanced near-core mixing, this can almost entirely account for the ∼30% mass discrepancy found for the evolved primary component of V380 Cyg.
Conclusions: We find a strong link between the mass discrepancy and the convective core mass. The mass discrepancy can be solved by considering the combined effect of extra near-core boundary mixing and the consistent treatment in the spectrum analysis of hot evolved stars. Our binary modelling results in convective core masses between 17 and 35% of the stellar mass, which is in excellent agreement with the results from gravity-mode asteroseismology of single stars. This implies larger helium core masses near the end of the main sequence than have been anticipated so far.

2020A&A...639A..81B
2020/07
cited: 77 [31.05.24]
Variability of OB stars from TESS southern Sectors 1-13 and high-resolution IACOB and OWN spectroscopy

    Burssens, S.; Simón-Díaz, S.; Bowman, D. M. and 6 more 

Abstract
Context. The lack of high-precision long-term continuous photometric data for large samples of stars has impeded the large-scale exploration of pulsational variability in the OB star regime. As a result, the candidates for in-depth asteroseismic modelling have remained limited to a few dozen dwarfs. The TESS nominal space mission has surveyed the southern sky, including parts of the galactic plane, yielding continuous data across at least 27 d for hundreds of OB stars.
Aims: We aim to couple TESS data in the southern sky with ground-based spectroscopy to study the variability in two dimensions, mass and evolution. We focus mainly on the presence of coherent pulsation modes that may or may not be present in the predicted theoretical instability domains and unravel all frequency behaviour in the amplitude spectra of the TESS data.
Methods: We compose a sample of 98 OB-type stars observed by TESS in Sectors 1-13 and with available multi-epoch, high-resolution spectroscopy gathered by the IACOB and OWN surveys. We present the short-cadence 2 min light curves of dozens of OB-type stars, which have one or more spectra in the IACOB or OWN database. Based on these light curves and their Lomb-Scargle periodograms, we performed variability classification and frequency analysis. We placed the stars in the spectroscopic Hertzsprung-Russell diagram to interpret the variability in an evolutionary context.
Results: We deduce the diverse origins of the mmag-level variability found in all of the 98 OB stars in the TESS data. We find among the sample several new variable stars, including three hybrid pulsators, three eclipsing binaries, high frequency modes in a Be star, and potential heat-driven pulsations in two Oe stars.
Conclusions: We identify stars for which future asteroseismic modelling is possible, provided mode identification is achieved. By comparing the position of the variables to theoretical instability strips, we discuss the current shortcomings in non-adiabatic pulsation theory and the distribution of pulsators in the upper Hertzsprung-Russell diagram. 

2019ApJ...876....4E
2019/05
cited: 76 [31.05.24]
Three-dimensional Simulations of Massive Stars. I. Wave Generation and Propagation

    Edelmann, P. V. F.; Ratnasingam, R. P.; Pedersen, M. G. and 3 more 

Abstract
We present the first three-dimensional (3D), hydrodynamic simulations of the core convection zone (CZ) and extended radiative zone spanning from 1% to 90% of the stellar radius of an intermediate-mass (3 {M}⊙ ) star. This allows us to self-consistently follow the generation of internal gravity waves (IGWs) at the convective boundary and their propagation to the surface. We find that convection in the core is dominated by plumes. The frequency spectrum in the CZ and that of IGW generation is a double power law, as seen in previous two-dimensional (2D) simulations. The spectrum is significantly flatter than theoretical predictions using excitation through Reynolds stresses induced by convective eddies alone. It is compatible with excitation through plume penetration. An empirically determined distribution of plume frequencies generally matches the one necessary to explain a large part of the observed spectrum. We observe waves propagating in the radiation zone and excited standing modes, which can be identified as gravity and fundamental modes. They show similar frequencies and node patterns to those predicted by the stellar oscillation code GYRE. The continuous part of the spectrum fulfills the IGW dispersion relation. A spectrum of tangential velocity and temperature fluctuations close to the surface is extracted, which is directly related to observable brightness variations in stars. Unlike 2D simulations, we do not see the high frequencies associated with wave breaking, likely because the 3D simulations presented in this paper are more heavily damped.

2013MNRAS.433.1246S
2013/08
cited: 76  [31.05.24]
Evolution of blue supergiants and α Cygni variables: puzzling CNO surface abundances

    Saio, Hideyuki; Georgy, Cyril; Meynet, Georges 

Abstract
A massive star can enter the blue supergiant region either by evolving directly from the main sequence, or by evolving from a previous red supergiant stage. The fractions of the blue supergiants with different histories depend on the internal mixing and mass loss during the red supergiant stage. We study the possibility of using diagnostics based on stellar pulsation to discriminate blue supergiants with different evolution histories. For this purpose, we have studied the pulsation property of massive star models calculated with the Geneva stellar evolution code, for initial masses ranging from 8 to 50 M⊙, with a solar metallicity of Z = 0.014. We have found that radial pulsations are excited in the blue supergiant region only in models that had been red supergiants previously. This might provide us with a useful means of diagnosing the history of evolution of each blue supergiant. At a given effective temperature, many more non-radial pulsations are excited in the model after the red supergiant stage than in the model evolving towards the red supergiant. We discuss the properties of radial and non-radial pulsations in blue supergiants, and we compare predicted periods with the period ranges observed in some α Cygni variables in the Galaxy and NGC 300. We have found that blue supergiant models after the red supergiant stage roughly agree with observed period ranges, in most cases. However, we are left with the puzzle that the predicted surface N/C and N/O ratios seem to be too high compared with those of Deneb and Rigel.

2020FrASS...7...70B
2020/10
cited: 75  [31.05.24]
Asteroseismology of high-mass stars: new insights of stellar interiors with space telescopes

    Bowman, Dominic M. 

Abstract
Massive stars are important metal factories in the Universe. They have short and energetic lives, and many of them inevitably explode as a supernova and become a neutron star or black hole. In turn, the formation, evolution and explosive deaths of massive stars impact the surrounding interstellar medium and shape the evolution of their host galaxies. Yet the chemical and dynamical evolution of a massive star, including the chemical yield of the ultimate supernova and the remnant mass of the compact object, strongly depend on the interior physics of the progenitor star. We currently lack empirically calibrated prescriptions for various physical processes at work within massive stars, but this is now being remedied by asteroseismology. The study of stellar structure and evolution using stellar oscillations -- asteroseismology -- has undergone a revolution in the last two decades thanks to high-precision time series photometry from space telescopes. In particular, the long-term light curves provided by the MOST, CoRoT, BRITE, Kepler/K2 and TESS missions provided invaluable data sets in terms of photometric precision, duration and frequency resolution to successfully apply asteroseismology to massive stars and probe their interior physics. The observation and subsequent modelling of stellar pulsations in massive stars has revealed key missing ingredients in stellar structure and evolution models of these stars. Thus asteroseismology has opened a new window into calibrating stellar physics within a highly degenerate part of the Hertzsprung--Russell diagram. In this review, I provide a historical overview of the progress made using ground-based and early space missions, and discuss more recent advances and breakthroughs in our understanding of massive star interiors by means of asteroseismology with modern space telescopes.

2019A&A...621A.135B
2019/01
cited: 72  [31.05.24]
Photometric detection of internal gravity waves in upper main-sequence stars. I. Methodology and application to CoRoT targets

    Bowman, D. M.; Aerts, C.; Johnston, C. and 8 more 

Abstract
Context. Main sequence stars with a convective core are predicted to stochastically excite internal gravity waves (IGWs), which effectively transport angular momentum throughout the stellar interior and explain the observed near-uniform interior rotation rates of intermediate-mass stars. However, there are few detections of IGWs, and fewer still made using photometry, with more detections needed to constrain numerical simulations.
Aims: We aim to formalise the detection and characterisation of IGWs in photometric observations of stars born with convective cores (M ≳ 1.5 M⊙) and parameterise the low-frequency power excess caused by IGWs.
Methods: Using the most recent CoRoT light curves for a sample of O, B, A and F stars, we parameterised the morphology of the flux contribution of IGWs in Fourier space using an MCMC numerical scheme within a Bayesian framework. We compared this to predictions from IGW numerical simulations and investigated how the observed morphology changes as a function of stellar parameters.
Results: We demonstrate that a common morphology for the low-frequency power excess is observed in early-type stars observed by CoRoT. Our study shows that a background frequency-dependent source of astrophysical signal is common, which we interpret as IGWs. We provide constraints on the amplitudes of IGWs and the shape of their detected frequency spectrum across a range of mass, which is the first ensemble study of stochastic variability in such a diverse sample of stars.
Conclusions: The evidence of a low-frequency power excess across a wide mass range supports the interpretation of IGWs in photometry of O, B, A and F stars. We also discuss the prospects of observing hundreds of massive stars with the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) in the near future.


1999MNRAS.303..116G
1999/02
cited: 70 [02.06.24]
The non-linear evolution of strange-mode instabilities

    Glatzel, W.; Kiriakidis, M.; Chernigovskij, S. and 1 more 

Abstract
Numerical simulations of the evolution of strange-mode instabilities into the non-linear regime have been performed for massive objects and Wolf-Rayet stars. Velocity amplitudes above 10^2 km s^-1 can be reached which exceed the escape velocity and imply mass loss for massive objects. Although for Wolf-Rayet stars direct mass loss is not observed, the velocity field established by the instability may be sufficient to initiate a line-driven wind. The results are sensitive to the numerical treatment of the problem. 

2017ApJ...847L...7A
2017/09
cited: 70 [31.05.24]
The Interior Angular Momentum of Core Hydrogen Burning Stars from Gravity-mode Oscillations

    Aerts, C.; Van Reeth, T.; Tkachenko, A. 

Abstract
A major uncertainty in the theory of stellar evolution is the angular momentum distribution inside stars and its change during stellar life. We compose a sample of 67 stars in the core hydrogen burning phase with a {log} g value from high-resolution spectroscopy, as well as an asteroseismic estimate of the near-core rotation rate derived from gravity-mode oscillations detected in space photometry. This assembly includes 8 B-type stars and 59 AF-type stars, covering a mass range from 1.4 to 5 M ⊙, I.e., it concerns intermediate-mass stars born with a well-developed convective core. The sample covers projected surface rotation velocities v\sin I\in [9,242] km s-1 and core rotation rates up to 26 μHz, which corresponds to 50% of the critical rotation frequency. We find deviations from rigid rotation to be moderate in the single stars of this sample. We place the near-core rotation rates in an evolutionary context and find that the core rotation must drop drastically before or during the short phase between the end of the core hydrogen burning and the onset of core helium burning. We compute the spin parameter, which is the ratio of twice the rotation rate to the mode frequency (also known as the inverse Rossby number), for 1682 gravity modes and find the majority (95%) to occur in the sub-inertial regime. The 10 stars with Rossby modes have spin parameters between 14 and 30, while the gravito-inertial modes cover the range from 1 to 15.

2019ApJ...872L...9P
2019/02
cited: 69  [31.05.24]
Diverse Variability of O and B Stars Revealed from 2-minute Cadence Light Curves in Sectors 1 and 2 of the TESS Mission: Selection of an Asteroseismic Sample

    Pedersen, May G.; Chowdhury, Sowgata; Johnston, Cole and 18 more 

Abstract
Uncertainties in stellar structure and evolution theory are largest for stars undergoing core convection on the main sequence. A powerful way to calibrate the free parameters used in the theory of stellar interiors is asteroseismology, which provides direct measurements of angular momentum and element transport. We report the detection and classification of new variable O and B stars using high-precision short-cadence (2 minutes) photometric observations assembled by the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS). In our sample of 154 O and B stars, we detect a high percentage (90%) of variability. Among these we find 23 multiperiodic pulsators, 6 eclipsing binaries, 21 rotational variables, and 25 stars with stochastic low-frequency variability. Several additional variables overlap between these categories. Our study of O and B stars not only demonstrates the high data quality achieved by TESS for optimal studies of the variability of the most massive stars in the universe, but also represents the first step toward the selection and composition of a large sample of O and B pulsators with high potential for joint asteroseismic and spectroscopic modeling of their interior structure with unprecedented precision. 

2001A&A...366..166D
2001/01
cited: 69  [31.05.24]
Nonradial nonadiabatic stellar pulsations: A numerical method and its application to a beta Cephei model

    Dupret, M. A. 

Abstract
A new general method for the computation of nonradial nonadiabatic oscillations of a given stellar model is presented for a linear approximation. A simple and useful modelling of the atmosphere is included, allowing to obtain credible values for the eigenfunctions in the atmosphere. Some of the results obtained for a 10 Msun model are shown as an illustration. Our study opens the way to different applications. Better theoretical line-profile variations could be obtained from our method, allowing a more detailed comparison with observations. More generally, our study is relevant for asteroseismology, giving a way for a better knowledge of stellar interiors.

2017ApJ...848L...1R
2017/10
cited: 68 [03.06.24]
On the Chemical Mixing Induced by Internal Gravity Waves

    Rogers, T. M.; McElwaine, J. N. 

Abstract
Detailed modeling of stellar evolution requires a better understanding of the (magneto)hydrodynamic processes that mix chemical elements and transport angular momentum. Understanding these processes is crucial if we are to accurately interpret observations of chemical abundance anomalies, surface rotation measurements, and asteroseismic data. Here, we use two-dimensional hydrodynamic simulations of the generation and propagation of internal gravity waves in an intermediate-mass star to measure the chemical mixing induced by these waves. We show that such mixing can generally be treated as a diffusive process. We then show that the local diffusion coefficient does not depend on the local fluid velocity, but rather on the wave amplitude. We then use these findings to provide a simple parameterization for this diffusion, which can be incorporated into stellar evolution codes and tested against observations.

2018MNRAS.473.5532R
2018/02
cited: 66
BRITE-Constellation high-precision time-dependent photometry of the early O-type supergiant ζ Puppis unveils the photospheric drivers of its small- and large-scale wind structures

    Ramiaramanantsoa, Tahina; Moffat, Anthony F. J.; Harmon, Robert and 33 more 

Abstract
From 5.5 months of dual-band optical photometric monitoring at the 1 mmag level, BRITE-Constellation has revealed two simultaneous types of variability in the O4I(n)fp star ζ Puppis: one single periodic non-sinusoidal component superimposed on a stochastic component. The monoperiodic component is the 1.78-d signal previously detected by Coriolis/Solar Mass Ejection Imager, but this time along with a prominent first harmonic. The shape of this signal changes over time, a behaviour that is incompatible with stellar oscillations but consistent with rotational modulation arising from evolving bright surface inhomogeneities. By means of a constrained non-linear light-curve inversion algorithm, we mapped the locations of the bright surface spots and traced their evolution. Our simultaneous ground-based multisite spectroscopic monitoring of the star unveiled cyclical modulation of its He II λ4686 wind emission line with the 1.78-d rotation period, showing signatures of corotating interaction regions that turn out to be driven by the bright photospheric spots observed by BRITE. Traces of wind clumps are also observed in the He II λ4686 line and are correlated with the amplitudes of the stochastic component of the light variations probed by BRITE at the photosphere, suggesting that the BRITE observations additionally unveiled the photospheric drivers of wind clumps in ζ Pup and that the clumping phenomenon starts at the very base of the wind. The origins of both the bright surface inhomogeneities and the stochastic light variations remain unknown, but a subsurface convective zone might play an important role in the generation of these two types of photospheric variability.

2015MNRAS.451.1445B
2015/08
cited: 65 [04.06.24]
Analysis of Kepler B stars: rotational modulation and Maia variables

    Balona, L. A.; Baran, A. S.; Daszyńska-Daszkiewicz, J. and 1 more 

Abstract
We examine 4 yr almost continuous Kepler photometry of 115 B stars. We find that the light curves of 39 per cent of these stars can be described by a low-frequency sinusoid and its harmonic, usually with variable amplitude, which we interpret as rotational modulation. A large fraction (32 stars or 28 per cent) might be classified as ellipsoidal variables, but a statistical argument suggests that these are probably rotational variables as well. Ten stars (8 per cent of the total) have a peculiar periodogram feature which is common among A stars. The physical cause of this feature is unknown but very likely related to rotation. The large number of rotating variables suggests that star-spots are common in B stars and indicates that magnetic fields can be generated in radiative stellar envelopes. We find five stars (4 per cent) to be β Cep (BECP) variables, all of which have low frequencies with relatively large amplitudes. The presence of low frequencies in BECP stars is an unsolved problem. There are 21 stars (18 per cent) with multiple low frequencies which could be described as slowly pulsating B (SPB) variables. Other pulsating stars do not fit into the general definition of BECP or SPB variables in that they are cool but pulsate with high frequencies. We assume that these are further examples of the anomalous pulsating stars which in the past have been called `Maia' variables. There are 11 stars (10 per cent) of this type. We also examined 300 B stars observed in the K2 Campaign 0 field. We find 12 BECP/Maia candidates and 15 SPB variables.

2013MNRAS.430.1736S
2013/04
cited: 66  [31.05.24]
The observational signatures of convectively excited gravity modes in main-sequence stars

    Shiode, Joshua H.; Quataert, Eliot; Cantiello, Matteo and 1 more 

Abstract
We predict the flux and surface velocity perturbations produced by convectively excited gravity modes (g-modes) in main-sequence stars. Core convection in massive stars can excite g-modes to sufficient amplitudes to be detectable with high-precision photometry by Kepler and Convection, Rotation and planetary Transits (CoRoT), if the thickness of the convective overshoot region is ≲30 per cent of a pressure scale height. The g-modes manifest as excess photometric variability, with amplitudes of ∼10 μmag at frequencies ≲ 10 μHz (0.8 d-1) near the solar metallicity zero-age main sequence. The flux variations are largest for stars with M ≳ 5 M⊙, but are potentially detectable down to M ∼ 2-3 M⊙. During the main-sequence evolution, radiative damping decreases such that ever lower frequency modes reach the stellar surface and flux perturbations reach up to ∼100 μmag at the terminal-age main sequence. Using the same convective excitation model, we confirm previous predictions that solar g-modes produce surface velocity perturbations of ≲0.3 mm s-1. This implies that stochastically excited g-modes are more easily detectable in the photometry of massive main-sequence stars than in the Sun.

1989ApJ...339..365W
1989/04
cited: 63  [31.05.24]
The Progenitor of SN 1987A: Uncertain Evolution of a 20 M Star

    Weiss, Achim 

Abstract
The evolution of a 20 M_sun_ star with a metallicity appropriate for the Large Magellanic Cloud (Z = 0.005 for most calculations) is investigated in order to determine under which assumptions the star will finally resemble the progenitor star of SN 1987A (Sk -69^deg^202), i.e., having an effective temperature of ~ 15,000 K. Low metallicities and restricted mixing in the semiconvective layers are favoring a final evolution as a blue supergiant, while (moderate) mass loss and high carbon abundances after helium burning are doing the opposite. Combining low metallicity, restricted semiconvective mixing, and moderate mass loss results in a blue progenitor. The uncertainties of the results due to the sensitive dependence of the evolution on the assumptions are stressed. The results are also compared with previous, independent calculations. The connection with observed red-to-blue ratios is also shortly discussed.

2020A&A...638A..55K
2020/06
cited: 61  [31.05.24]
Massive donors in interacting binaries: effect of metallicity

    Klencki, Jakub; Nelemans, Gijs; Istrate, Alina G. and 1 more 

Abstract
Metallicity is known to significantly affect the radial expansion of a massive star: the lower the metallicity, the more compact the star, especially during its post-main sequence evolution. Our goal is to study this effect in the context of binary evolution. Using the stellar-evolution code MESA, we computed evolutionary tracks of massive stars at six different metallicities between 1.0 Z⊙ and 0.01 Z⊙. We explored variations of factors known to affect the radial expansion of massive stars (e.g., semiconvection, overshooting, or rotation). Using observational constraints, we find support for an evolution in which already at a metallicity Z ≈ 0.2 Z⊙ massive stars remain relatively compact (∼100 R⊙) during the Hertzprung-gap (HG) phase and most of their expansion occurs during core-helium burning (CHeB). Consequently, we show that metallicity has a strong influence on the type of mass transfer evolution in binary systems. At solar metallicity, a case-B mass transfer is initiated shortly after the end of the main sequence, and a giant donor is almost always a rapidly expanding HG star. However, at lower metallicity, the parameter space for mass transfer from a more evolved, slowly expanding CHeB star increases dramatically. This means that envelope stripping and formation of helium stars in low-metallicity environments occurs later in the evolution of the donor, implying a shorter duration of the Wolf-Rayet phase (even by an order of magnitude) and higher final core masses. This metallicity effect is independent of the effect of metallicity-dependent stellar winds. At metallicities Z ≤ 0.04 Z⊙, a significant fraction of massive stars in binaries with periods longer than 100 days engages in the first episode of mass transfer very late into their evolution, when they already have a well-developed CO core. The remaining lifetime (≲104 yr) is unlikely to be long enough to strip the entire H-rich envelope. Cases of unstable mass transfer leading to a merger would produce CO cores that spin fast at the moment of collapse. We find that the parameter space for mass transfer from massive donors (> 40 M⊙) with outer convective envelopes is extremely small or even nonexistent. We briefly discuss this finding in the context of the formation of binary black hole mergers.  

207
2016A&A...588A..55P
2016/04
cited: 58 [05.06.24]
Massive pulsating stars observed by BRITE-Constellation. I. The triple system β Centauri (Agena)

    Pigulski, A.; Cugier, H.; Popowicz, A. and 16 more 

Abstract
Context. Asteroseismology of massive pulsating stars of β Cep and SPB types can help us to uncover the internal structure of massive stars and understand certain physical phenomena that are taking place in their interiors. We study β Centauri (Agena), a triple system with two massive fast-rotating early B-type components which show p- and g-mode pulsations; the system's secondary is also known to have a measurable magnetic field.
Aims: This paper aims to precisely determine the masses and detect pulsation modes in the two massive components of β Cen with BRITE-Constellation photometry. In addition, seismic models for the components are considered and the effects of fast rotation are discussed. This is done to test the limitations of seismic modeling for this very difficult case.
Methods: A simultaneous fit of visual and spectroscopic orbits is used to self-consistently derive the orbital parameters, and subsequently the masses, of the components. Time-series analysis of BRITE-Constellation data is used to detect pulsation modes and derive their frequencies, amplitudes, phases, and rates of frequency change. Theoretically-predicted frequencies are calculated for the appropriate evolutionary models and their stability is checked. The effects of rotational splitting and coupling are also presented.
Results: The derived masses of the two massive components are equal to 12.02 ± 0.13 and 10.58 ± 0.18 M⊙. The parameters of the wider, A-B system, presently approaching periastron passage, are constrained. Analysis of the combined blue- and red-filter BRITE-Constellation photometric data of the system revealed the presence of 19 periodic terms, of which eight are likely g modes, nine are p modes, and the remaining two are combination terms. It cannot be excluded that one or two low-frequency terms are rotational frequencies. It is possible that both components of β Cen are β Cep/SPB hybrids. An attempt to use the apparent changes of frequency to distinguish which modes originate in which component did not succeed, but there is potential for using this method when more BRITE data become available.
Conclusions: Agena seems to be one of very few rapidly rotating massive objects with rich p- and g-mode spectra, and precisely known masses. It can therefore be used to gain a better understanding of the excitation of pulsations in relatively rapidly rotating stars and their seismic modeling. Lacking proper mode identification, the pulsation frequencies found in β Cen cannot yet be used to constrain the internal structure of the components, but it may be possible to achieve this in the future with the use of spectroscopy and spectropolarimetry. In particular, these kinds of data can be used for mode identification since they provide new radial velocities. In consequence, they may help to improve the orbital solution, derive more precise masses, magnetic field strength and geometry, inclination angles, and reveal rotation periods. They may also help to assign pulsation frequencies to components. Finally, the case studied here illustrates the potential of BRITE-Constellation data for the detection of rich-frequency spectra of small-amplitude modes in massive pulsating stars. 

2021A&ARv..29....4S
2021/12
cited: 58 [31.05.24]
Weighing stars from birth to death: mass determination methods across the HRD

    Serenelli, Aldo; Weiss, Achim; Aerts, Conny and 31 more 

Abstract
The mass of a star is the most fundamental parameter for its structure, evolution, and final fate. It is particularly important for any kind of stellar archaeology and characterization of exoplanets. There exist a variety of methods in astronomy to estimate or determine it. In this review we present a significant number of such methods, beginning with the most direct and model-independent approach using detached eclipsing binaries. We then move to more indirect and model-dependent methods, such as the quite commonly used isochrone or stellar track fitting. The arrival of quantitative asteroseismology has opened a completely new approach to determine stellar masses and to complement and improve the accuracy of other methods. We include methods for different evolutionary stages, from the pre-main sequence to evolved (super)giants and final remnants. For all methods uncertainties and restrictions will be discussed. We provide lists of altogether more than 200 benchmark stars with relative mass accuracies between [0.3 ,2 ]% for the covered mass range of M ∈[0.1 ,16 ] M⊙ , 75 % of which are stars burning hydrogen in their core and the other 25 % covering all other evolved stages. We close with a recommendation how to combine various methods to arrive at a "mass-ladder" for stars.

2006ApJ...642..470A
2006/05
cited: 53 [04.06.24]
δ Ceti Is Not Monoperiodic: Seismic Modeling of a β Cephei Star from MOST Space-based Photometry

    Aerts, C.; Marchenko, S. V.; Matthews, J. M. and 7 more 

Abstract
The β Cephei star δ Ceti was considered one of the few monoperiodic variables in its class. Despite (or perhaps because of) its apparently simple oscillation spectrum, it has been challenging and controversial to identify this star's pulsation mode and constrain its physical parameters seismically. Broadband time-resolved photometry of δ Ceti spanning 18.7 days with a duty cycle of about 65% obtained by the Microvariability and Oscillations of Stars (MOST) satellite-the first scientific observations ever obtained by MOST-reveals that the star is actually multiperiodic. Besides the well-known dominant frequency of f1=6.205886 day-1, we have discovered in the MOST data its first harmonic 2f1 and three other frequencies (f2=3.737, f3=3.673, and f4=0.318 day-1), all detected with a signal-to-noise ratio (S/N)>4. In retrospect, f2 was also present in archival spectral line-profile data but at lower S/N. We present seismic models whose modes match exactly the frequencies f1 and f2. Only one model falls within the common part of the error boxes of the star's observed surface gravity and effective temperature from photometry and spectroscopy. In this model, f1 is the radial (l=0) first overtone, and f2 is the g2 (l=2, m=0) mode. This model has a mass of 10.2+/-0.2 Msolar and an age of 17.9+/-0.3 Myr, making δ Ceti an evolved β Cephei star. If f2 and f3 are rotationally split components of the same g2 mode, then the star's equatorial rotation velocity is either 27.6 km s-1 or half this value. Given its vsini of about 1 km s-1, this implies that we are seeing δ Ceti nearly pole-on. 

2019MNRAS.487..782L
2019/07
cited: 51 [03.06.24]
Period spacings of γ Doradus pulsators in the Kepler field: Rossby and gravity modes in 82 stars

    Li, Gang; Van Reeth, Timothy; Bedding, Timothy R. and 2 more 

Abstract
Rossby modes are the oscillations in a rotating fluid, whose restoring force is the Coriolis force. They provide an additional diagnostic to understand the rotation of stars, which complicates asteroseismic modelling. We report 82 γ Doradus stars for which clear period spacing patterns of both gravity and Rossby modes have been detected. The period spacings of both show a quasi-linear relation with the pulsation period, but the slope is negative for the gravity modes and positive for the Rossby modes. Most Rossby modes have k = -2, m = -1. For only one star, a series of k = -1, m = -1 modes is seen. For each pattern, the mean pulsation period, the mean period spacing, and the slope are measured. We find that the slope correlates with the mean period for Rossby mode patterns. The traditional approximation of rotation is used to measure the near-core rotation rate, assuming the star rotates rigidly. We report the near-core rotation rates, the asymptotic period spacings, and the radial orders of excited modes of these 82 main-sequence stars. The near-core rotation rates lie between 0.6 and 2.3 d^{-1}. Six stars show surface rotation modulations, among which only KIC 3341457 shows differential rotation, whilst the other five stars have uniform rotations. The radial orders of excited modes show different distributions for the dipole and quadrupole gravity modes versus the Rossby modes. 

2009A&A...507.1141L
2009/11
cited: 50 [31.05.24]
A systematic study of variability among OB-stars based on HIPPARCOS photometry

    Lefèvre, L.; Marchenko, S. V.; Moffat, A. F. J. and 1 more 

Abstract
Context: Variability is a key factor for understanding the nature of the most massive stars, the OB stars. Such stars lie closest to the unstable upper limit of star formation.
Aims: In terms of statistics, the data from the HIPPARCOS satellite are unique because of time coverage and uniformity. They are ideal to study variability in this large, uniform sample of OB stars.
Methods: We used statistical techniques to determine an independant threshold of variability corresponding to our sample of OB stars, and then applied an automatic algorithm to search for periods in the data of stars that are located above this threshold. We separated the sample stars into 4 main categories of variability: 3 intrinsic and 1 extrinsic. The intrinsic categories are: OB main sequence stars (~2/3 of the sample), OBe stars (~10%) and OB Supergiant stars (~1/4).The extrinsic category refers to eclipsing binaries.
Results: We classified about 30% of the whole sample as variable, although the fraction depends on magnitude level due to instrumental limitations. OBe stars tend to be much more variable (≈80%) than the average sample star, while OBMS stars are below average and OBSG stars are average. Types of variables include α Cyg, β Cep, slowly pulsating stars and other types from the general catalog of variable stars. As for eclipsing binaries, there are relatively more contact than detached systems among the OBMS and OBe stars, and about equal numbers among OBSG stars. 

2010A&A...513L..11A
2010/04
cited: 47  [31.05.24]
Periodic mass-loss episodes due to an oscillation mode with variable amplitude in the hot supergiant HD 50064

    Aerts, C.; Lefever, K.; Baglin, A. and 15 more 

Abstract

Aims: We aim to interpret the photometric and spectroscopic variability of the luminous blue variable supergiant HD 50064 (V = 8.21).
Methods: CoRoT space photometry and follow-up high-resolution spectroscopy with a time base of 137 d and 169 d, respectively, was gathered, analysed, and interpreted using standard time series analysis and light curve modelling methods, as well as spectral line diagnostics.
Results: The space photometry reveals one period of 37 d, which undergoes a sudden amplitude change with a factor 1.6. The pulsation period is confirmed in the spectroscopy, which additionally reveals metal line radial velocity values differing by 30 km s-1 depending on the spectral line and on the epoch. We estimate Teff 13 500 K, log g 1.5 from the equivalent width of Si lines. The Balmer lines reveal that the star undergoes episodes of changing mass loss on a time scale similar to the changes in the photometric and spectroscopic variability, with an average value of log dot{M} ≃ -5 (in M_⊙ yr-1). We tentatively interpret the 37 d period as the result of a strange mode oscillation. 

2020MNRAS.497L..19S
2020/09
cited: 46 [31.05.24]
Discovery of β Cep pulsations in the eclipsing binary V453 Cygni

    Southworth, John; Bowman, D. M.; Tkachenko, A. and 1 more 

Abstract
V453 Cyg is an eclipsing binary containing 14 and 11 M⊙
stars in an eccentric short-period orbit. We have discovered β Cep-type pulsations in this system using Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite data. We identify seven significant pulsation frequencies, between 2.37 and 10.51 d-1, in the primary star. These include six frequencies that are separated by yet significantly offset from harmonics of the orbital frequency, indicating they are tidally perturbed modes. We have determined the physical properties of the system to high precision: V453 Cyg A is the first β Cep pulsator with a precise mass measurement. The system is a vital tracer of the physical processes that govern the evolution of massive single and binary stars.

2015A&A...581A..75K
2015/09
cited: 45 [31.05.24]
Interplay between pulsations and mass loss in the blue supergiant 55 Cygnus = HD 198 478

    Kraus, M.; Haucke, M.; Cidale, L. S. and 14 more 

Abstract
Context. Blue supergiant stars are known to display photometric and spectroscopic variability that is suggested to be linked to stellar pulsations. Pulsational activity in massive stars strongly depends on the star's evolutionary stage and is assumed to be connected with mass-loss episodes, the appearance of macroturbulent line broadening, and the formation of clumps in the wind.
Aims: To investigate a possible interplay between pulsations and mass-loss, we carried out an observational campaign of the supergiant 55 Cyg over a period of five years to search for photospheric activity and cyclic mass-loss variability in the stellar wind.
Methods: We modeled the H, He i, Si ii, and Si iii lines using the nonlocal thermal equilibrium atmosphere code FASTWIND and derived the photospheric and wind parameters. In addition, we searched for variability in the intensity and radial velocity of photospheric lines and performed a moment analysis of the line profiles to derive frequencies and amplitudes of the variations.
Results: The Hα line varies with time in both intensity and shape, displaying various types of profiles: P Cygni, pure emission, almost complete absence, and double or multiple peaked. The star undergoes episodes of variable mass-loss rates that change by a factor of 1.7-2 on different timescales. We also observe changes in the ionization rate of Si ii and determine a multiperiodic oscillation in the He i absorption lines, with periods ranging from a few hours to 22.5 days.
Conclusions: We interpret the photospheric line variations in terms of oscillations in p-, g-, and strange modes. We suggest that these pulsations can lead to phases of enhanced mass loss. Furthermore, they can mislead the determination of the stellar rotation. We classify the star as a post-red supergiant, belonging to the group of α Cyg variables. 

2009ApJ...698L..56H
2009/06
cited: 45 [03.06.24]
Asteroseismology of Hybrid Pulsators Made Possible: Simultaneous MOST Space Photometry and Ground-Based Spectroscopy of γ Peg

    Handler, G.; Matthews, J. M.; Eaton, J. A. and 26 more 

Abstract
We have acquired simultaneous high-precision space photometry and radial velocities of the bright hybrid β Cep/Slowly Pulsating B pulsator γ Peg. Frequency analyses reveal the presence of six gravity (g) modes of high radial order together with eight low-order β Cep oscillations in both data sets. Mode identification shows that all pulsations have spherical degrees ell = 0-2. An 8.5 M sun model reproduces the observed pulsation frequencies; all theoretically predicted modes in the β Cep domain are detected. We suggest, contrary to previous authors, that γ Peg is a single star; the claimed orbital variations are due to g-mode pulsation. γ Peg is the first hybrid pulsator for which a sufficiently large number of high-order g modes and low-order pressure (p) and mixed modes have been detected and identified to be usable for in-depth seismic modeling. 

2014MNRAS.439L...6G
2014/03
cited: 45 [17.07.24]
The puzzle of the CNO abundances of α Cygni variables resolved by the Ledoux criterion.

    Georgy, C.; Saio, H.; Meynet, G. 

Abstract
Recent stellar evolution computations show that the blue supergiant (BSG) stars could come from two distinct populations: a first group arising from massive stars that just left the main sequence and are crossing the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram (HRD) towards the red supergiant (RSG) branch, and a second group coming from stars that have lost considerable amount of mass during the RSG stage and are crossing the HRD for a second time towards the blue region. Due to very different luminosity-to-mass ratio, only stars from the second group are expected to have excited pulsations observable at the surface. In a previous work, we have shown that our models were able to reproduce the pulsational properties of BSGs. However, these models failed to reproduce the surface chemical composition of stars evolving back from an RSG phase. In this Letter, we show how the use of the Ledoux criterion instead of the Schwarzschild one for convection allows us to significantly improve the agreement with the observed chemical composition, while keeping the agreement with the pulsation periods. This gives some support to the Ledoux criterion.

2006A&A...447..325K
2006/02
cited: 44 [31.05.24]
Multi-periodic photospheric pulsations and connected wind structures in HD 64760

    Kaufer, A.; Stahl, O.; Prinja, R. K. and 1 more 

Abstract
We report on the results of an extended optical spectroscopic monitoring campaign on the early-type B supergiant HD 64760 (B0.5 Ib) designed to probe the deep-seated origin of spatial wind structure in massive stars. This new study is based on high-resolution echelle spectra obtained with the Feros instrument at ESO La Silla. 279 spectra were collected over 10 nights between February 14 and 24, 2003. From the period analysis of the line-profile variability of the photospheric lines we identify three closely spaced periods around 4.810 h and a splitting of ±3%. The velocity - phase diagrams of the line-profile variations for the distinct periods reveal characteristic prograde non-radial pulsation patterns of high order corresponding to pulsation modes with l and m in the range 6{-}10. A detailed modeling of the multi-periodic non-radial pulsations with the Bruce and Kylie pulsation-model codes (Townsend 1997b, MNRAS, 284, 839) favors either three modes with l=-m and l=8,6,8 or m=-6 and l=8,6,10 with the second case maintaining the closely spaced periods in the co-rotating frame. The pulsation models predict photometric variations of 0.012{-}0.020 mag consistent with the non-detection of any of the spectroscopic periods by photometry. The three pulsation modes have periods clearly shorter than the characteristic pulsation time scale and show small horizontal velocity fields and hence are identified as p-modes. The beating of the three pulsation modes leads to a retrograde beat pattern with two regions of constructive interference diametrically opposite on the stellar surface and a beat period of 162.8 h (6.8 days). This beat pattern is directly observed in the spectroscopic time series of the photospheric lines. The wind-sensitive lines display features of enhanced emission, which appear to follow the maxima of the photospheric beat pattern. The pulsation models predict for the two regions normalized flux amplitudes of A=+0.33,-0.28, sufficiently large to raise spiral co-rotating interaction regions (Cranmer & Owocki 1996, ApJ, 462, 469). We further investigate the observed Hα wind-profile variations with a simple rotating wind model with wind-density modulations to simulate the effect of possible streak lines originating from the localized surface spots created by the NRP beat pattern. It is found that such a simple scenario can explain the time scales and some but not all characteristics of the observed Hα line-profile variations. 

2009MNRAS.396.1833G
2009/07
cited: 45  [31.05.24]
Can mass loss and overshooting prevent the excitation of g-modes in blue supergiants?

    Godart, M.; Noels, A.; Dupret, M. -A. and 1 more 

Abstract
Thanks to their past history on the main-sequence phase, supergiant massive stars develop a convective shell around the helium core. This intermediate convective zone (ICZ) plays an essential role in governing which g-modes are excited. Indeed, a strong radiative damping occurs in the high-density radiative core but the ICZ acts as a barrier preventing the propagation of some g-modes into the core. These g-modes can thus be excited in supergiant stars by the κ-mechanism in the superficial layers due to the opacity bump of iron, at logT = 5.2. However, massive stars are submitted to various complex phenomena such as rotation, magnetic fields, semiconvection, mass loss, overshooting. Each of these phenomena exerts a significant effect on the evolution and some of them could prevent the onset of the convective zone. We develop a numerical method which allows us to select the reflected, thus the potentially excited, modes only. We study different cases in order to show that mass loss and overshooting, in a large enough amount, reduce the extent of the ICZ and are unfavourable to the excitation of g-modes.  

2020MNRAS.496.1967K
2020/08
cited: 44  [31.05.24]
Relative importance of convective uncertainties in massive stars

    Kaiser, Etienne A.; Hirschi, Raphael; Arnett, W. David and 3 more 

Abstract
In this work, we investigate the impact of uncertainties due to convective boundary mixing (CBM), commonly called 'overshoot', namely the boundary location and the amount of mixing at the convective boundary, on stellar structure and evolution. For this we calculated two grids of stellar evolution models with the MESA code, each with the Ledoux and the Schwarzschild boundary criterion, and vary the amount of CBM. We calculate each grid with the initial masses of 15, 20, and 25M⊙
. We present the stellar structure of the models during the hydrogen and helium burning phases. In the latter, we examine the impact on the nucleosynthesis. We find a broadening of the main sequence with more CBM, which is more in agreement with observations. Furthermore, during the core hydrogen burning phase there is a convergence of the convective boundary location due to CBM. The uncertainties of the intermediate convective zone remove this convergence. The behaviour of this convective zone strongly affects the surface evolution of the model, I.e. how fast it evolves redwards. The amount of CBM impacts the size of the convective cores and the nucleosynthesis, e.g. the 12C to 16O ratio and the weak s-process. Lastly, we determine the uncertainty that the range of parameter values investigated introduces and we find differences of up to 70 per cent for the core masses and the total mass of the star. 

1968ApJ...152..233S
1968/04
cited: 43  [31.05.24]
On the Pulsational Stability of Blue Supergiants

    Stothers, Richard; Simon, Norman R. 

Abstract
The brightest blue supergiants represent the most massive evolved stars known. They are believed to be in the core helium-burning phase of evolution. To discuss the question of their stability, model in- teriors of core helium-burning stars with hydrogen-burning shells have been constructed and tested for pulsational instability (15-1000 Mo). All models are found to be extremely stable against nuclear- energized pulsations despite the high radiation pressure. Consequently, any star with mass less than the critically stable mass on the main sequence should evolve into the blue-supergiant region without dis- ruption. By combining the theoretical calculations with the available observational data for the Large Magellanic Cloud, a self-consistent set of parameters may be obtained for the Large Cloud as fo]lows: (1) the coincidence of the mass of the most luminous supergiants with the critical mass on the main sequence, (2) the occurrence of this mass at about 60 Mo, (3) a hydrogen abundance of X = 0 75 in the young Cloud population, and (4) a distance modulus of (rn - M)0 = 18.7. We further verify theo- retically the remarkable observed constancy of brightness of the most luminous B supergiants and their stability against disruption or large amounis of mass loss; any other kind of variability is likely to be due to atmospheric phenomena or to binary motion. The mass of the brightest Cepheids in the Magellanic Clouds is about 15 Mo. In our Galaxy, the most luminous supergiants known have inferred masses which do not significantly exceed the critical mass, nor is there any certain evidence for supermassiveness among the observed 0 stars.

2019ApJ...886L..15L
2019/11
cited: 43 [31.05.24]
Low-frequency Variability in Massive Stars: Core Generation or Surface Phenomenon?

    Lecoanet, Daniel; Cantiello, Matteo; Quataert, Eliot and 6 more 

Abstract
Bowman et al. reported low-frequency photometric variability in 164 O- and B-type stars observed with K2 and TESS. They interpret these motions as internal gravity waves, which could be excited stochastically by convection in the cores of these stars. The detection of internal gravity waves in massive stars would help distinguish between massive stars with convective or radiative cores, determine core size, and would provide important constraints on massive star structure and evolution. In this work, we study the observational signature of internal gravity waves generated by core convection. We calculate the wave transfer function, which links the internal gravity wave amplitude at the base of the radiative zone to the surface luminosity variation. This transfer function varies by many orders of magnitude for frequencies ≲1 days-1, and has regularly spaced peaks near 1 days-1 due to standing modes. This is inconsistent with the observed spectra that have smooth “red noise” profiles, without the predicted regularly spaced peaks. The wave transfer function is only meaningful if the waves stay predominately linear. We next show that this is the case: low-frequency traveling waves do not break unless their luminosity exceeds the radiative luminosity of the star; the observed luminosity fluctuations at high frequencies are so small that standing modes would be stable to nonlinear instability. These simple calculations suggest that the observed low-frequency photometric variability in massive stars is not due to internal gravity waves generated in the core of these stars. We finish with a discussion of (sub)surface convection that produces low-frequency variability in low-mass stars; this is very similar to that observed in Bowman et al. in higher-mass stars.

2021MNRAS.503.5894S
2021/06
cited: 39  [31.05.24]
Variability of newly identified B-type stars observed by Kepler

    Szewczuk, Wojciech; Walczak, Przemysław; Daszyńska-Daszkiewicz, Jadwiga 

Abstract
Recent re-determination of stellar atmospheric parameters for a sample of stars observed during the Kepler mission allowed to enlarge the number of Kepler B-type stars. We present the detailed frequency analysis for all these objects. All stars exhibit pulsational variability with maximum amplitudes at frequencies corresponding to high-order g modes. Peaks that could be identified with low-order p/g modes are also extracted for a few stars. We identified some patters in the oscillation spectra that can be associated with the period spacings that can results from the asymptotic nature of the detected pulsational modes. We also tentatively confront the observed oscillation characteristics with predictions from linear non-adiabatic computations of stellar pulsations. For high-order g modes the traditional approximation was employed to include the effects of rotation on the frequency values and mode instability.

2018MNRAS.476.1234A
2018/05
cited: 38  [31.05.24]
K2 photometry and HERMES spectroscopy of the blue supergiant ρ Leo: rotational wind modulation and low-frequency waves

    Aerts, C.; Bowman, D. M.; Símon-Díaz, S. and 10 more 

Abstract
We present an 80-d long uninterrupted high-cadence K2 light curve of the B1Iab supergiant ρ Leo (HD 91316), deduced with the method of halo photometry. This light curve reveals a dominant frequency of frot = 0.0373 d-1 and its harmonics. This dominant frequency corresponds with a rotation period of 26.8 d and is subject to amplitude and phase modulation. The K2 photometry additionally reveals multiperiodic low-frequency variability (<1.5 d-1) and is in full agreement with low-cadence high-resolution spectroscopy assembled during 1800 d. The spectroscopy reveals rotational modulation by a dynamic aspherical wind with an amplitude of about 20 km s-1 in the H α line, as well as photospheric velocity variations of a few km s-1 at frequencies in the range 0.2-0.6 d-1 in the Si III 4567 Å line. Given the large macroturbulence needed to explain the spectral line broadening of the star, we interpret the detected photospheric velocity as due to travelling superinertial low-degree large-scale gravity waves with dominant tangential amplitudes and discuss why ρ Leo is an excellent target to study how the observed photospheric variability propagates into the wind. 

2012AN....333.1053P
2012/12
cited: 37 [31.05.24]
The puzzle of combination frequencies found in heat-driven pulsators

    Pápics, P. I. 

Abstract
Searching for combinations in the frequency spectra of variable stars is a commonly used method within the asteroseismological community, as harmonics and linear combinations of individual frequencies are expected to appear not only by chance, but also as a characteristic signature linked to different physical phenomena, e.g., nonlinear oscillations, binarity, and rotation. Furthermore it is very important to identify independent frequencies for modelling purposes. We show that using high precision data sets delivered by recent space missions, the distinction between combinations having a real physical meaning and spurious combinations which only appear by chance gets more and more difficult. We demonstrate how careful one should be with the interpretation of such combination frequencies by presenting the statistical distributions derived from artificial data sets. Based on comparisons to observations, we find that, despite the high statistical probability of finding combinations in random data sets (having similar properties to the ones of real stars), there is a significant difference in the number of the lowest order combinations between stars with and starts without real combination frequencies. This way, a search for frequency combinations is very useful when interpreted properly, and when results are compared to simulations. 

1989A&AS...79..263V
1989/08
cited: 36 [02.06.24]
Light variations of massive stars (alpha Cygni variables). IX.

    van Genderen, A. M.; Bovenschen, H.; Engelsman, E. C. and 10 more 

Abstract
High-precision VBLUW photometry of 22 highly luminous OBA-type stars, 13 of which are Alpha Cygni variables and two of which are variable only in color, is presented. It is suggested that sigma (V-B) increases faster than sigma (B-L) with later spectral types due to the absence of stochastic metal line strength variations in the V band. It is assumed that short-time-scale stellar spot activity is present, or that temperature and density waves move through the atmospheres with the same time scales, producing these line strength variations independent of the continuum variations. The possibility of differentiating stars which lie close to each other in the HR diagram but have different evolutionary histories (and thus different metal abundances) with the aid of the maximum light amplitude/sigma (V-B) diagram is considered.

2021ApJ...915..112C
2021/07
cited: 37  [31.05.24]
On the Origin of Stochastic, Low-Frequency Photometric Variability in Massive Stars

    Cantiello, Matteo; Lecoanet, Daniel; Jermyn, Adam S. and 1 more 

Abstract
High-precision photometric observations have revealed ubiquitous stochastic low-frequency photometric variability in early-type stars. It has been suggested that this variability arises due to either subsurface convection or internal gravity waves launched by the convective core. Here we show that relevant properties of convection in subsurface convective layers correlate very well with the timescale and amplitude of stochastic low-frequency photometric variability, as well as with the amplitude of macroturbulence. We suggest that low-frequency, stochastic photometric variability and surface turbulence in massive stars are caused by the presence of subsurface convection. We show that an explanation for the observed surface photometric variability and macroturbulence relying on convective core driven internal gravity waves encounters a number of difficulties and seems unlikely to be able to explain the observed trends.

2017A&A...602A..32A
2017/06
cited: 37  [31.05.24]
Kepler sheds new and unprecedented light on the variability of a blue supergiant: Gravity waves in the O9.5Iab star HD 188209

    Aerts, C.; Símon-Díaz, S.; Bloemen, S. and 12 more 

Abstract
Stellar evolution models are most uncertain for evolved massive stars. Asteroseismology based on high-precision uninterrupted space photometry has become a new way to test the outcome of stellar evolution theory and was recently applied to a multitude of stars, but not yet to massive evolved supergiants.Our aim is to detect, analyse and interpret the photospheric and wind variability of the O9.5 Iab star HD 188209 from Kepler space photometry and long-term high-resolution spectroscopy. We used Kepler scattered-light photometry obtained by the nominal mission during 1460 d to deduce the photometric variability of this O-type supergiant. In addition, we assembled and analysed high-resolution high signal-to-noise spectroscopy taken with four spectrographs during some 1800 d to interpret the temporal spectroscopic variability of the star. The variability of this blue supergiant derived from the scattered-light space photometry is in full in agreement with the one found in the ground-based spectroscopy. We find significant low-frequency variability that is consistently detected in all spectral lines of HD 188209. The photospheric variability propagates into the wind, where it has similar frequencies but slightly higher amplitudes. The morphology of the frequency spectra derived from the long-term photometry and spectroscopy points towards a spectrum of travelling waves with frequency values in the range expected for an evolved O-type star. Convectively-driven internal gravity waves excited in the stellar interior offer the most plausible explanation of the detected variability.

2018A&A...614A..91H
2018/06
cited: 36 [31.05.24]
Wind properties of variable B supergiants. Evidence of pulsations connected with mass-loss episodes

    Haucke, M.; Cidale, L. S.; Venero, R. O. J. and 4 more 

Abstract
Context. Variable B supergiants (BSGs) constitute a heterogeneous group of stars with complex photometric and spectroscopic behaviours. They exhibit mass-loss variations and experience different types of oscillation modes, and there is growing evidence that variable stellar winds and photospheric pulsations are closely related.
Aims: To discuss the wind properties and variability of evolved B-type stars, we derive new stellar and wind parameters for a sample of 19 Galactic BSGs by fitting theoretical line profiles of H, He, and Si to the observed ones and compare them with previous determinations.
Methods: The synthetic line profiles are computed with the non-local thermodynamic equilibrium (NLTE) atmosphere code FASTWIND, with a β-law for hydrodynamics.
Results: The mass-loss rate of three stars has been obtained for the first time. The global properties of stellar winds of mid/late B supergiants are well represented by a β-law with β > 2. All stars follow the known empirical wind momentum-luminosity relationships, and the late BSGs show the trend of the mid BSGs. HD 75149 and HD 99953 display significant changes in the shape and intensity of the Hα line (from a pure absorption to a P Cygni profile, and vice versa). These stars have mass-loss variations of almost a factor of 2.8. A comparison among mass-loss rates from the literature reveals discrepancies of a factor of 1 to 7. This large variation is a consequence of the uncertainties in the determination of the stellar radius. Therefore, for a reliable comparison of these values we used the invariant parameter Qr. Based on this parameter, we find an empirical relationship that associates the amplitude of mass-loss variations with photometric/spectroscopic variability on timescales of tens of days. We find that stars located on the cool side of the bi-stability jump show a decrease in the ratio V∞/Vesc, while their corresponding mass-loss rates are similar to or lower than the values found for stars on the hot side. Particularly, for those variable stars a decrease in V∞/Vesc is accompanied by a decrease in Ṁ.
Conclusions: Our results also suggest that radial pulsation modes with periods longer than 6 days might be responsible for the wind variability in the mid/late-type. These radial modes might be identified with strange modes, which are known to facilitate (enhanced) mass loss. On the other hand, we propose that the wind behaviour of stars on the cool side of the bi-stability jump could fit with predictions of the δ-slow hydrodynamics solution for radiation-driven winds with highly variable ionization. 


2020MNRAS.493.5871B
2020/04
cited: 35 [31.05.24]
Pulsation among TESS A and B stars and the Maia variables

    Balona, L. A.; Ozuyar, D. 

Abstract
Classification of over 50 000 TESS stars in sectors 1-18 has resulted in the detection of 766 pulsating main-sequence B stars as well as over 5000 δ Scuti, 2300 γ Doradus, and 114 roAp candidates. Whereas it has been assumed that high-frequency pulsations among B-type main-sequence stars are confined to the early B-type β Cephei stars, the observations indicate that high frequencies are to be found over the whole B-star range, eventually merging with δ Scuti stars. The cool B stars pulsating in high frequencies are called Maia variables. It is shown that Maia variables are not rapidly rotating and thus cannot be β Cephei pulsators that appear to have lower temperatures due to gravity darkening. In the region where β Cephei variables are found, the proportion of pulsating stars is larger and amplitudes are higher and a considerable fraction pulsate in a single mode and low rotation rate. There is no distinct region of slowly pulsating B stars (SPB stars). Stars pulsating solely in low frequencies are found among all B stars. At most, only one-third of B stars appear to pulsate. These results, as well as the fact that a large fraction of A and B stars show rotational modulation, indicate a need for a revision of current ideas regarding stars with radiative envelopes. 

2020A&A...636A.100P
2020/04
cited: 35 [31.05.24]
Period spacings of gravity modes in rapidly rotating magnetic stars. II. The case of an oblique dipolar fossil magnetic field

    Prat, V.; Mathis, S.; Neiner, C. and 3 more 

Abstract
Context. Stellar internal magnetic fields have recently been shown to leave a detectable signature on period spacing patterns of gravity modes.
Aims: We aim to investigate the effect of the obliquity of a mixed (poloidal and toroidal) dipolar internal fossil magnetic field with respect to the rotation axis on the frequency of gravity modes in rapidly rotating stars.
Methods: We used the traditional approximation of rotation to compute non-magnetic modes, and a perturbative treatment of the magnetic field to compute the corresponding frequency shifts. We applied the new formalism to HD 43317, a magnetic, rapidly rotating, slowly pulsating B-type star, whose field has an obliquity angle of about 80°.
Results: We find that frequency shifts induced by the magnetic field on high-radial-order gravity modes are larger with increasing obliquity angle, when the magnetic axis is closer to the equatorial region, where these modes are trapped. The maximum value is reached for an obliquity angle of 90°. This trend is observed for all mode geometries.
Conclusions: Our results predict that the signature of an internal oblique dipolar magnetic field is detectable using asteroseismology of gravity modes.

2012A&A...542A..88D
2012/06
cited: 35 [04.06.24]
The CoRoT B-type binary HD 50230: a prototypical hybrid pulsator with g-mode period and p-mode frequency spacings⋆

    Degroote, P.; Aerts, C.; Michel, E. and 14 more 

Abstract
Context. B-type stars are promising targets for asteroseismic modelling, since their frequency spectrum is relatively simple.
Aims: We deduce and summarise observational constraints for the hybrid pulsator, HD 50230, earlier reported to have deviations from a uniform period spacing of its gravity modes. The combination of spectra and a high-quality light curve measured by the CoRoT satellite allow a combined approach to fix the position of HD 50230 in the HR diagram.
Methods: To describe the observed pulsations, classical Fourier analysis was combined with short-time Fourier transformations and frequency spacing analysis techniques. Visual spectra were used to constrain the projected rotation rate of the star and the fundamental parameters of the target. In a first approximation, the combined information was used to interpret multiplets and spacings to infer the true surface rotation rate and a rough estimate of the inclination angle.
Results: We identify HD 50230 as a spectroscopic binary and characterise the two components. We detect the simultaneous presence of high-order g modes and low-order p and g-modes in the CoRoT light curve, but were unable to link them to line profile variations in the spectroscopic time series. We extract the relevant information from the frequency spectrum, which can be used for seismic modelling, and explore possible interpretations of the pressure mode spectrum. 

2011MNRAS.412.1814S
2011/04
cited: 35  [31.05.24]
Linear analyses for the stability of radial and non-radial oscillations of massive stars

    Saio, Hideyuki 

Abstract
In order to understand the periodic and semiperiodic variations of luminous OBA-type stars, linear non-adiabatic stability analyses for radial and non-radial oscillations have been performed for massive evolutionary models (8-90 M⊙). In addition to radial and non-radial oscillations excited by the kappa-mechanism and strange mode instability, we discuss the importance of low-degree oscillatory convection (non-adiabatic g-) modes. Although their kinetic energy is largely confined to the convection zone generated by the Fe-opacity peak near 2 × 105 K, the amplitude can emerge into the photosphere and should be observable in a certain effective temperature range. They have periods longer than those of the radial strange modes so that they seem to be responsible for some of the long-period microvariations of Luminous Blue Variables (LBVs; S Dor variables) and α Cyg variables. Moreover, monotonically unstable radial modes are found in some models whose initial masses are greater than or equal to 60 M⊙ with Z= 0.02. The monotonic instability probably corresponds to the presence of an optically thick wind. The instability boundary roughly coincides with the Humphreys-Davidson limit. 

2021A&A...648A.126M
2021/04
cited: 33  [31.05.24]
Convective core sizes in rotating massive stars. I. Constraints from solar metallicity OB field stars

    Martinet, S.; Meynet, G.; Ekström, S. and 11 more 

Abstract
Context. Spectroscopic studies of Galactic O and B stars show that many stars with masses above 8 M⊙ have been observed in the Hertzsprung-Russell (HR) diagram just beyond the main-sequence (MS) band, as predicted by stellar models computed with a moderate overshooting. This may be an indication that the convective core sizes in stars in the upper part of the HR diagram are larger than predicted by these models.
Aims: Combining stellar evolution models and spectroscopic parameters derived for a large sample of Galactic O and B stars with the inclusion of brand-new information about their projected rotational velocities, we reexamine the question of the convective core size in MS massive stars.
Methods: We computed a grid of 120 different stellar evolutionary tracks with three initial rotations at solar metallicity (Z = 0.014), spanning a mass range from 7 to 25 M⊙, and combining different values for the initial rotation rate and overshooting parameter. For the rotating models, we considered two cases, one with a moderate and one with a strong angular momentum transport, the latter imposing a solid body rotation during most of the MS phase. We confront the results with two observed features: the position of the terminal age main sequence (TAMS) in the HR diagram and the decrease of the surface rotation when the surface gravity decreases at the end of the MS phase.
Results: We confirm that for stars more massive than about 8 M⊙, the convective core size at the end of the MS phase increases more rapidly with the mass than in models computed with a constant step overshoot chosen to reproduce the main sequence width in the low mass range (around 2 M⊙). This conclusion is valid for both the cases of non-rotating models and rotating models either with a moderate or a strong angular momentum transport. The increase of the convective core mass with the mass obtained from the TAMS position is, however, larger than the one deduced from the surface velocity drop for masses above about 15 M⊙. Although the observations that are available at present cannot determine the best choice between the core sizes given by the TAMS and the velocity drop, we discuss various methods of escaping this dilemma. At the moment, comparisons with eclipsing binaries seem to favor the solution given by the velocity drop.
Conclusions: While we confirm the need for larger convective cores at higher masses, we find tensions among different methods for stars more massive than 15 M⊙. The use of single-aged stellar populations (non-interacting binaries or stellar clusters) would be a great asset in resolving this tension. 

2021A&A...656A.158B
2021/12
cited: 32 [31.05.24]
Towards a systematic treatment of observational uncertainties in forward asteroseismic modelling of gravity-mode pulsators

    Bowman, Dominic M.; Michielsen, Mathias 

Abstract
Context. In asteroseismology, the pulsation mode frequencies of a star are the fundamental data that are compared to theoretical predictions to determine a star's interior physics. Recent significant advances in the numerical, theoretical, and statistical asteroseismic methods applied to main-sequence stars with convective cores have renewed interest in investigating the propagation of observational uncertainties within a forward asteroseismic modelling framework.
Aims: We aim to quantify the impact of various choices made throughout the observational aspects of extracting pulsation mode frequencies in main-sequence stars with gravity modes.
Methods: We use a well-studied benchmark slowly pulsating B star, KIC 7760680, to investigate the sensitivity of forward asteroseismic modelling to various sources of observational uncertainty that affect the precision of the input pulsation mode frequencies.
Results: We quantify the impact of the propagation of the observational uncertainties involved in forward asteroseismic modelling. We find that one of the largest sources of uncertainty in our benchmark star is in the manual building of period spacing patterns, such that the inclusion of a potentially ambiguous pulsation mode frequency may yield differences in model parameters of up to 10% for mass and age depending on the radial order of the mode.
Conclusions: We conclude that future asteroseismic studies of main-sequence stars with a convective core should quantify and include observational uncertainties introduced by the light curve extraction, iterative pre-whitening, and the building of period spacing patterns, as these propagate into the final modelling results.

2021A&A...652A.120I
2021/08
cited: 32 [31.05.24]
An all-sky sample of intermediate- to high-mass OBA-type eclipsing binaries observed by TESS

    IJspeert, L. W.; Tkachenko, A.; Johnston, C. and 4 more 

Abstract
Context. Intermediate- to high-mass stars are the least numerous types of stars, and they are less well understood than their more numerous low-mass counterparts in terms of their internal physical processes. Modelling the photometric variability of a large sample of main-sequence intermediate- to high-mass stars in eclipsing binary systems will help to improve the models for such stars.
Aims: Our goal is to compose a homogeneously compiled sample of main-sequence intermediate- to high-mass OBA-type dwarfs in eclipsing binary systems from TESS photometry. We search for binaries with and without pulsations and determine their approximate ephemerides.
Methods: Our selection starts from a catalogue of dwarfs with colours corresponding to those of OBA-type dwarfs in the TESS Input Catalog. We develop a new automated method aimed at detecting eclipsing binaries in the presence of a strong pulsational and/or rotational signal relative to the eclipse depths and apply it to publicly available 30-min cadence TESS light curves.
Results: Using targets with TESS magnitudes below 15 and cuts in the 2MASS magnitude bands of J − H < 0.045 and J − K < 0.06 as the most stringent criteria, we arrive at a total of 189 981 intermediate- to high-mass candidates, 91 193 of which have light curves from at least one of two data reduction pipelines. The eclipsing binary detection and subsequent manual check for false positives resulted in 3155 unique OBA-type eclipsing binary candidates.
Conclusions: Our sample of eclipsing binary stars in the intermediate- to high-mass regime allows for future binary (and asteroseismic) modelling with the aim to better understand the internal physical processes in this hot part of the main sequence.

2018A&A...612A..40S
2018/04
cited: 32 [02.06.24]
Low-frequency photospheric and wind variability in the early-B supergiant HD 2905

    Simón-Díaz, S.; Aerts, C.; Urbaneja, M. A. and 5 more 

Abstract
Context. Despite important advances in space asteroseismology during the last decade, the early phases of evolution of stars with masses above 15 M⊙ (including the O stars and their evolved descendants, the B supergiants) have been only vaguely explored up to now. This is due to the lack of adequate observations for a proper characterization of the complex spectroscopic and photometric variability occurring in these stars. Aim. Our goal is to detect, analyze, and interpret variability in the early-B-type supergiant HD 2905 (κ Cas, B1 Ia) using long-term, ground-based, high-resolution spectroscopy.
Methods: We gather a total of 1141 high-resolution spectra covering some 2900 days with three different high-performance spectrographs attached to 1-2.6m telescopes at the Canary Islands observatories. We complement these observations with the hipparcos light curve, which includes 160 data points obtained during a time span of 1200 days. We investigate spectroscopic variability of up to 12 diagnostic lines by using the zero and first moments of the line profiles. We perform a frequency analysis of both the spectroscopic and photometric dataset using Scargle periodograms. We obtain single snapshot and time-dependent information about the stellar parameters and abundances by means of the FASTWIND stellar atmosphere code.
Results: HD 2905 is a spectroscopic variable with peak-to-peak amplitudes in the zero and first moments of the photospheric lines of up to 15% and 30 km s-1, respectively. The amplitude of the line-profile variability is correlated with the line formation depth in the photosphere and wind. All investigated lines present complex temporal behavior indicative of multi-periodic variability with timescales of a few days to several weeks. No short-period (hourly) variations are detected. The Scargle periodograms of the hipparcos light curve and the first moment of purely photospheric lines reveal a low-frequency amplitude excess and a clear dominant frequency at 0.37 d-1. In the spectroscopy, several additional frequencies are present in the range 0.1-0.4 d-1. These may be associated with heat-driven gravity modes, convectively driven gravity waves, or sub-surface convective motions. Additional frequencies are detected below 0.1 d-1. In the particular case of Hα, these are produced by rotational modulation of a non-spherically symmetric stellar wind.
Conclusions: Combined long-term uninterrupted space photometry with high-precision spectroscopy is the best strategy to unravel the complex low-frequency photospheric and wind variability of B supergiants. Three-dimensional (3D) simulations of waves and of convective motions in the sub-surface layers can shed light on a unique interpretation of the variability.

2017MNRAS.464.2249H
2017/01
cited: 31 [05.06.24]
Combining BRITE and ground-based photometry for the β Cephei star ν Eridani: impact on photometric pulsation mode identification and detection of several g modes

    Handler, G.; Rybicka, M.; Popowicz, A. and 12 more 

Abstract
We report a simultaneous ground- and space-based photometric study of the β Cephei star ν Eridani. Half a year of observations have been obtained by four of the five satellites constituting BRITE-Constellation, supplemented with ground-based photoelectric photometry. We show that carefully combining the two data sets virtually eliminates the aliasing problem that often hampers time series analyses. We detect 40 periodic signals intrinsic to the star in the light curves. Despite a lower detection limit, we do not recover all the pressure and mixed modes previously reported in the literature, but we newly detect six additional gravity modes. This behaviour is a consequence of temporal changes in the pulsation amplitudes that we also detected for some of the p modes. We point out that the dependence of theoretically predicted pulsation amplitude on wavelength is steeper in visual passbands than those observationally measured, to the extent that three dominant pulsation modes of ν Eridani would be incorrectly identified using data in optical filters only. We discuss possible reasons for this discrepancy. 

2013A&A...552A.105V
2013/04
cited: 31  [31.05.24]
Blue supergiant progenitor models of type II supernovae

    Vanbeveren, D.; Mennekens, N.; Van Rensbergen, W. and 1 more 

Abstract
We show that within all the uncertainties that govern the process of Roche-lobe overflow in case Br-type massive binaries, it cannot be excluded that a significant fraction of them merge and become single stars. We demonstrate that at least some of them will spend most of their core helium-burning phase as hydrogen-rich blue stars, populating the massive blue supergiant region and/or the massive Be-type star population. The evolutionary simulations lead us to suspect that these mergers will explode as luminous blue hydrogen-rich stars, and it is tempting to link them to at least some superluminous supernovae.  

2022AJ....163..226L
2022/05
cited: 30 [02.06.24]
Classifying Be Star Variability With TESS. I. The Southern Ecliptic

    Labadie-Bartz, Jonathan; Carciofi, Alex C.; Henrique de Amorim, Tajan and 4 more 

Abstract
TESS photometry is analyzed for 430 classical Be stars observed in the first year of the mission. The often complex and diverse variability of each object in this sample is classified to obtain an understanding of the behavior of this class as a population. Ninety-seven percent of the systems are variable above the noise level, with timescales spanning nearly the entire range of what is accessible with TESS, from tens of minutes to tens of days. The variability seen with TESS is summarized as follows. Nearly every system contains multiple periodic signals in the frequency regime between about 0.5 and 4 day-1. One or more groups of closely spaced frequencies is the most common feature, present in 87% of the sample. Among the Be stars with brightening events that are characteristic of mass ejection episodes (18% of the full sample, or 31% of early-type stars), all have at least one frequency group, and the majority of these (83%) show a concurrent temporary amplitude enhancement in one or more frequency groups. About one-third (34%) of the sample is dominated by longer-term trends (timescales >2 day). Low-frequency stochastic signals are prominent in about 25% of the sample, with varying degrees of intensity. Higher-frequency signals (6 < f < 15 day-1) are sometimes seen (in 15% of the sample) and in most cases likely reflect p-mode pulsation. In rare cases (~3%), even higher frequencies beyond the traditional p-mode regime (f > 15 day-1) are observed.

2019A&A...631A.172D
2019/11
cited: 28 [02.02.21]
Theoretical wind clumping predictions of OB supergiants from line-driven instability simulations across the bi-stability jump

    Driessen, F. A.; Sundqvist, J. O.; Kee, N. D. 

Abstract
Context. The behaviour of mass loss across the so-called bi-stability jump, where iron recombines from Fe IV to Fe III, is a key uncertainty in models of massive stars. Specifically, while an increase in mass loss is theoretically predicted, this has not yet been observationally confirmed. However, radiation-driven winds of hot massive stars are known to exhibit clumpy structures triggered by the line-deshadowing instability (LDI). This wind clumping severely affects empirical mass-loss rates inferred from ρ2-dependent spectral diagnostics. Thus, if clumping properties differ significantly for O and B supergiants across the bi-stability jump, this may help alleviate current discrepancies between theory and observations.
Aims: We investigated with analyt ical and numerical tools how the onset of clumpy structures behave in the winds of O supergiants (OSG) and B supergiants (BSG) across the bi-stability jump.
Methods: We derived a scaling relation for the linear growth rate of the LDI for a single optically thick line and applied it in the OSG and BSG regime. We ran 1D time-dependent line-driven instability simulations to study the non-linear evolution of the LDI in clumpy OSG and BSG winds.
Results: Linear perturbation analysis for a single line shows that the LDI linear growth rate Ω scales strongly with stellar effective temperature and terminal wind speed: Ω∝v∞2Teff4. This implies significantly lower growth rates for (the cooler and slower) BSG winds than for OSG winds. This is confirmed by the non-linear simulations, which show significant differences in OSG and BSG wind structure formation, with the latter characterized by significantly weaker clumping factors and lower velocity dispersions. This suggests that lower correction factors due to clumping should be employed when deriving empirical mass-loss rates for BSGs on the cool side of the bi-stability jump. Moreover, the non-linear simulations provide a theoretical background towards explaining the general lack of observed intrinsic X-ray emission in single B-star winds.

2012ApJ...747..108M
2012/03
cited: 26 [04.06.24]
[NOTE: alpha Cygni]
Asteroseismology of the nearby SN-II Progenitor: Rigel. I. The MOST High-precision Photometry and Radial Velocity Monitoring

    Moravveji, Ehsan; Guinan, Edward F.; Shultz, Matt and 2 more 

Abstract
Rigel (β Ori, B8 Ia) is a nearby blue supergiant displaying α Cyg type variability, and is one of the nearest Type II supernova progenitors. As such it is an excellent test bed to study the internal structure of pre-core-collapse stars. In this study, for the first time, we present 28 days of high-precision MOST photometry and over six years of spectroscopic monitoring. We report 19 significant pulsation modes of signal-to-noise ratio, S/N >~ 4.6 from radial velocities, with variability timescales ranging from 1.21 to 74.7 days, which are associated with high-order low-degree gravity modes. While the radial velocity variations show a degree of correlation with the flux changes, there is no clear interplay between the equivalent widths of different metallic and Hα lines.

2013MNRAS.432.3153D
2013/07
cited: 25  [31.05.24]
Pulsational instability in B-type supergiant stars

    Daszyńska-Daszkiewicz, J.; Ostrowski, J.; Pamyatnykh, A. A. 

Abstract
We present results of the instability analysis of the post-main sequence massive star models against radial and non-radial pulsations. We confirm that both p- and g-modes can be excited by the κ-mechanism acting in the metal opacity bump. However, as opposed to the previous claims, we find that an intermediate convective zone related to the hydrogen burning shell is not necessary for excitation of g-modes. These modes can be reflected at a minimum of the Brunt-Väisälä frequency, located at the top of the chemical composition gradient region surrounding the radiative helium core. This minimum is associated with the change of the actual temperature gradient from the adiabatic value in the semiconvective zone to the radiative value above it. Thus, the existence of pulsations at this evolutionary stage does not prove the existence of the convective zone but only some reflective layer. Finally, we show that no regular patterns can be expected in the oscillation spectra of blue supergiant pulsators, but there is a prospect for identification of the mode degree, ℓ, from multicolour photometry.

2020MNRAS.497.4231R
2020/10
cited: 23  [31.05.24]
Two-dimensional simulations of internal gravity waves in the radiation zones of intermediate-mass stars

    Ratnasingam, R. P.; Edelmann, P. V. F.; Rogers, T. M. 

Abstract
Intermediate-mass main-sequence stars have large radiative envelopes overlying convective cores. This configuration allows internal gravity waves (IGWs) generated at the convective-radiative interface to propagate towards the stellar surface. The signatures of these waves can be observed in the photometric and spectroscopic data from stars. We have studied the propagation of these IGWs using two-dimensional (2D) fully non-linear hydrodynamical simulations with realistic stellar reference states from the 1D stellar evolution code, Modules for Stellar Astrophysics (MESA). When a single wave is forced, we observe wave self-interaction. When two waves are forced, we observe non-linear interaction (i.e. triadic interaction) between these waves forming waves at different wavelengths and frequencies. When a spectrum of waves similar to that found in numerical simulations is forced, we find that the surface IGW frequency slope is consistent with recent observations. This power law is similar to that predicted by linear theory for the wave propagation, with small deviations that can be an effect of non-linearities. When the same generation spectrum is applied to 3 M⊙ models at different stellar rotation and ages, the surface IGW spectrum slope is very similar to the generation spectrum slope.

2018A&A...617A.121K
2018/09
cited: 22  [31.05.24]
Light variations due to the line-driven wind instability and wind blanketing in O stars

    Krtička, J.; Feldmeier, A. 

Abstract
A small fraction of the radiative flux emitted by hot stars is absorbed by their winds and redistributed towards longer wavelengths. This effect, which leads also to the heating of the stellar photosphere, is termed wind blanketing. For stars with variable winds, the effect of wind blanketing may lead to the photometric variability. We have studied the consequences of line driven wind instability and wind blanketing for the light variability of O stars. We combined the results of wind hydrodynamic simulations and of global wind models to predict the light variability of hot stars due to the wind blanketing and instability. The wind instability causes stochastic light variability with amplitude of the order of tens of millimagnitudes and a typical timescale of the order of hours for spatially coherent wind structure. The amplitude is of the order of millimagnitudes when assuming that the wind consists of large number of independent concentric cones. The variability with such amplitude is observable using present space borne photometers. We show that the simulated light curve is similar to the light curves of O stars obtained using BRITE and CoRoT satellites.  

2016MNRAS.458.1964T
2016/05
cited: 21 [04.06.24]
Stellar modelling of Spica, a high-mass spectroscopic binary with a β Cep variable primary component

    Tkachenko, A.; Matthews, J. M.; Aerts, C. and 16 more 

Abstract
Binary stars provide a valuable test of stellar structure and evolution, because the masses of the individual stellar components can be derived with high accuracy and in a model-independent way. In this work, we study Spica, an eccentric double-lined spectroscopic binary system with a β Cep type variable primary component. We use state-of-the-art modelling tools to determine accurate orbital elements of the binary system and atmospheric parameters of both stellar components. We interpret the short-period variability intrinsic to the primary component, detected on top of the orbital motion both in the photometric and spectroscopic data. The non-local thermodynamic equilibrium based spectrum analysis reveals two stars of similar atmospheric chemical composition consistent with the present-day cosmic abundance standard. The masses and radii of the stars are found to be 11.43 ± 1.15 M⊙ and 7.21 ± 0.75 M⊙, and 7.47 ± 0.54 R⊙ and 3.74 ± 0.53 R⊙ for the primary and secondary, respectively. We find the primary component to pulsate in three independent modes, of which one is identified as a radial mode, while the two others are found to be non-radial, low degree l modes. The frequency of one of these modes is an exact multiple of the orbital frequency, and the l = m = 2 mode identification suggests a tidal nature for this particular mode. We find a very good agreement between the derived dynamical and evolutionary masses for the Spica system to within the observational errors of the measured masses. The age of the system is estimated to be 12.5 ± 1 Myr. 

2017A&A...597A..23G
2017/01
cited: 22 [02.06.24]
The IACOB project. IV. New predictions for high-degree non-radial mode instability domains in massive stars and their connection with macroturbulent broadening

    Godart, M.; Simón-Díaz, S.; Herrero, A. and 4 more 

Abstract
Context. Asteroseismology is a powerful tool to access the internal structure of stars. Apart from the important impact of theoretical developments, progress in this field has been commonly associated with the analysis of time-resolved observations. Recently, the so-called macroturbulent broadening has been proposed as a complementary and less expensive way - in terms of observational time - to investigate pulsations in massive stars.
Aims: We assess to what extent this ubiquitous non-rotational broadening component which shapes the line profiles of O stars and B supergiants is a spectroscopic signature of pulsation modes driven by a heat mechanism.
Methods: We compute stellar main-sequence and post-main-sequence models from 3 to 70 M⊙ with the ATON stellar evolution code, and determine the instability domains for heat-driven modes for degrees ℓ = 1-20 using the adiabatic and non-adiabatic codes LOSC and MAD. We use the observational material compiled in the framework of the IACOB project to investigate possible correlations between the single snapshot line-broadening properties of a sample of ≈260 O and B-type stars and their location inside or outside the various predicted instability domains.
Results: We present an homogeneous prediction for the non-radial instability domains of massive stars for degree ℓ up to 20. We provide a global picture of what to expect from an observational point of view in terms of the frequency range of excited modes, and we investigate the behavior of the instabilities with respect to stellar evolution and the degree of the mode. Furthermore, our pulsational stability analysis, once compared to the empirical results, indicates that stellar oscillations originated by a heat mechanism cannot explain alone the occurrence of the large non-rotational line-broadening component commonly detected in the O star and B supergiant domain. 

2022MNRAS.513.3191S
2022/07
cited: 20 [31.05.24]
High-mass pulsators in eclipsing binaries observed using TESS

    Southworth, John; Bowman, Dominic M. 

Abstract
Pulsations and binarity are both common features of massive stars. The study of pulsating massive stars in eclipsing binary systems holds great potential for constraining stellar structure and evolution theory. However, prior to the all-sky Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) mission, few such systems had been discovered or studied in detail. We have inspected the TESS light curves of a large number of eclipsing binaries known to contain high-mass stars, and compiled a list of 18 objects which show intrinsic variability. The light curves were modelled both to determine the physical properties of the systems, and to remove the effects of binarity in order to leave residual light curves suitable for asteroseismic analysis. Precise mass and radius measurements were obtained for δ Cir, CC Cas, SZ Cam V436 Per and V539 Ara. We searched the residual light curves for pulsation signatures and, within our sample of 18 objects, we find six definite and eight possible cases of β Cephei pulsation, seven cases of stochastic low-frequency (SLF) variability, and eight instances of possible slowly pulsating B (SPB) star pulsation. The large number of pulsating eclipsing systems we have identified makes asteroseismology of high-mass stars in eclipsing binaries a feasible avenue to constrain the interior physics of a large sample of massive stars for the first time. 

2021A&A...648A..79K
2021/04
cited: 20  [31.05.24]
Stochastic light variations in hot stars from wind instability: finding photometric signatures and testing against the TESS data

    Krtička, J.; Feldmeier, A. 

Abstract
Context. Line-driven wind instability is expected to cause small-scale wind inhomogeneities, X-ray emission, and wind line profile variability. The instability can already develop around the sonic point if it is initiated close to the photosphere due to stochastic turbulent motions. In such cases, it may leave its imprint on the light curve as a result of wind blanketing.
Aims: We study the photometric signatures of the line-driven wind instability.
Methods: We used line-driven wind instability simulations to determine the wind variability close to the star. We applied two types of boundary perturbations: a sinusoidal one that enables us to study in detail the development of the instability and a stochastic one given by a Langevin process that provides a more realistic boundary perturbation. We estimated the photometric variability from the resulting mass-flux variations. The variability was simulated assuming that the wind consists of a large number of independent conical wind sectors. We compared the simulated light curves with TESS light curves of OB stars that show stochastic variability.
Results: We find two typical signatures of line-driven wind instability in photometric data: a knee in the power spectrum of magnitude fluctuations, which appears due to engulfment of small-scale structure by larger structures, and a negative skewness of the distribution of fluctuations, which is the result of spatial dominance of rarefied regions. These features endure even when combining the light curves from independent wind sectors.
Conclusions: The stochastic photometric variability of OB stars bears certain signatures of the line-driven wind instability. The distribution function of observed photometric data shows negative skewness and the power spectra of a fraction of light curves exhibit a knee. This can be explained as a result of the line-driven wind instability triggered by stochastic base perturbations.  

2021A&A...647A..28K
2021/03
cited: 19 [02.02.24]
New mass-loss rates of B supergiants from global wind models

    Krtička, J.; Kubát, J.; Krtičková, I. 

Abstract
Massive stars lose a significant fraction of mass during their evolution. However, the corresponding mass-loss rates are rather uncertain, especially for evolved stars. To improve this, we calculated global line-driven wind models for Galactic B supergiants. Our models predict radial wind structure and particularly the mass-loss rates and terminal velocities directly from basic stellar parameters. The hydrodynamic structure of the flow is consistently determined from the photosphere in nearly hydrostatic equilibrium to supersonically expanding wind. The radiative force is derived from the solution of the radiative transfer equation in the comoving frame. We provide a simple formula that predicts theoretical mass-loss rates as a function of stellar luminosity and effective temperature. The mass-loss rate of B supergiants slightly decreases with temperature down to about 22.5 kK, where the region of recombination of Fe IV to Fe III starts to appear. In this region, which is about 5 kK wide, the mass-loss rate gradually increases by a factor of about 6. The increase of the mass-loss rate is associated with a gradual decrease of terminal velocities by a factor of about 2. We compared the predicted wind parameters with observations. While the observed wind terminal velocities are reasonably reproduced by the models, the situation with mass-loss rates is less clear. The mass-loss rates derived from observations that are uncorrected for clumping are by a factor of 3 to 9 higher than our predictions on cool and hot sides of the studied sample, respectively. These observations can be reconciled with theory assuming a temperature-dependent clumping factor that is decreasing toward lower effective temperatures. On the other hand, the mass-loss rate estimates that are not sensitive to clumping agree with our predictions much better. Our predictions are by a factor of about 10 lower than the values currently used in evolutionary models appealing for reconsideration of the role of winds in the stellar evolution. 

2019ApJ...878..155D
2019/06
cited: 19  [31.05.24]
Short-term Variability of Evolved Massive Stars with TESS

    Dorn-Wallenstein, Trevor Z.; Levesque, Emily M.; Davenport, James R. A. 

Abstract
We present the first results from a study of Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) Sector 1 and 2 light curves for eight evolved massive stars in the LMC: six yellow supergiants (YSGs) and two luminous blue variables (LBVs), including S Doradus. We use an iterative prewhitening procedure to characterize the short-timescale variability in all eight stars. The periodogram of one of the YSGs, HD 269953, displays multiple strong peaks at higher frequencies than its fellows. While the field surrounding HD 269953 is quite crowded, it is the brightest star in the region, and has infrared colors indicating it is dusty. We suggest HD 269953 may be in a post-red supergiant evolutionary phase. We find a signal with a period of ∼5 days for the LBV HD 269582. The periodogram of S Doradus shows a complicated structure, with peaks below frequencies of 1.5 cycles per day. We fit the shape of the background noise of all eight light curves, and find a red noise component in all of them. However, the power-law slope of the red noise and the timescale over which coherent structures arise changes from star to star. Our results highlight the potential for studying evolved massive stars with TESS.

2022ApJ...924L..11S
2022/01
cited: 18  [31.05.24]
Stochastic Low-frequency Variability in Three-dimensional Radiation Hydrodynamical Models of Massive Star Envelopes

    Schultz, William C.; Bildsten, Lars; Jiang, Yan-Fei 

Abstract
Increasing main-sequence stellar luminosity with stellar mass leads to the eventual dominance of radiation pressure in stellar-envelope hydrostatic balance. As the luminosity approaches the Eddington limit, additional instabilities (beyond conventional convection) can occur. These instabilities readily manifest in the outer envelopes of OB stars, where the opacity increase associated with iron yields density and gas-pressure inversions in 1D models. Additionally, recent photometric surveys (e.g., TESS) have detected excess broadband low-frequency variability in power spectra of OB star lightcurves, called stochastic low-frequency variability (SLFV). This motivates our novel 3D Athena++ radiation hydrodynamical (RHD) simulations of two 35 M ⊙ star envelopes (the outer ≈15% of the stellar radial extent), one on the zero-age main sequence and the other in the middle of the main sequence. Both models exhibit turbulent motion far above and below the conventional iron-opacity peak convection zone (FeCZ), obliterating any "quiet" part of the near-surface region and leading to velocities at the photosphere of 10-100 km s-1, directly agreeing with spectroscopic data. Surface turbulence also produces SLFV in model lightcurves with amplitudes and power-law slopes that are strikingly similar to those of observed stars. The characteristic frequencies associated with SLFV in our models are comparable to the thermal time in the FeCZ (≈3-7 day-1). These ab initio simulations are directly validated by observations and, though more models are needed, we remain optimistic that 3D RHD models of main-sequence O-star envelopes exhibit SLFV originating from the FeCZ.

2020ApJ...902...24D
2020/10
cited: 18  [31.05.24]
Short-term Variability of Evolved Massive Stars with TESS. II. A New Class of Cool, Pulsating Supergiants

    Dorn-Wallenstein, Trevor Z.; Levesque, Emily M.; Neugent, Kathryn F. and 3 more 

Abstract
Massive stars briefly pass through the yellow supergiant (YSG) phase as they evolve redward across the H-R diagram and expand into red supergiants (RSGs). Higher-mass stars pass through the YSG phase again as they evolve blueward after experiencing significant RSG mass loss. These post-RSG objects offer us a tantalizing glimpse into which stars end their lives as RSGs and why. One telltale sign of a post-RSG object may be an instability to pulsations, depending on the star's interior structure. Here we report the discovery of five YSGs with pulsation periods faster than 1 day, found in a sample of 76 cool supergiants observed by the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite at a two-minute cadence. These pulsating YSGs are concentrated in an H-R diagram region not previously associated with pulsations; we conclude that this is a genuine new class of pulsating star, fast yellow pulsating supergiants (FYPSs). For each FYPS, we extract frequencies via iterative prewhitening and conduct a time-frequency analysis. One FYPS has an extracted frequency that is split into a triplet, and the amplitude of that peak is modulated on the same timescale as the frequency spacing of the triplet; neither rotation nor binary effects are likely culprits. We discuss the evolutionary status of FYPS and conclude that they are candidate post-RSGs. All stars in our sample also show the same stochastic low-frequency variability found in hot OB stars and attributed to internal gravity waves. Finally, we find four α Cygni variables in our sample, of which three are newly discovered. 

2022A&A...658A..61R
2022/02
cited: 17 [02.02.24]
Upper mass-loss limits and clumping in the intermediate and outer wind regions of OB stars

    Rubio-Díez, M. M.; Sundqvist, J. O.; Najarro, F. and 4 more 

Abstract
Context. Mass loss is a key parameter throughout the evolution of massive stars, and it determines the feedback with the surrounding interstellar medium. The presence of inhomogeinities in stellar winds (clumping) leads to severe discrepancies not only among different mass-loss rate diagnostics, but also between empirical estimates and theoretical predictions.
Aims: We aim to probe the radial clumping stratification of OB stars in the intermediate and outer wind regions (r ≳ 2 R*; radial distance to the photosphere) to derive upper limits for mass-loss rates and to compare that to current mass-loss implementation. Our sample includes 13 B supergiants, which is the largest sample of such objects in which clumping has been analysed so far.
Methods: Together with archival optical to radio observations, we obtained new far-infrared continuum observations for a sample of 25 OB stars. Our new data uniquely constrain the clumping properties of the intermediate wind region. By using density-squared diagnostics, we further derived the minimum radial stratification of the clumping factor through the stellar wind, fclmin (r), and the corresponding maximum mass-loss rate, Ṁmax, normalising clumping factors to the outermost wind region (fclfar = 1).
Results: We find that the clumping degree for r ≳ 2 R* decreases or stays constant with an increasing radius, regardless of the luminosity class or spectral type for 22 out of 25 sources in our sample. However, a dependence of the clumping degree on the luminosity class and spectral type at the intermediate region relative to the outer ones has been observed: O supergiants (OSGs) present, on average, a factor 2 larger clumping factors than B supergiants (BSGs). Interestingly, the clumping structure of roughly one-third of the OB supergiants in our sample is such that the maximum clumping occurs close to the wind base (r ≲ 2 R*), and then it decreases monotonically. This is in contrast to the more frequent case where the lowermost clumping increases towards a maximum and needs to be addressed by theoretical models. In addition, we find that the estimated Ṁmax for BSGs is at least one order of magnitude (before finally decreasing) lower than the values usually adopted by stellar evolution models, whereas the upper observational limits and predictions of OSGs agree within errors. This implies large reductions of mass-loss rates applied in evolution models for BSGs, independently of the actual clumping properties of these winds. However, hydrodynamical models of clumping suggest absolute clumping factors in the outermost radio-emitting wind of the order of fclfar ≈ 4-9, assuming these values would imply a reduction in mass-loss rates included in stellar evolution models by a factor 2-3 for OSGs (above Teff ~ 26 500 K) and by factors 6-200 for BSGs below the so-called first bi-stability jump (below Teff ~ 22 000 K). While such reductions agree well with new theoretical mass-loss calculations for OSGs, our empirical findings call for a thorough re-investigation of BSG mass-loss rates and their associated effects on stellar evolution.

2021MNRAS.502.5038N
2021/04
cited: 16 [31.05.24]
Red noise and pulsations in evolved massive stars

    Nazé, Yaël; Rauw, Gregor; Gosset, Eric 

Abstract
We examine high-cadence space photometry taken by the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) of a sample of evolved massive stars: 26 Wolf-Rayet stars (WRs) and eight luminous blue variables (LBVs) or candidate LBVs. To avoid confusion problems, only stars without bright Gaia neighbours and without evidence of bound companions are considered. This leads to a clean sample, the variability properties of which should truly reflect the properties of the WR and LBV classes. Red noise is detected in all cases and its fitting reveals characteristics very similar to those found for OB stars. Coherent variability is also detected for 20 per cent of the WR sample. Most detections occur at moderately high frequency (3-14 d-1), hence they are most probably linked to pulsational activity. This work doubles the number of WRs known to exhibit high-frequency signals.  

2018MNRAS.480..972R
2018/10
cited: 16 [05.06.24]
A BRITE view on the massive O-type supergiant V973 Scorpii: hints towards internal gravity waves or sub-surface convection zones

    Ramiaramanantsoa, Tahina; Ratnasingam, Rathish; Shenar, Tomer and 9 more 

Abstract
Stochastically triggered photospheric light variations reaching ∼40 mmag peak-to-valley amplitudes have been detected in the O8 Iaf supergiant V973 Scorpii as the outcome of 2 months of high-precision time-resolved photometric observations with the BRIght Target Explorer (BRITE) nanosatellites. The amplitude spectrum of the time series photometry exhibits a pronounced broad bump in the low-frequency regime (≲0.9 d-1) where several prominent frequencies are detected. A time-frequency analysis of the observations reveals typical mode lifetimes of the order of 5-10 d. The overall features of the observed brightness amplitude spectrum of V973 Sco match well with those extrapolated from two-dimensional hydrodynamical simulations of convectively driven internal gravity waves randomly excited from deep in the convective cores of massive stars. An alternative or additional possible source of excitation from a sub-surface convection zone needs to be explored in future theoretical investigations.

2020MNRAS.498.3171N
2020/11
cited: 16 [31.05.24]
TESS light curves of γ Cas stars

    Nazé, Yaël; Rauw, Gregor; Pigulski, Andrzej 

Abstract
γ Cas stars constitute a subgroup of Be stars showing unusually hard and bright X-ray emission. In search for additional peculiarities, we analysed the TESS light curves of 15 γ Cas analogues. Their periodograms display broad frequency groups and/or narrow isolated peaks, often superimposed over red noise. The detected signals appear at low frequencies, with few cases of significant signals beyond 5 d-1 (and all of them are faint). The signal amplitudes, and sometimes the frequency content, change with time, even in the absence of outburst events. On the basis of their optical photometric variability, γ Cas stars reveal no distinctive behaviour and thus appear similar to Be stars in general.  

2013A&A...557A.114A
2013/09
cited: 15 [31.05.24]
Low-amplitude rotational modulation rather than pulsations in the CoRoT B-type supergiant HD 46769

    Aerts, C.; Simón-Díaz, S.; Catala, C. and 16 more 

Abstract

Aims: We aim to detect and interpret photometric and spectroscopic variability of the bright CoRoT B-type supergiant target HD 46769 (V = 5.79). We also attempt to detect a magnetic field in the target.
Methods: We analyse a 23-day oversampled CoRoT light curve after detrending and spectroscopic follow-up data using standard Fourier analysis and phase dispersion minimization methods. We determine the fundamental parameters of the star, as well as its abundances from the most prominent spectral lines. We perform a Monte Carlo analysis of spectropolarimetric data to obtain an upper limit of the polar magnetic field, assuming a dipole field.
Results: In the CoRoT data, we detect a dominant period of 4.84 d with an amplitude of 87 ppm and some of its (sub-)multiples. Given the shape of the phase-folded light curve and the absence of binary motion, we interpret the dominant variability in terms of rotational modulation, with a rotation period of 9.69 d. Subtraction of the rotational modulation signal does not reveal any sign of pulsations. Our results are consistent with the absence of variability in the Hipparcos light curve. The spectroscopy leads to a projected rotational velocity of 72 ± 2 km s-1 and does not reveal periodic variability or the need to invoke macroturbulent line broadening. No signature of a magnetic field is detected in our data. A field stronger than ~500 G at the poles can be excluded, unless the possible non-detected field were more complex than dipolar.
Conclusions: The absence of pulsations and macroturbulence of this evolved B-type supergiant is placed into the context of instability computations and of observed variability of evolved B-type stars. 

2022MNRAS.515..828S
2022/09
cited: 15 [05.06.24]
Pulsating B stars in the Scorpius-Centaurus Association with TESS

    Sharma, Awshesh N.; Bedding, Timothy R.; Saio, Hideyuki and 1 more 

Abstract
We study 119 B stars located in the Scorpius-Centaurus Association using data from NASA's TESS Mission. We see pulsations in 81 stars (68 per cent) across the full range of effective temperatures. In particular, we confirm previous reports of low-frequency pulsations in stars whose temperatures fall between the instability strips of SPB stars (slowly pulsating B stars) and δ Scuti stars. By taking the stellar densities into account, we conclude that these cannot be p modes and confirm previous suggestions that these are probably rapidly rotating SPB stars. We also confirm that they follow two period-luminosity relations that are consistent with prograde sectoral g modes that are dipole (l = m = 1) and quadrupole (l = m = 2), respectively. One of the stars (ξ2 Cen) is a hybrid pulsator that shows regular spacings in both g and p modes. We confirm that α Cru has low-amplitude p-mode pulsations, making it one of the brightest β Cephei stars in the sky. We also find several interesting binaries, including a very short-period heartbeat star (HD 132094), a previously unknown eclipsing binary (π Lup), and an eclipsing binary with high-amplitude tidally driven pulsations (HR 5846). The results clearly demonstrate the power of TESS for studying variability in stellar associations. 

2023NatAs...7..913B
2023/08
cited: 15 [15.06.24]
quick access to full text links
quick links to lists of references, citations and more
quick links to data associated with this article
A calibration point for stellar evolution from massive star asteroseismology

    Burssens, Siemen; Bowman, Dominic M.; Michielsen, Mathias and 10 more 

Abstract
Massive stars are progenitors of supernovae, neutron stars and black holes. During the hydrogen-core burning phase, their convective cores are the prime drivers of their evolution, but inferences of core masses are subject to unconstrained boundary mixing processes. Moreover, uncalibrated transport mechanisms can lead to strong envelope mixing and differential radial rotation. Ascertaining the efficiency of the transport mechanisms is challenging because of a lack of observational constraints. Here we deduce the convective core mass and robustly demonstrate non-rigid radial rotation in a supernova progenitor, the 12 .0−1.5+1.5 solar-mass hydrogen-burning star HD 192575, using asteroseismology, Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite photometry, high-resolution spectroscopy and Gaia astrometry. We infer a convective core mass (Mcc=2 .9−0.8+0.5 solar masses), and find the core to be rotating between 1.4 and 6.3 times faster than the stellar envelope, depending on the location of the rotational shear layer. Our results deliver a robust inferred core mass of a massive star using asteroseismology from space-based photometry. HD 192575 is a unique anchor point for studying interior rotation and mixing processes, and thus also angular momentum transport mechanisms inside massive stars.

2021MNRAS.502..242L
2021/03
cited: 13
Short-term variability and mass loss in Be stars - VI. Frequency groups in γ Cas detected by TESS

    Labadie-Bartz, Jonathan; Baade, Dietrich; Carciofi, Alex C. and 5 more 

Abstract
In photometry of γ Cas (B0.5 IVe) from the Solar Mass Ejection Imager (SMEI) and the BRIght Target Explorer (BRITE)-Constellation satellites, indications of low-order non-radial pulsation have recently been found, which would establish an important commonality with the class of classical Be stars at large. New photometry with the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) has detected three frequency groups near 1.0 (g1), 2.4 (g2), and 5.1 (g3) d-1, respectively. Some individual frequencies are nearly harmonics or combination frequencies but not exactly so. Frequency groups are known from roughly three quarters of all classical Be stars and also from pulsations of β Cep, slowly pulsating B (SPB), and γ Dor stars and, therefore, firmly establish γ Cas as a non-radial pulsator. The total power in each frequency group is variable. An isolated feature exists at 7.57 d-1 and, together with the strongest peaks in the second and third groups ordered by increasing frequency (g2 and g3), is the only one detected in all three TESS sectors. The former long-term 0.82 d-1 variability would fall into g1 and has not returned at a significant level, questioning its attribution to rotational modulation. Low-frequency stochastic variability is a dominant feature of the TESS light curve, possibly caused by internal gravity waves excited at the core-envelope interface. These are known to be efficient at transporting angular momentum outward, and may also drive the oscillations that constitute g1 and g2. The hard X-ray flux of γ Cas is the only remaining major property that distinguishes this star from the class of classical Be stars

2024MNRAS.531.1316T
2024/06
cited: 12  [31.05.24]
3D hydrodynamic simulations of massive main-sequence stars - II. Convective excitation and spectra of internal gravity waves

    Thompson, William; Herwig, Falk; Woodward, Paul R. and 4 more 

Abstract
Recent photometric observations of massive stars have identified a low-frequency power excess which appears as stochastic low-frequency variability in light-curve observations. We present the oscillation properties of high-resolution hydrodynamic simulations of a 25M⊙
star performed with the PPMstar code. The model star has a convective core mass of ≈12M⊙ and approximately half of the envelope simulated. From this simulation, we extract light curves from several directions, average them over each hemisphere, and process them as if they were real photometric observations. We show how core convection excites waves with a similar frequency as the convective time-scale in addition to significant power across a forest of low and high angular degree l modes. We find that the coherence of these modes is relatively low as a result of their stochastic excitation by core convection, with lifetimes of the order of 10s of days. Thanks to the still significant power at higher l and this relatively low coherence, we find that integrating over a hemisphere produces a power spectrum that still contains measurable power up to the Brunt-Väisälä frequency. These power spectra extracted from the stable envelope are qualitatively similar to observations, with the same order of magnitude yet lower characteristic frequency. This work further shows the potential of long-duration, high-resolution hydrodynamic simulations for connecting asteroseismic observations to the structure and dynamics of core convection and the convective boundary.

2009CoAst.158...61C
2009/07
cited: 12  [31.05.24]
On the origin of microturbulence in hot stars

    Cantiello, M.; Langer, N.; Brott, I. and 5 more 

Abstract
We present results from the first extensive study of convection zones in the envelopes of hot massive stars, which are caused by opacity peaks associated with iron and helium ionization. These convective regions can be located very close to the stellar surface. The region in the Hertzsprung-Russel diagram in which we predict the convection zones and the strength of this convection is in good agreement with the occurrence and strength of microturbulence in massive stars. We further argue that convection close to the surface may trigger clumping at the base of the stellar wind of hot massive stars.

2019ApJ...886...27W
2019/11
cited: 11 [31.05.24]
Type IIP Supernova Progenitors and Their Explodability. I. Convective Overshoot, Blue Loops, and Surface Composition

    Wagle, Gururaj A.; Ray, Alak; Dev, Ajay and 1 more 

Abstract
We present the evolution of massive star progenitors of supernovae of type IIP. We take the example of the nearby and well-studied SN 2013ej. We explore how convective overshoot affects the stellar structure, surface abundances, and effective temperature of massive stars, using the Modules for Experiments in Stellar Astrophysics. In particular, models with moderate overshoot (f = 0.02-0.031) show the presence of blue loops in the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram with a red to blue excursion (log10[T eff/K] from <3.6 to >4.0) and transition back to red, during the core helium-burning phase. Models with overshoot outside this range of f values kept the star in the red supergiant state throughout the post-helium-ignition phases. The surface CNO abundance shows enrichment post-main-sequence and again around the time when helium is exhausted in the core. These evolutionary changes in surface CNO abundance are indistinguishable in the currently available observations due to large observational uncertainties. However, these observations may distinguish between the ratio of surface nitrogen to oxygen at different evolutionary stages of the star. We also compare the effects of convective overshoot on various parameters related to likelihood of explosion of a star as opposed to collapse to a black hole. These parameters are the compactness parameter, M 4, and μ 4. The combination μ 4 × M 4, and μ 4 have similar variations with f and both peak at f = 0.032. We find that all of our 13 {M}⊙ models are likely to explode.

2021MNRAS.508..132L
2021/11
cited: 11  [31.05.24]
Surface manifestation of stochastically excited internal gravity waves

    Lecoanet, Daniel; Cantiello, Matteo; Anders, Evan H. and 5 more 

Abstract
Recent photometric observations of massive stars show ubiquitous low-frequency 'red noise' variability, which has been interpreted as internal gravity waves (IGWs). Simulations of IGWs generated by convection show smooth surface wave spectra, qualitatively matching the observed red noise. Theoretical calculations using linear wave theory by Shiode et al. and Lecoanet et al. predict IGWs should manifest at the surface as regularly spaced peaks associated with standing g modes. In light of the apparent discrepancy between these theories and simulations/observations, we test the theories with simplified 2D numerical simulations of wave generation by convection. The simulations agree with the transfer function calculations presented in Lecoanet et al., demonstrating that the transfer function correctly models linear wave propagation. However, there are differences between our simulations and the g-mode amplitude predictions of Shiode et al. This is because that work did not take into account the finite width of the g-mode peaks; after correcting for this finite width, we again find good agreement between theory and simulations. This paper verifies the theoretical approach of Lecoanet et al. and strengthens their conclusion that IGWs generated by core convection do not have a surface manifestation consistent with observed low-frequency variability of massive stars.

2019A&A...621A..22F
2019/01
cited: 11  [31.05.24]
Impact of binary interaction on the evolution of blue supergiants. The flux-weighted gravity luminosity relationship and extragalactic distance determinations

    Farrell, E. J.; Groh, J. H.; Meynet, G. and 5 more 

Abstract
A large fraction of massive stars evolve in interacting binary systems, which dramatically modifies the outcome of stellar evolution. We investigated the properties of blue supergiants in binary systems and whether they are suitable for extragalactic distance determinations using the flux-weighted gravity luminosity relationship (FGLR). This is a relationship between the absolute bolometric magnitude Mbol and the spectroscopically determined flux-weighted gravity gF = g/T4eff, where g is the surface gravity and Teff is the effective temperature. We computed a grid of binary stellar evolution models with MESA and use the v2.1 BPASS models to examine whether they are compatible with the relatively small scatter shown by the observed relationship. Our models have initial primary masses of 9-30 M⊙, initial orbital periods of 10-2511 days, mass ratio q = 0.9, and metallicity Z = 0.02. We find that the majority of primary stars that produce blue supergiant stages are consistent with the observed FGLR, with a small offset towards brighter bolometric magnitudes. In between 1%-24% of cases, binary evolution may produce blue supergiants after a mass transfer episode, that lie below the observed FGLR. A very small number of such stars have been found in extragalactic FGLR studies, suggesting that they may have evolved through binary interaction. Some models with shorter periods could resemble blue hypergiants and luminous blue variables. We used CMFGEN radiative transfer models to investigate the effects of unresolved secondaries on diagnostics for Teff and g, and the biases on the determination of interstellar reddening and Mbol. We find that the effects are small and within the observed scatter, but could lead to a small overestimate of the luminosity, of Teff and of g for extreme cases. We conclude that the observed FGLR can, in principle, be well reproduced by close binary evolution models. We outline directions for future work, including rotation and binary population synthesis techniques. 

2022ApJ...925...79L
2022/01
cited: 9 [31.05.24]
A Study of the Stochastic Photometric Variability in the Winds of Galactic Wolf-Rayet Stars

    Lenoir-Craig, Guillaume; St-Louis, Nicole; Moffat, Anthony F. J. and 6 more 

Abstract
In order to explore how the ubiquitous short-term stochastic variability in the photometric observations of Wolf-Rayet (WR) stars is related to various stellar characteristics, we examined a sample of 50 Galactic WR stars using 122 lightcurves obtained by the BRIght Target Explorer-Constellation, Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite and Microvariability and Oscillations of Stars satellites. We found that the periodograms resulting from a discrete Fourier transform of all our detrended lightcurves are characterized by a forest of random peaks showing an increase in power starting from ~0.5 day-1 down to ~0.1 day-1. After fitting the periodograms with a semi-Lorentzian function representing a combination of white and red noise, we investigated possible correlations between the fitted parameters and various stellar and wind characteristics. Seven correlations were observed, the strongest and only significant one being between the amplitude of variability, α 0, observed for hydrogen-free WR stars, while WNh stars exhibit correlations between α 0 and the stellar temperature, T *, and also between the characteristic frequency of the variations, ν char, and both T * and v ∞. We report that stars observed more than once show significantly different variability parameters, indicating an epoch-dependent measurement. We also find that the observed characteristic frequencies for the variations generally lie between −0.5<log10νchar<0.5
, and that the values of the steepness of the amplitude spectrum are typically found in the range −0.1<log10γ<0.5 . We discuss various physical processes that can lead to this correlation.

2023A&A...677A..50B
2023/09
cited: 9 [02.02.24]
Clumping and X-rays in cooler B supergiant stars

    Bernini-Peron, M.; Marcolino, W. L. F.; Sander, A. A. C. and 6 more 

Abstract
Context. B supergiants (BSGs) are evolved stars with effective temperatures between ~10 to ~30 kK. Knowing the properties of these objects is important to understand massive star evolution. Located on the cool end of the line-driven wind regime, the study of their atmospheres can help us to understand the physics of their winds and phenomena such as the bi-stability jump.
Aims: Despite being well-studied stars, key UV features of their spectra have so far not been reproduced by atmosphere models for spectral types later than B1. In this study, we aim to remedy this situation by performing quantitative spectral analyzes that account for the effects of X-rays and clumping in the wind. In addition, we also briefly investigate the evolutionary status of our sample stars based on the stellar parameters we obtained.
Methods: We determined photospheric and wind parameters via quantitative spectroscopy using atmosphere models computed with CMFGEN and PoWR. These models were compared to high-resolution UV and optical spectra of four BSGs: HD206165, HD198478, HD53138, and HD164353. We further employed GENEC and MESA tracks to study the evolutionary status of our sample.
Results: When including both clumping and X-rays, we obtained a good agreement between synthetic and observed spectra for our sample stars. For the first time, we reproduced key wind lines in the UV, where previous studies were unsuccessful. To model the UV spectra, we require a moderately clumped wind (fV∞ ≳ 0.5). We also infer a relative X-ray luminosity of about 10−7.5 to 10−8, which is lower than the typical ratio of 10−7. Moreover, we find a possible mismatch between evolutionary mass predictions and the derived spectroscopic masses, which deserves deeper investigation as this might relate to the mass-discrepancy problem present in other types of OB stars.
Conclusions: Our results provide direct spectroscopic evidence that both X-rays and clumping need to be taken into account to describe the winds of cool BSGs. However, their winds seem to be much less structured than in earlier OB-type stars. Our findings are in line with observational X-rays and clumping constraints as well as recent hydrodynamical simulations. The evolutionary status of BSGs seems to be diverse with some objects potentially being post-red supergiants or merger products. The obtained wind parameters provide evidence for a moderate increase of the mass-loss rate around the bi-stability jump.   

2015MNRAS.447.2378O
2015/03
cited: 9  [31.05.24]
Pulsations in B-type supergiants with masses M<20 M_{⊙} before and after core helium ignition

    Ostrowski, J.; Daszyńska-Daszkiewicz, J. 

Abstract
Evolutionary tracks and pulsational analysis of models with masses of 13-18 M⊙ are presented. We address two important questions. The first one deals with one of the most unresolved problems in astrophysics, i.e. the existence of a blue loop after core helium ignition; the so-called to loop or not to loop problem. We show that inward overshooting from the outer convective zone in the red giant phase is prerequisite for the development of the blue loop. Our second question concerns pulsational instability of models in the core helium burning phase. We present for the first time that models on the blue loop can have unstable modes driven by the κ mechanism operating in the Z-bump. Contrary to post-main-sequence models in the shell hydrogen burning phases, pulsational instability of the blue loop models depends mainly on effective temperature and metallicity is of secondary importance. Finally, we try to interpret the oscillation spectrum of the blue supergiant HD 163899, the only member of the slowly pulsating B-type supergiant class and to get some clue on the evolutionary status of the star. 

2023arXiv231100038B
2023/10
cited: 8  [31.05.24]
The Potential of Asteroseismology to Resolve the Blue Supergiant Problem

    Bellinger, Earl Patrick; de Mink, Selma E.; van Rossem, Walter E. and 1 more 

Abstract
Despite major progress in our understanding of massive stars, concerning discrepancies still remain between observations and theory. Most notable are the numerous stars observed beyond the theoretical main sequence, an evolutionary phase expected to be short-lived and hence sparsely populated. This is the "Blue Supergiant Problem." Stellar models with abnormal internal structures can provide long-lived solutions for this problem: core hydrogen-burning stars with oversized cores may explain the hotter ones, and core helium-burning stars with undersized cores may explain the cooler ones. Such stars may result from enhanced or suppressed mixing in single stars, or, more likely, as the products of binary interaction and stellar mergers. Here we investigate the potential of asteroseismology to uncover the nature of blue supergiants. We construct stellar models for the above scenarios and show that they predict g
-mode period spacings that differ by an order of magnitude: ∼ 200~min versus ∼ 20~min for long-lived core H and He burning stars, respectively. For the classical scenario of H-shell-burning stars rapidly crossing the Hertzsprung gap, we furthermore predict changes of the order of 10−2μHzyr−1 in high-frequency modes; this effect would be in principle observable from ∼5~yr of asteroseismic monitoring if these modes can be identified. This raises the possibility of revealing the internal structure of blue supergiants, and thus determining whether these stars are indeed binary merger products. These asteroseismic diagnostics may be measurable through long time-series observations from the ongoing TESS mission and upcoming PLATO mission, thereby laying a path toward resolving the blue supergiant problem.

2022A&A...668A.134B
2022/12
cited: 8  [31.05.24]
Photometric detection of internal gravity waves in upper main-sequence stars. III. Comparison of amplitude spectrum fitting and Gaussian process regression using CELERITE2

    Bowman, Dominic M.; Dorn-Wallenstein, Trevor Z. 

Abstract
Context. Recent studies of massive stars using high-precision space photometry have revealed that they commonly exhibit stochastic low-frequency (SLF) variability. This has been interpreted as being caused by internal gravity waves excited at the interface of convective and radiative regions within stellar interiors, such as the convective core or sub-surface convection zones, or being caused by dynamic turbulence associated with sub-surface convection zones within the envelopes of main-sequence massive stars.
Aims: We aim to compare the properties of SLF variability in massive main-sequence stars observed by the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) mission determined by different statistical methods, and confirm the correlation between the morphology of SLF variability and a star's location in the Hertzsprung-Russell (HR) diagram. We also aim to quantify the impact of data quality on the inferred SLF morphologies using both fitting methodologies.
Methods: From a sample of 30 previously observed and characterised galactic massive stars observed by TESS, we compare the resultant parameters of SLF variability, in particular the characteristic frequency, obtained from fitting the amplitude spectrum of the light curve with those inferred from fitting the covariance structure of the light curve using the CELERITE2 Gaussian process (GP) regression software and a damped simple harmonic oscillator (SHO) kernel.
Results: We find a difference in the characteristic frequency obtained from the amplitude spectrum fitting and from fitting the covariance structure of the light curve using a GP regression with CELERITE2 for only a minority of the considered sample. However, the trends among mass, age, and the properties of SLF variability previously reported remain unaffected. We also find that the method of GP regression is more efficient in terms of computation time and, on average, more robust against the quality and noise properties of the input time series data in determining the properties of SLF variability.
Conclusions: GP regression is a useful and novel methodology to efficiently characterise SLF variability in massive stars compared to previous techniques used in the literature. We conclude that the correlation between a star's SLF variability, in particular the characteristic frequency, and its location in the HR diagram is robust for main-sequence massive stars. There also exists a distribution in the stochasticity of SLF variability in massive stars, which indicates that the coherency of SLF variability is also a function of mass and age in massive stars. 

2022MNRAS.509.4246E
2022/01
cited: 6 [05.08.24]
5 yr of BRITE-Constellation photometry of the luminous blue variable P Cygni: properties of the stochastic low-frequency variability

    Elliott, Ashley; Richardson, Noel D.; Pablo, Herbert and 9 more 

Abstract
Luminous Blue Variables (LBVs) are massive stars that are likely to be a transitionary phase between O stars and hydrogen-free classical Wolf-Rayet stars. The variability of these stars has been an area of study for both professional and amateur astronomers for more than a century. In this paper, we present 5 yr of precision photometry of the classical LBV P Cygni taken with the BRITE-Constellation nanosatellites. We have analyzed these data with Fourier analysis to search for periodicities that could elucidate the drivers of variability for these stars. These data show some long-time-scale variability over the course of all six calendar years of observations, but the frequencies needed to reproduce the individual light curves are not consistent from 1 yr to the next. These results likely show that there is no periodic phenomenon present for P Cygni, meaning that the variability is largely stochastic. We interpret the data as being caused by internal gravity waves similar to those seen in other massive stars, with P Cygni exhibiting a larger amplitude and lower characteristic frequency than the main-sequence or blue supergiant stars previously studied. These results show evidence that LBVs may be an extrapolation of the blue supergiants, which have previously been shown to be an extension of main-sequence stars in the context of the stochastic low-frequency photometric variability.

2022A&A...668A..92W
2022/12
cited: 6 [02.06.24]
Quantitative spectroscopy of B-type supergiants

    Weßmayer, D.; Przybilla, N.; Butler, K. 

Abstract
Context. B-type supergiants are versatile tools to address a number of highly-relevant astrophysical topics, ranging from stellar atmospheres over stellar and galactic evolution to the characterisation of interstellar sightlines and to the cosmic distance scale.
Aims: A hybrid non-local thermodynamic equilibrium (LTE) approach, involving line-blanketed model atmospheres computed under the assumption of LTE in combination with line formation calculations that account for deviations from LTE, is tested for quantitative analyses of B-type supergiants of mass up to about 30 M⊙, characterising a sample of 14 Galactic objects in a comprehensive way.
Methods: Hydrostatic plane-parallel atmospheric structures and synthetic spectra computed with Kurucz's ATLAS 12 code together with the non-LTE line-formation codes DETAIL/SURFACE are compared to results from full non-LTE calculations with TLUSTY, and the effects of turbulent pressure on the models are investigated. High-resolution spectra at signal-to-noise ratio >130 are analysed for atmospheric parameters, using Stark-broadened hydrogen lines and multiple metal ionisation equilibria, and for elemental abundances. Fundamental stellar parameters are derived by considering stellar evolution tracks and Gaia early data release 3 (EDR3) parallaxes. Interstellar reddening and the reddening law along the sight lines towards the target stars are determined by matching model spectral energy distributions to observed ones.
Results: Our hybrid non-LTE approach turns out to be equivalent to hydrostatic full non-LTE modelling for the deeper photospheric layers of the B-type supergiants under consideration, where most lines of the optical spectrum are formed. Turbulent pressure can become relevant for microturbulent velocities larger than 10 km s−1. The changes in the atmospheric density structure affect many diagnostic lines, implying systematic changes in atmospheric parameters, for instance an increase in surface gravities by up to 0.05 dex. A high precision and accuracy is achieved for all derived parameters by bringing multiple indicators to agreement simultaneously. Effective temperatures are determined to 2-3% uncertainty, surface gravities to better than 0.07 dex, masses to about 5%, radii to about 10%, luminosities to better than 25%, and spectroscopic distances to 10% uncertainty typically. Abundances for chemical species that are accessible from the optical spectra (He, C, N, O, Ne, Mg, Al, Si, S, Ar, and Fe) are derived with uncertainties of 0.05-0.10 dex (1σ standard deviations). The observed spectra are reproduced well by the model spectra. The derived N/C versus N/O ratios tightly follow the predictions from Geneva stellar evolution models that account for rotation, and spectroscopic and Gaia EDR3 distances are closely matched. Finally, the methodology is tested for analyses of intermediate-resolution spectra of extragalactic B-type supergiants. 

2023A&A...674A.134R
2023/06
cited: 6 [31.05.24]
Internal gravity waves in massive stars. II. Frequency analysis across stellar mass

    Ratnasingam, R. P.; Rogers, T. M.; Chowdhury, S. and 4 more 

Abstract
Stars that are over 1.6 solar masses are generally known to possess convective cores and radiative envelopes, which allows for the propagation of outwardly travelling internal gravity waves (IGWs). Here, we study the generation and propagation of IGWs in such stars using two-dimensional, fully non-linear hydrodynamical simulations with realistic stellar reference states from the one-dimensional stellar evolution code, Modules for Stellar Astrophysics. Compared to previous similar works, this study utilises radius-dependent thermal diffusivity profiles for five different stellar masses at the middle of the main sequence: 3 M⊙, 5 M⊙, 7 M⊙, 10 M⊙, and 13 M⊙. From the simulations, we find that the surface perturbations are larger for higher masses, but no noticeable trends are observed for the frequency slopes with different stellar masses. The slopes are also similar to the results from previous works. We compared our simulation results with stellar photometric data from a recent survey and we found that for frequency intervals above 8 μHz, there is a good agreement between the temperature frequency slopes from the simulations and the surface brightness variations of these observed stars. This indicates that the brightness variations are caused by core-generated IGWs. 

2023NatAs...7.1228A
2023/10
cited: 7  [31.05.24]
The photometric variability of massive stars due to gravity waves excited by core convection.

    Anders, Evan H.; Lecoanet, Daniel; Cantiello, Matteo and 8 more 

Abstract
Massive stars die in catastrophic explosions that seed the interstellar medium with heavy elements and produce neutron stars and black holes. Predictions of the explosion's character and the remnant mass depend on models of the star's evolutionary history. Models of massive star interiors can be empirically constrained by asteroseismic observations of gravity wave oscillations. Recent photometric observations reveal a ubiquitous red noise signal on massive main sequence stars; a hypothesized source of this noise is gravity waves driven by core convection. We present three-dimensional simulations of massive star convection extending from the star's centre to near its surface, with realistic stellar luminosities. Using these simulations, we predict the photometric variability due to convectively driven gravity waves at the surfaces of massive stars, and find that gravity waves produce photometric variability of a lower amplitude and lower characteristic frequency than the observed red noise. We infer that the photometric signal of gravity waves excited by core convection is below the noise limit of current observations, and thus the red noise must be generated by an alternative process. 

2022MNRAS.509.4246E
2022/01
cited: 6 [31.05.24]
5 yr of BRITE-Constellation photometry of the luminous blue variable P Cygni: properties of the stochastic low-frequency variability

    Elliott, Ashley; Richardson, Noel D.; Pablo, Herbert and 9 more 

Abstract
Luminous Blue Variables (LBVs) are massive stars that are likely to be a transitionary phase between O stars and hydrogen-free classical Wolf-Rayet stars. The variability of these stars has been an area of study for both professional and amateur astronomers for more than a century. In this paper, we present 5 yr of precision photometry of the classical LBV P Cygni taken with the BRITE-Constellation nanosatellites. We have analyzed these data with Fourier analysis to search for periodicities that could elucidate the drivers of variability for these stars. These data show some long-time-scale variability over the course of all six calendar years of observations, but the frequencies needed to reproduce the individual light curves are not consistent from 1 yr to the next. These results likely show that there is no periodic phenomenon present for P Cygni, meaning that the variability is largely stochastic. We interpret the data as being caused by internal gravity waves similar to those seen in other massive stars, with P Cygni exhibiting a larger amplitude and lower characteristic frequency than the main-sequence or blue supergiant stars previously studied. These results show evidence that LBVs may be an extrapolation of the blue supergiants, which have previously been shown to be an extension of main-sequence stars in the context of the stochastic low-frequency photometric variability. 

2022A&A...665A..36G
2022/09
cited: 6 [31.05.24]
Analysis of high-resolution FEROS spectroscopy for a sample of variable B-type stars assembled from TESS photometry

    Gebruers, Sarah; Tkachenko, Andrew; Bowman, Dominic M. and 8 more 

Abstract
Context. Spectroscopic data are necessary to break degeneracies in the asteroseismic modelling of the interior structure in high- and intermediate-mass stars. With the TESS mission, the number of bright intermediate-mass B-type stars with long photometric light curves that are suitable for detailed asteroseismic studies has increased substantially compared to the pre-TESS era.
Aims: We derive precise photospheric stellar parameters for a sample of 166 B-type stars with TESS light curves through a homogeneous spectroscopic analysis. The variability types of these sample stars are also classified based on all currently available TESS sectors, and they are ultimately prioritised according to their astrophysical potential.
Methods: We obtained high-resolution spectra for all 166 targets with the FEROS spectrograph in the context of a large program. The spectra were reduced with the CERES pipeline, which we adapted to improve the quality of the reduced spectra. These spectra were subsequently analysed with ZETA-PAYNE, a machine-learning-based spectrum analysis algorithm, to infer precise stellar labels for all stars in the sample. Furthermore, the least-squares deconvolution (LSD) method was employed to investigate spectral line profile variability (LPV) and isolate binary systems from presumably single stars.
Results: The LSD profile analysis identified 26 spectroscopic double-lined binaries; the remainder of the sample are 42 supergiants in the Large Magellanic Cloud galaxy and 98 Galactic stars, both with and without apparent LPV. For the Galactic single stars and single-lined spectroscopic binaries, we determine their five main surface parameters: effective temperature (Teff), surface gravity (log g), global metallicity ([M/H]), projected rotational velocity (v sin i), and microturbulent velocity (ξ) with average formal precisions of 70 K, 0.03 dex, 0.07 dex, 8 km s−1, and 0.7 km s−1, respectively. The average internal uncertainties we find for FEROS spectra with our spectrum analysis method are 430 K(Teff), 0.12 dex (log g), 0.13 dex ([M/H]), 12kms−1 (v sin i), and 2 kms−1 (ξ).
Conclusions: We find spectroscopic evidence that 8 of the 98 galactic single or SB1 variables are fast-rotating gravity-mode pulsators occurring in between the slowly pulsating B (SPB) stars and δ Scuti instability strips. The g-mode frequencies of these pulsators are shifted to relatively high frequency values due to their rotation, and their apparently too low Teff relative to the SPB instability region can in most cases be explained by the gravity darkening effect. We also discover 13 new HgMn stars in the Galactic sample of which only one is found in a spectroscopic binary, resulting in a biased and therefore unreliable low binary rate of only 8%. 

2023A&A...674A.212D
2023/06
cited: 6  [31.05.24]
The IACOB project. IX. Building a modern empirical database of Galactic O9 - B9 supergiants: Sample selection, description, and completeness

    de Burgos, A.; Simón-Díaz, S.; Urbaneja, M. A. and 1 more 

Abstract
Context. Blue supergiants (BSGs) are key objects for studying the intermediate phases of massive star evolution because they are very useful to constrain evolutionary models. However, the lack of a holistic study of a statistically significant and unbiased sample of these objects has lead to several long-standing questions about their physical properties and evolutionary nature to remain unsolved.
Aims: This paper and other upcoming papers of the IACOB series are focused on studying from a pure empirical point of view a sample of about 500 Galactic O9-B9 stars with luminosity classes I and II (plus 250 late O- and early B-type stars with luminosity classes III, IV, and V) that cover distances up to ≈4 kpc from the Sun.
Methods: We compiled an initial set of ≈11 000 high-resolution spectra from ≈1600 Galactic late O- and B-type stars. We used a novel spectroscopic strategy based on a simple fitting of the Hβ line to select stars in a specific region of the spectroscopic Hertzsprung-Russel diagram. We evaluated the completeness of our sample using the Alma Luminous Star catalog (ALS III) and Gaia-DR3 data.
Results: We show the benefits of the proposed strategy for identifying BSGs that are descended in the context of single star evolution from stellar objects that are born as O-type stars. The resulting sample reaches a high level of completeness with respect to the ALS III catalog, gathering ≈80% of all-sky targets brighter than Bmag < 9 located within 2 kpc. However, we identify the need for new observations in specific regions of the southern hemisphere.
Conclusions: We have explored a very fast and robust method for selecting BSGs. This provides a valuable tool for large spectroscopic surveys such as WEAVE-SCIP or 4MIDABLE-LR, and it highlights the risk of using spectral classifications from the literature. Upcoming studies will make use of this large and homogeneous spectroscopic sample to study the specific properties of these stars in detail. We initially provide first results for their rotational properties (in terms of projected rotational velocities, v sin i). 

2022ApJ...940...27D
2022/11
cited: 5  [31.05.24]
The Properties of Fast Yellow Pulsating Supergiants: FYPS Point the Way to Missing Red Supergiants

    Dorn-Wallenstein, Trevor Z.; Levesque, Emily M.; Davenport, James R. A. and 3 more 

Abstract
Fast yellow pulsating supergiants (FYPS) are a recently discovered class of evolved massive pulsators. As candidate supergiant objects, and one of the few classes of pulsating evolved massive stars, these objects have incredible potential to change our understanding of the structure and evolution of massive stars. Here we examine the lightcurves of a sample of 126 cool supergiants in the Magellanic Clouds observed by the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite in order to identify pulsating stars. After making quality cuts and filtering out contaminant objects, we examine the distribution of pulsating stars in the Hertzprung-Russel (HR) diagram, and find that FYPS occupy a region above logL/L⊙≳5.0
. This luminosity boundary corresponds to stars with initial masses of ~18-20 M ⊙, consistent with the most massive red supergiant progenitors of supernovae (SNe) II-P, as well as the observed properties of SNe IIb progenitors. This threshold is in agreement with the picture that FYPS are post-RSG stars. Finally, we characterize the behavior of FYPS pulsations as a function of their location in the HR diagram. We find low-frequency pulsations at higher effective temperatures, and higher-frequency pulsations at lower temperatures, with a transition between the two behaviors at intermediate temperatures. The observed properties of FYPS make them fascinating objects for future theoretical study.

2023A&A...676A..85S
2023/08
cited: 4 [05.06.24]
The ESO UVES/FEROS Large Programs of TESS OB pulsators. I. Global stellar parameters from high-resolution spectroscopy

    Serebriakova, Nadya; Tkachenko, Andrew; Gebruers, Sarah and 7 more 

Abstract
Context. Modern stellar structure and evolution theory suffers from a lack of observational calibration for the interior physics of intermediate- and high-mass stars. This leads to discrepancies between theoretical predictions and observed phenomena that are mostly related to angular momentum and element transport. Analyses of large samples of massive stars connecting state-of-the-art spectroscopy to asteroseismology may provide clues as to how to improve our understanding of their interior structure.
Aims: We aim to deliver a sample of O- and B-type stars at metallicity regimes of the Milky Way and the Large Magellanic Cloud (LMC) galaxies with accurate atmospheric parameters from high-resolution spectroscopy, along with a detailed investigation of line-profile broadening, both for the benefit of future asteroseismic studies.
Methods: After describing the general aims of our two Large Programs, we develop a dedicated methodology to fit spectral lines and deduce accurate global stellar parameters from high-resolution multi-epoch UVES and FEROS spectroscopy. We use the best available atmosphere models for three regimes covered by our global sample, given its breadth in terms of mass, effective temperature, and evolutionary stage.
Results: Aside from accurate atmospheric parameters and locations in the Hertzsprung-Russell diagram, we deliver detailed analyses of macroturbulent line broadening, including estimations of the radial and tangential components. We find that these two components are difficult to disentangle from spectra with signal-to-noise ratios of below 250.
Conclusions: Future asteroseismic modelling of the deep interior physics of the most promising stars in our sample will provide much needed information regarding OB stars, including those of low metallicity in the LMC.   

2021MNRAS.504.2550A
2021/06
cited: 5 [02.06.24]
Analytical solutions for radiation-driven winds in massive stars - II. The δ-slow regime

    Araya, I.; Christen, A.; Curé, M. and 7 more 

Abstract
Accurate mass-loss rates and terminal velocities from massive stars winds are essential to obtain synthetic spectra from radiative transfer calculations and to determine the evolutionary path of massive stars. From a theoretical point of view, analytical expressions for the wind parameters and velocity profile would have many advantages over numerical calculations that solve the complex non-linear set of hydrodynamic equations. In a previous work, we obtained an analytical description for the fast wind regime. Now, we propose an approximate expression for the line-force in terms of new parameters and obtain a velocity profile closed-form solution (in terms of the Lambert W function) for the δ-slow regime. Using this analytical velocity profile, we were able to obtain the mass-loss rates based on the m-CAK theory. Moreover, we established a relation between this new set of line-force parameters with the known stellar and m-CAK line-force parameters. To this purpose, we calculated a grid of numerical hydrodynamical models and performed a multivariate multiple regression. The numerical and our descriptions lead to good agreement between their values.  

2023ApJ...951L..42S
2023/07
cited: 4  [31.05.24]
Turbulence-supported Massive Star Envelopes

    Schultz, William C.; Bildsten, Lars; Jiang, Yan-Fei 

Abstract
The outer envelopes of massive (M ≳ 10 M ⊙) stars exhibit large increases in opacities from forests of lines and ionization transitions (particularly from iron and helium) that trigger near-surface convection zones. One-dimensional (1D) models predict density inversions and supersonic motions that must be resolved with computationally intensive three-dimensional (3D) radiation hydrodynamic (RHD) modeling. Only in the last decade have computational tools advanced to the point where ab initio 3D models of these turbulent envelopes can be calculated, enabling us to present five 3D RHD ATHENA++ models (four previously published and one new 13 M ⊙ model). When convective motions are subsonic, we find excellent agreement between 3D and 1D velocity magnitudes, stellar structure, and photospheric quantities. However, when convective velocities approach the sound speed, hydrostatic balance fails as the turbulent pressure can account for 80% of the force balance. As predicted by Henyey, we show that this additional pressure support leads to a modified temperature gradient, which reduces the superadiabaticity where convection is occurring. In addition, all five models display significant overshooting from the convection in the Fe convection zone. As a result, the turbulent velocities at the surface are indicative of those in the Fe zone. There are no confined convection zones as seen in 1D models. In particular, helium convection zones seen in 1D models are significantly modified. Stochastic low-frequency brightness variability is also present in the 13 M ⊙ model with comparable amplitude and characteristic frequency to observed stars.

2021ApJ...910..133S
2021/04
cited: 3 [31.05.24]
Discovery and Characterization of a Rare Magnetic Hybrid β Cephei Slowly Pulsating B-type Star in an Eclipsing Binary in the Young Open Cluster NGC 6193

    Stassun, Keivan G.; Torres, Guillermo; Johnston, Cole and 4 more 

Abstract
As many as 10% of OB-type stars have global magnetic fields, which is surprising given that their internal structure is radiative near the surface. A direct probe of internal structure is pulsations, and some OB-type stars exhibit pressure modes (β Cep pulsators) or gravity modes (slowly pulsating B-type stars; SPBs); a few rare cases of hybrid β Cep/SPBs occupy a narrow instability strip in the H-R diagram. The most precise fundamental properties of stars are obtained from eclipsing binaries (EBs), and those in clusters with known ages and metallicities provide the most stringent constraints on theory. Here we report the discovery that HD 149834 in the ∼5 Myr cluster NGC 6193 is an EB comprising a hybrid β Cep/SPB pulsator and a highly irradiated low-mass companion. We determine the masses, radii, and temperatures of both stars; the ∼9.7 M⊙ primary resides in the instability strip where hybrid pulsations are theoretically predicted. The presence of both SPB and β Cep pulsations indicates that the system has a near-solar metallicity, and is in the second half of the main-sequence lifetime. The radius of the ∼1.2 M⊙ companion is consistent with theoretical pre-main-sequence isochrones at 5 Myr, but its temperature is much higher than expected, perhaps due to irradiation by the primary. The radius of the primary is larger than expected, unless its metallicity is super-solar. Finally, the light curve shows residual modulation consistent with the rotation of the primary, and Chandra observations reveal a flare, both of which suggest the presence of starspots and thus magnetism on the primary.  

2024ApJ...963L..42M
2024/03
cited: 3 [10.06.24]
Evidence for Evolved Stellar Binary Mergers in Observed B-type Blue Supergiants

    Menon, Athira; Ercolino, Andrea; Urbaneja, Miguel A. and 8 more 

Abstract
Blue supergiants are the brightest stars in their host galaxies, and yet their evolutionary status has been a long-standing problem in stellar astrophysics. In this pioneering work, we present a large sample of 59 early B-type supergiants in the Large Magellanic Cloud with newly derived stellar parameters and identify the signatures of stars born from binary mergers among them. We simulate novel 1D merger models of binaries consisting of post main-sequence giants with helium-rich cores (primaries) and main-sequence companions (secondaries), and consider the effects of interaction of the secondary with the core of the primary along with the mixing induced by the merger in the envelope. Thereafter, the evolution of the newborn 17–43 $\,{{\rm{M}}}_{\odot }$ stars is followed until core-carbon depletion, close to their final pre-explosion stage. Unlike stars born alone with comparable masses, stars born from mergers of evolved binaries are blue throughout their core helium-burning phase and replicate the surface gravities and Hertzsprung–Russell diagram positions of most of our sample, thus indicating that B-type supergiants structurally resemble stars born from such mergers. Moreover, the large nitrogen-to-carbon and nitrogen-to-oxygen number ratios, coupled with helium enhancements exhibited by at least half our data sample, is uniquely reproduced by our merger models. Collectively, these findings provide compelling evidence toward the important role of binary mergers in producing the currently observed population of blue supergiants in our Universe. 

2024ApJ...966..196M
2024/05
cited: 2 [31.05.24]
Variability of Blue Supergiants in the LMC with TESS

    Ma, Linhao; Johnston, Cole; Bellinger, Earl Patrick and 1 more 

Abstract
The blue supergiant (BSG) problem, namely, the overabundance of BSGs inconsistent with classical stellar evolution theory, remains an open question in stellar astrophysics. Several theoretical explanations have been proposed, which may be tested by their predictions for the characteristic time variability. In this work, we analyze the light curves of a sample of 20 BSGs obtained from the Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite (TESS) mission. We report a characteristic signal in the low-frequency (f ≲ 2 day‑1) range for all our targets. The amplitude spectrum has a peak frequency of ∼0.2 day‑1, and we are able to fit it by a modified Lorentzian profile. The signal itself shows strong stochasticity across different TESS sectors, suggesting its driving mechanism happens on short (≲months) timescales. Our signals resemble those obtained for a limited sample of hotter OB stars and yellow supergiants, suggesting their possible common origins. We discuss three possible physical explanations: stellar winds launched by rotation, convection motions that reach the stellar surface, and waves from the deep stellar interior. The peak frequency of the signal favors processes related to the convective zone caused by the iron opacity peak, and the shape of the spectra might be explained by the propagation of high-order, damped gravity waves excited from that zone. We discuss the uncertainties and limitations of all these scenarios.

2023ApJ...954..171V
2023/09
cited: 2 [31.05.24]
Three-dimensional Simulations of Massive Stars. II. Age Dependence

    Vanon, R.; Edelmann, P. V. F.; Ratnasingam, R. P. and 2 more 

Abstract
We present 3D full star simulations, reaching up to 90% of the total stellar radius, for three 7 M ⊙ stars of different ages: zero-age main sequence (ZAMS), mid-main sequence (midMS), and terminal-age main sequence (TAMS). A comparison with several theoretical prescriptions shows that the generation spectra for all three ages are dominated by convective plumes. Two distinct overshooting layers are observed, with most plumes stopped within the layer situated directly above the convective boundary; overshooting to the second, deeper layer becomes progressively more infrequent with increasing stellar age. Internal gravity wave (IGW) propagation is significantly impacted in the midMS and TAMS models as a result of some IGWs getting trapped within their Brunt-Väisälä frequency spikes. A fundamental change in the wave structure across radius is also observed, driven by the effect of density stratification on IGW propagation causing waves to become evanescent within the radiative zone, with older stars being affected more strongly. We find that the steepness of the frequency spectrum at the surface increases from ZAMS to the older models, with older stars also showing more modes in their spectra.  

2024ApJS..272...25E
2024/06
cited: 1 [31.05.24]
β Cephei Pulsators in Eclipsing Binaries Observed with TESS

    Eze, Christian I.; Handler, Gerald 

Abstract
The combined strength of asteroseismology and empirical stellar basic parameter determinations for in-depth asteroseismic analysis of massive pulsators in eclipsing binaries shows great potential for treating the challenging and mysterious discrepancies between observations and models of stellar structure and the evolution of massive stars. This paper compiles a comprehensive list of massive pulsators in eclipsing binary systems observed with TESS. The TESS light curves and discrete Fourier transforms of a sample of 8055 stars of spectral type B0–B3 were examined for eclipses and stellar pulsations, and the ephemerides of the resulting subsample of massive pulsators in eclipsing binaries were computed. This subsample was also crossmatched with existing catalogs of massive pulsators. Until now, fewer than 30 β Cephei pulsators in eclipsing binaries have been reported in the literature. Here we announce a total of 78 pulsators of the β Cephei type in eclipsing binaries, 59 of which are new discoveries. Forty-three are recognized as definite, and 35 are candidate pulsators. Our sample of pulsating massive stars in eclipsing binaries allows for future asteroseismic modeling to better understand the internal mixing profile and to resolve the mass discrepancy in massive stars. We have already started follow-up work on some of the most interesting candidates.   

2024A&A...683A..49Z
2024/03
cited: 1 [31.05.24]
Catalogue of BRITE-Constellation targets. I. Fields 1 to 14 (November 2013-April 2016)

    Zwintz, K.; Pigulski, A.; Kuschnig, R. and 25 more 

Abstract
Context. The BRIght Target Explorer (BRITE) mission collects photometric time series in two passbands with the aim of investigating stellar structure and evolution. Since their launches in the years 2013 and 2014, the constellation of five BRITE nano-satellites has observed a total of more than 700 individual bright stars in 64 fields. Some targets have been observed multiple times. Thus, the total time base of the datasets acquired for those stars can be as long as nine years.
Aims: Our aim is to provide a complete description of ready-to-use BRITE data, to show the scientific potential of the BRITE-Constellation data by identifying the most interesting targets, and to demonstrate how scientists can use these data in their research, and encourage them to do so.
Methods: We applied a decorrelation process to the automatically reduced BRITE-Constellation data to correct for instrumental effects. We performed a statistical analysis of the light curves obtained for the 300 stars observed in the first 14 fields during the first ~2.5 yr of the mission. We also performed cross-identification with the International Variable Star Index.
Results: We present the data obtained by the BRITE-Constellation mission in the first 14 fields it observed, from November 2013 to April 2016. We also describe the properties of the data for these fields and the 300 stars observed in them. Using these data, we detect variability in 64% of the presented sample of stars. Sixty-four stars, or 21.3% of the sample, have not yet been identified as variable in the literature and their data have not been analysed in detail. They can therefore provide valuable scientific material for further research. All data are made publicly available through the BRITE Public Data Archive and the Canadian Astronomy Data Centre.

2023Galax..11...93S
2023/08
cited: 1  [31.05.24]
Unveiling the Evolutionary State of Three B Supergiant Stars: PU Gem, ϵ CMa, and η CMa

    Sánchez Arias, Julieta Paz; Németh, Péter; de Almeida, Elisson Saldanha da Gama and 3 more 

Abstract
We aim to combine asteroseismology, spectroscopy, and evolutionary models to establish a comprehensive picture of the evolution of Galactic blue supergiant stars (BSG). To start such an investigation, we selected three BSG candidates for our analysis: HD 42087 (PU Gem), HD 52089 (ϵ CMa), and HD 58350 (η CMa). These stars show pulsations and were suspected to be in an evolutionary stage either preceding or succeding the red supergiant (RSG) stage. For our analysis, we utilized the 2-min cadence TESS data to study the photometric variability, and we obtained new spectroscopic observations at the CASLEO observatory. We used non-LTE radiative transfer models calculated with CMFGEN to derive their stellar and wind parameters. For the fitting procedure, we included CMFGEN models in the iterative spectral analysis pipeline XTGRID to determine their CNO abundances. The spectral modeling was limited to changing only the effective temperature, surface gravity, CNO abundances, and mass-loss rates. Finally, we compared the derived metal abundances with prediction from Geneva stellar evolution models. The frequency spectra of all three stars show stochastic oscillations and indications of one nonradial strange mode, fr= 0.09321 d‑1 in HD 42087 and a rotational splitting centred in f2= 0.36366 d‑1 in HD 52089. We conclude that the rather short sectoral observing windows of TESS prevent establishing a reliable mode identification of low frequencies connected to mass-loss variabilities. The spectral analysis confirmed gradual changes in the mass-loss rates, and the derived CNO abundances comply with the values reported in the literature. We were able to achieve a quantitative match with stellar evolution models for the stellar masses and luminosities. However, the spectroscopic surface abundances turned out to be inconsistent with the theoretical predictions. The stars show N enrichment, typical for CNO cycle processed material, but the abundance ratios did not reflect the associated levels of C and O depletion. We found HD 42087 to be the most consistent with a pre-RSG evolutionary stage, HD 58350 is most likely in a post-RSG evolution and HD 52089 shows stellar parameters compatible with a star at the TAMS.  

2024MNRAS.527...93V
2024/01 [02.06.24]
The wind of rotating B supergiants - II. The δ-slow hydrodynamic regime

    Venero, R. O. J.; Curé, M.; Puls, J. and 5 more 

Abstract
The theory of line-driven winds can explain many observed spectral features in early-type stars, though our understanding the winds of B supergiants remains incomplete. The hydrodynamic equations for slowly rotating stellar winds predict two regimes based on the line-force parameter δ: the fast and the δ-slow solution. In this paper, we aim to explore the capability of the latter to explain the observed properties of B supergiant winds. We calculate Hα line profiles, the most sensitive wind diagnostics in the optical, for both fast and δ-slow wind models. We fit them to observed data from a well-studied sample of B supergiants, by adapting the line-force parameters (k, α, and δ) of the hydrodynamic model. Unexpectedly, the observed Hα spectra can be reproduced by both hydrodynamic wind regimes with similar precision. We argue that this similarity results from the similar shape of the normalized velocity law produced by both regimes in the lower, Hα-forming wind region. Our findings raise a dichotomy, because mass-loss rates and terminal velocities (v∞) for each solution are quite different. The δ-slow solution predicts maximum values for v∞ that are systematically lower than those measured in the ultraviolet, whereas the v∞ values of the fast solution are closer, and probably more appropriate. However, our results also indicate that the δ-slow solution might better describe the dense winds of B hypergiants. Multiwavelength analyses and a larger sample of stars are needed to reach a definitive conclusion.  

2023A&A...677A.176C
2023/09
Variations in the intermediate wind region of the blue supergiant 55 Cygni

    Cidale, L. S.; Haucke, M.; Arias, M. L. and 6 more 

Abstract
Context. The quantitative near-infrared (NIR) spectroscopic synthesis is an important technique for determining wind properties of massive stars. The Brα line is an excellent mass-loss tracer and provides valuable information on the physical conditions of intermediate-wind regions. The knowledge of the wind properties gained by studying the NIR lines could provide extra ingredients to the theory of line-driven winds, mainly because the standard theory does not predict observed properties of blue supergiants, such as high values for the β parameter (β> 2), low terminal velocities, and mass-loss variability.
Aims: We seek to enhance our understanding of the wind properties of B supergiants. To this end, we propose analysing their NIR spectra over different epochs to study wind variability and its connection with phenomena arising from regions close to the photosphere.
Methods: We present the first sets of multi-epoch high-resolution K- and L-band spectra of 55 Cyg acquired with the Gemini Near-InfraRed Spectrograph (GNIRS). We measured line equivalent widths and modelled the Brα line to derive (unclumped) mass-loss rates. Synthetic line profiles were computed for a homogeneous spherical wind by solving the radiative transfer equations in the co-moving frame for a multi-level atom in non-local thermodynamic equilibrium (NLTE).
Results: We observe variations in the spectral lines originating in the upper photosphere and the wind. The perturbations, on average, have periods of ~13 and ~23 days; the latter is similar to that found previously from optical data (22.5 days). The NIR lines observed in 2013 are described with the same wind structure used to model a quasi-simultaneous observation in Hα. By contrast, from observations taken in 2015, we derived a higher mean mass-loss rate. Variations in the mass-loss rate are also detected within a few weeks. Interestingly, we find that the profile shape of the Hu14 line sets constraints on the mass loss. Moreover, we find the Mg II doublet in emission, which suggests a tenuous circumstellar gas ring or shell.
Conclusions: The variability detected in the NIR H emission lines of 55 Cyg is related to changes in the mass-loss rate, which doubled its value between 2013 and 2015. Furthermore, the short-term variability (within three weeks) in the spectral lines and mass loss supports the hypothesis of strange-mode oscillations. This pilot project demonstrates the importance of comprehensive monitoring of blue supergiants' variability to deeply understand the physical properties of their stellar winds and the role of pulsations in recurrently enhancing mass loss. 

2023ApJ...955..123S
2023/10
Cite: 0 [05.06.24]
Variability of Magnetic Hot Stars from the TESS Observations

    Shen, Dong-Xiang; Li, Gang; Abdusamatjan, Iskandar and 7 more 

Abstract
Magnetic hot stars refer to stars that have effective temperatures approximately in the range from 7000-50,000 K, and with large-scale globally organized magnetic fields. These magnetic fields exhibit strengths ranging from tens of Gauss to tens of kilo-Gauss. They are key in understanding the effects caused by magnetic fields in the stellar evolution. However, there are only three magnetic hot stars studied via a combination of spectropolarimetric and asteroseismic modeling. Combined with Transiting Exoplanet Survey Satellite sectors 1-56 data sets, we provided a photometric variability and stochastic low-frequency (SLF) variability study of 118 magnetic hot stars. Nine new rotating variable stars are identified. Using the Bayesian Markov Chain Monte Carlo framework, we fitted the morphologies of SLF variability for magnetic hot stars. Our analysis reveals that the magnetic hot stars in our sample have γ < 5.5 with the vast majority having 1 ≤ γ ≤ 3. The ν char is primarily in the ranges of 0 day-1 < ν char < 6.3 day-1. The amplitude of SLF variability, log α 0, shows a dominant distribution ranging from 0.8-3. No significant correlations are observed between the luminosity and fitting parameters, suggesting no clear dependence of SLF variability on stellar mass for our sample of magnetic hot stars with masses between approximately 1.5 M ⊙ < M < 20 M ⊙. We found a significant negative correlation between the B p and ν char. This suppression effect of magnetic fields on ν char may be a result of their inhibition of macroturbulence.
